Authors
Jeff Meyer
Number of Reviews
133

Title
Review for Abyss, The (1989)
     THE ABYSS is an interesting flick, and pretty entertaining; it's also an
interesting "case study," in that the entertainment comes much more from the
surroundings than the plot.  The story works well enough -- nothing special,
buoyed mostly by earnest if non-glowing performances by most of the cast; it
seems mired in molasses at times, or maybe liquid oxygen.  The audience can
breath it, but they do it in gulps -- it doesn't flow well.
     What *does* leave you with an impression -- and, after time, communicates
more emotion than cast or dialogue, really -- is the setting and the way the
film was shot.  THE ABYSS takes place underwater, WAY underwater, and
everything about the film gives that impression; the technical details may be
off, but it *feels* right.  Cameron has, without a doubt, shot about the best
underwater adventure film I can think of.  It gives (when seen on a big screen,
preferably 70mm -- this film is *not* going to translate into video well,
folks) a wonderful sense of claustrophobia, of being under *all* *that*
*water*...  And the deep dive ascents -- whew!  You stop thinking about what
they're doing, and just goggle at the spectacle of it all.  I think the idea to
really shoot this underwater was a good one -- it adds to Suspension of Belief
factor immeasurably.  (I am curious how much of the underwater vehicle scenes
were done with blue-screen effects, though -- perfect place for them.)
     Other good points: liked the relationship between Harris and Mastrantonio,
though it never really flamed, and was a touch too earnest.  And the early
"unknown entity" bits were able to get me excited, mainly due to Mastrantonio's
acting.  Ed Harris shows that 1950s movie heroes can still muddle along in the
1990s.  (Though I got this feeling, right towards the end, that he was going to
say "Ready to go -- 100%!" in the best John Glenn tones.)  Finally, I guess
there's still some New Race Contact fascination left in me that wasn't totally
sucked out by CLOSE ENCOUNTERS, but the climax seems really visually derivative
at points -- kept expecting Richard Dreyfuss to help Harris off with his
helmet.  ("Hi!  Got any Cheetos?")
     Still, it's a decent yarn, at least by summer standards; the look of the
film is not to be missed, though.  Find a 70mm theater this weekend and jump
in.

Title
Review for Doctor Zhivago (1965)
     The filmmaker retrospective this year focused on four of the late
David Lean's films; three of them are among his lesser-known, non-epic
pictures.  Here's four thumbnail reviews...
BRIEF ENCOUNTER (David Lean Retrospective/Britain, 1945):
It has its moments, and you get Stanley Holloway wandering in and out,
so it's watchable; but despite it's reputation as one of the great
romantic films of all time, I found it unexceptional.  (However, I think
they forgot to show a reel of it; that I'm not sure should tell you
something about the pace of it.)
HOBSON'S CHOICE (David Lean Retrospective/Britain, 1945):
Lean's only out-and-out comedy, this is a treat, telling the story of a
period romance of practicality between a humble and rather simple
cobbler (John Mills) and the elder daughter (Brenda de Banzie) of a
wealthy, imperious ogre of a bootmaker played by Charles Laughton.  The
parts with Laughton are actually rather slow, but once the film settles
on Mills and de Banzie (who decides that it's time she got married and
that Mills has his points), it's a charmer.
DOCTOR ZHIVAGO (David Lean Retrospective/Britain, 1965):
Very beautiful and pretty to look at, like a Christmas snow scene under
glass: after the first hour and a half, you want to turn it upside down
and shake it.  Alec Guinness is (as usual) magnetic in the few spots
he's on, but Ralph Richardson isn't really given much room to move
around in.  Did anyone else find themselves snorting with amusement
during Omar Sharif's last scene?  Another tragic mass transit story...
SUMMERTIME (David Lean Retrospective/Britain, 1955):
I like Katherine Hepburn, I like the script, Lean captures Venice
nicely, and it's interesting to see what Darren McGavin looked like when
he was young and hadn't discovered vampires yet.  Nothing very special,
but you feel full up afterwards.

Title
Review for Lethal Weapon 2 (1989)
     Okay, Cinema Philosophy Time:  Can a film with an abysmal script,
unremarkable photography, reams of shoot-outs and chase scenes, wind-up
villains, outrageous plot blunders, gratuitous advertising (how many Subway
Shops can *you* spot in this picture?) and a totally predictable climax be
saved by a good rapport between the two main characters, and a basis for said
relationship that overshadows the pedestrian film?
     I mean, I like watching Gibson and Glover when they get together.  I
particularly like the concept for their relationship: Gibson plays a cop who is
right on -- I mean *right* on -- the edge; he's a finely-honed, somewhat
demented (at least in risk-taking) fighter.  However, he would have burned
himself out (or killed himself) long ago, if it weren't for his friends, i.e.
his partner (Danny Glover) and his partner's family, who've adopted him and
given him that lifeline that anchors him to reality.  Their affection for him,
and his for them, works.  Unfortunately, that constitutes about 15% of the
movie.  The rest of it has to be one of the lamest excuses for an action film
since FATAL BEAUTY.
     Oh, Lord, where to start?  The villains are drug-dealers, sadists *and*
racist South African officials.  (I'll bet the head honcho was originally
Joseph Goebbels, Jr., but they decided to cut that bit out to save running time
for the action sequences.)  What these people are able to get away with under
the aegis of Diplomatic Immunity is unbelievable.  (Even under the Bush
administration.  Hell, even under the Quayle administration.)  Characters are
introduced and then killed left and right to get G & G (and the audience) into
the "Waste Their Ass" mood -- it's pretty transparent.  And if that wasn't
enough, the main henchman comes out of the blue to say that he killed Gibson's
character's wife before LETHAL WEAPON!  Gee, why not have him responsible for
shooting down Korean Airlines Flight 007, or spitting on Jesus -- *really* give
Mel that excuse to Waste His Ass!
     Good points, besides the chemistry between The Guys?  Neat nail gun.
(Craftsman?)  The girl looks like Susan Dey with her own Wolfe tanning system.
And there are a few good lines.  Not enough to sustain the movie, though.
     My suggestion: see THE ABYSS.  It isn't a masterpiece, but I can still
remember what happened in it.  LETHAL WEAPON II has sort of faded from my
memory -- no doubt some sort of natural protection mechanism.

Title
Review for Die Hard (1988)
     Well, it starts out with Bruce Willis (taciturn New York cop) in his
wife's LA office in expensive high-rise office tower housing big executive
Christmas party.  He's in his undershirt, making fists with his toes in the
carpet, like any white male during the holiday season.  But wait!  What's this?
Big black trucks with ominous music heading for the Century City tower!  Guys
with Germanic accents!  A terrorist who looks like Huey Lewis!  Explosions!  A
younger clone of David Warner!  Surface-to-surface missiles!  Dumb Feds!  Smart
street cops!  The dickless guy from GHOSTBUSTERS being dickless again!  Lots of
fashionable swearing!
     Actually, DIE HARD is pretty entertaining.  It's like a two-hour plus
MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE episode, livened a bit by good action photography, a decent
score (except for a one-minute excerpt of James Horner's Marching Klingon music
at the end), Willis' conversations with an LA street cop and a limo driver, and
competent attention to detail throughout, except for the conclusion, which
sacrifices a lot of logic to provide domestic bliss and one last thrill.  It's
popcorn entertainment at it's very best, i.e.  plastic-thin but will keep you
happy for the duration.  70mm and Dolby stereo help a LOT.
     The thing that separates melodrama from drama is how well written the
characters are, and if it's acted, how good are the performances.  In
TRAVELLING NORTH, the answers are respectively good and very good.  Leo McKern
plays a retiring civil engineer in his seventies who retires to the northern
shore of Australia with women who is younger than him by a decade or two.
McKern is a grouchy old socialist who can be quite a tyrant with his new
companion and his neighbors.  What's more, his health begins failing him, and
his SO is torn between staying with him in an almost servile capacity as his
health fails (and his temperament gets worse) and visiting her daughters from a
previous marriage living in Perth, who are having their own problems.  The film
deals with intelligent people having a relationship in their twilight years,
and all in all it does it quite well.  The dialogue is fine, understated and is
never over-dramatic.  McKern puts in a very fine non-Rumpole performance, and
his fellow actors and actresses put in an honest day's work.  I came out of
TRAVELLING NORTH strangely refreshed; it's not a big film in any sense, but it
is a quietly satisfying one.
     All I can say is that *this* is comic genius, to watch Tom Hanks play a
thirteen-year-old in a man's body.  The credit shouldn't go to Hanks alone, of
course; the script and the direction by Penny Marshall give out for no more
than four or five minutes in the entire film, and the whole principle twist of
the film -- that a boy of thirteen can prosper by seeing the world in his
adolescent terms -- is carried out beautifully, rather like a variation of
Peter Sellers' Chauncey Gardner's trip through high society.  What's more,
Marshall and Hank's constantly underline how much of the "adult" world of
business inherits the foibles of the child's playground.  The theme is
constantly spotlighted, but always in a way clever enough not to breed
familiarity (and thus contempt).  And there are some beautiful bits here: the
first check, the meeting on the "building transformer," and the decoration of
Hank's apartment.  The cocktail party scene should definitely be remembered
come Oscar time, if only for the corn and caviar jokes.
     Enough verbiage.  I laughed my *ass* off through this film, and the
audience gave applauded it at the end (pretty good for a film in its eighth or
ninth week).

Title
Review for Rocketeer, The (1991)
     When we entered the San Diego Con Thursday, I noticed a hastily-scrawled
note on the events chalkboard discussing the "Rocketeer Movie."  I was
intrigued by this, since I had heard nothing about any adaptation of Dave
Stevens' characters (a wayward young pilot in the late 1930s who unwittingly
gains a jet-pack that allows him to fly, for those of you who don't read
rec.arts.comics) for film.  At first I thought it might be animated, which was
slightly amusing since Stevens (whose art in THE ROCKETEER has gained him a
great deal of renown) is not known to be the most speedy of pencilers.  Anyway,
Kathy Li and I stopped by and took a look; Stevens and two of the screenwriters
for the proposed film were there to talk about it.
     Basically it would be a live-action period adventure picture, set very
closely to the plot of the Rocketeer graphic novel, though not exactly adapting
it.  It has (after being taken around to several studios over the last two
years) almost been picked up by Disney; they're looking for something in the
"Indiana Jones" area, and feel that the Rocketeer could be just as popular (and
have just as many popular sequels -- so do I, if they can get people to really
capture the period, as Stevens does in his work).  "They want to market this as
much as possible -- a Rocketeer ride at DisneyLand."  Disney is "about the
fattest company around" (i.e. they're making good profits via Touchstone and
Buena Vista), so they can supply the needed budget.  They say a director, the
fellow who did HARRY AND THE HENDERSONS ("Bill Geer"?  -- my tape recorder
didn't do so well in this session) has been picked, and it's close to being
finalized.  It needs to be fairly big-budget, since it's a period piece, they
want the old airplanes (they want the "Gee Bee" very badly -- Dave knows where
there's one in Springfield, IL) for the flying sequences, and of course a
Flying Man with a Rocket On His Back (the last flying sequence is *inside* a
building -- neat idea).  They really want it to look like Superman in the old
Fleisher cartoons -- "like he has velocity and mass, not like the old Commander
Cody and the Rangers of the Stratosphere."  As they point out, this film *is*
about flying more than anything else, and so this will have to be a very strong
point.
     The two screenwriters are apparently working very closely with Stevens --
in fact, they're scripting the next two issues of THE ROCKETEER ADVENTURE
MAGAZINE (with Cliff working for The Shadow in New York).  It sounds as if the
three of them have been working together to get the picture made, and Stevens
feels that whatever makes THE ROCKETEER so popular in comics will be carried
over to the picture (at least by the script).  Someone asked if the in-joke in
the comic about the jet-pack's creator (it's "revealed" to be Howard Hughes,
but Hughes and his assistants are certainly meant to be Doc Savage and his
aides) will simply be made to be Hughes (let's face it, most moviegoers
wouldn't get the joke).  J. Edgar Hoover is chasing Cliff around for the
jet-pack, and the villain is a quasi-Errol Flynn character that plays off the
rumors that Flynn was a Nazi (much like Chaykin did in the BLACKHAWK series).
The sequence with Cliff rescuing the old rummy in the plane with the jet-pack
has been taken straight out of the movie.
     Speaking of what makes THE ROCKETEER so popular: Betty (Cliff's pin-up
girl obsession that Stevens has rendered so memorably).   She'll be an
voluptuous, aspiring actress who doesn't act very well -- "Well, it won't be
Merryl Streep."  They'd like Matthew Modine to play Cliff, but the director
apparently likes Bruce Campbell (sp?) who was in EVIL DEAD II.  There's also a
character in the movie that they'll be introducing in the comix series very
soon.
     One interesting side story about all of this:  Warren Beatty is starring,
producing and possibly directing as -- get this -- Dick Tracy.  Whoever's hired
him was talking a budget of $25 million, but Beatty is promised to get $11
million out of the deal.   Be nice to see him go after Bonnie and Clyde...  :-)

Title
Review for Whoops Apocalypse (1986)
WHOOPS APOCALYPSE (Great Britain, 1986)
Director: Tom Bussman
Screenwriters: Andrew Marshall, David Renwick
Cast: Loretta Swit, Peter Cook, Michael Richards, Rik Mayall, Alexei Sayle,
      Herbert Lom
     WHOOPS APOCALYPSE is a hybrid of British humor; I think it could be
described as two parts "Spitting Image," two parts NOT NECESSARILY THE NEWS, a
shot of Monty Python and a jigger of Benny Hill.  While many parts of it work
(more than you would expect, really), it seems to lack a cohesiveness of style.
Monty Python might have been comic guerilla warfare, but it was constantly
loony -- you never got Bob Hope "whoopie" jokes thrown in.
     Basically, this is something of a takeoff on the British/Argentina
situation of a few years ago.  After a small British colony is invaded by its
neighboring right-wing dictatorship, the British invade the country to regain
it.  In the midst of this, an international terrorist kidnaps the royal
princess, provoking the PM (a complete loony, wonderfully played by Peter
Cook) to threaten a nuclear strike against the dictatorship if the princess
returned in 48 hours.  Meanwhile, the President (Loretta Swit) tries to calm
both allies (not wanting to offend either side, since they're both tough on
communism).  Well, you get the idea.
     Best parts include the entire premise that while Cook is off his nut, his
insane right-wing policies are supported without question by the rest of the
country, and the anti-terrorist squad bit, which goes over the top several
times but is generally pretty good.  Much of the humor isn't predictable, and
that goes a long way for me.
     I suspect this will appear on HBO or Showtime sometime soon (if it hasn't
already).  It's certainly worth the time to tape it and play it back, if
only for the closing credits.  Not a classic, but good violent humor where
little children get punched out by Secret Service agents.  My type of film.

Title
Review for Peter's Friends (1992)
Not wanting to get into a full-blown review of the new British film
starring Hugh Laurie, Kenneth Branagh, Emma Thompson and Peter Fry (I
hope I have these names right), I have only a few notes:
 *  About halfway through the film, I thought, "I hate those films that
    center around a group of friends with all sorts of problems, who
    resolve their problems neatly and tidely by the end of the film."
    At the end of the film, I thought, "Gee, I wish all their problems
    had been resolved neatly and tidely at the end of the film."  My
    god, I *am* an American film-goer.  (However, there are some
    problems with this ending.)
 *  As one of those "where are we now" films, it is as witty as to meet
    (and pass by a bit) the minimum requirements for such a film.  The
    characters, with the exception of the American wife of Branagh's
    character, are pretty fully fleshed out -- it is variable. (It's
    odd to see Laurie in a film where he doesn't say "Whoops!" in a
    very loud voice.  Not to mention having Fry around him and not
    doing Jeeves.)  Branagh is competent, but not wonderful.
 *  One exception to the above statement:  Emma Thompson is *brilliant*.
    While other actors wait for their dialogue to fill in their
    character, Thompson manages to completely and totally describe the
    woman she's playing through body language.  Now there's your Best
    Actress nominee, kids -- forget Michelle Pfieffer.
 *  I find it interesting that scenes of social embarrassment make me
    want to crawl underneath my theater seat; but Ahnold turning a camp
    of [fill in your generic force of nasties here] doesn't even slow
    my hand for popcorn.  PETER'S FRIENDS is not very real to me in
    some aspects, and very real to me in others.
Uhhh ... you want to know whether to see it or not?  I got in free.
Well, let's just say that if you haven't seen HOWARD'S END yet this
year, go see that instead.  However, if it's this or THE DISTINGUISHED
GENTLEMAN (Our Motto: You Don't Need To Be A Psychic To Know Where This
Film Goes!), either go see PETER'S FRIENDS, or go to a rendition of
Handel's "Messiah."

Title
Review for High Season (1987)
Various films seen at the Seattle Film Festival:
SOUTH BANK SHOW: MICHAEL POWELL (Great Britain, 1986)
Director: David Hinton
     A pair of interesting filmmaker documentaries came along this week: one
about Michael Powell, half of "The Archers," the famous team of Powell &
Pressberger who dominated the British film industry during the 1940s and early
1950s, and influenced so many other British filmmakers.  Actually, this is more
of an autobiography: Powell was influential in much of the documentary's
appearance, which is sometimes as strange as many of Powell's films.  Powell,
in the film, refers to documentaries as films made by unemployed philosophers;
he apparently didn't want his own autobiography (of which this is only the
first part) to be too staid, so he often appears in his own film clips (ducking
bullets and fading to B&W) as he goes along.  The program is in video--it was
originally a BBC production, the first part of two parts (the second, sadly,
was never made due to Powell's recent death)--and is a bit strange, but it is
certainly entertaining, and worth a look if you're a fan of such wonderful
productions as THE LIFE AND DEATH OF COL. BLIMP, BLACK NARCISSUS, and THE RED
SHOES, or if you think that artists--people who truly adhere to artistic
values--don't exist in the cinema.  Powell is--was--a man who lived for his
ideals.
     The documentary on William Wyler is a bit more pedestrian; but then, Wyler
himself was an amazingly down-to-earth person.  The documentary, which
interviewed him several days before his death, showed a man who reminded me
more of my Grandpa Harry than a major film director.  Indeed, that seems to be
much of the message of the film; various major film luminaries, especially John
Huston and Lillian Hellmen, comment on how they often wondered where "Willie"
got his extraordinary feel for how a film would work.  He often did not seem to
know why a shot would work--but he would know WHEN it would work.  And shot
after shot of famous Wyler films--THE LETTER, THE BEST YEARS OF OUR LIVES, BEN
HUR, FUNNY GIRL, and a host of others--are definite proof that he knew exactly
what he was doing.  While it does get a little campy and glitzy during its
length, the time spent watching it is worth it for the clips alone.  Great
stuff.
HIGH SEASON (Great Britain, 1987)
Director: Clare Peploe
Writers: Clare Peploe, Mark Peploe
Cast: Jacqueline Bisset, James Fox, Irene Papas, Sebastian Shaw,
      Robert Stephens, Paris Tselios
     Not a good film, but certainly not a tangibly bad film.  HIGH SEASON gets
a "fair" all around--fair plot, fair dialogue, fair acting and very fair
weather--it's shot in the Greek Isles, and they are the real stars of the film.
Jaquelline Bisset and James Fox play an estranged couple (they argue about art)
who live in a small village on the Greek islands; their daughter spends time
with one or the other.  Bisset is having a difficult time supporting herself
and her daughter and her daughter's school fees; she plans to sell her small
house in the village.  An old friend, an elderly art expert, arranges the sale
of a Greek vase of hers to provide some monetary support.  In the meantime, we
have a spy subplot and a few romantic situations so that the middle of the film
resembles some sort of Aegean "Midsummer's Night Dream."  The spy theme gets
suddenly serious, which doesn't help things one bit.  As someone sitting next
to me said, "It's dross, but it's sunny Mediterranean dross, and it's raining
outside the theater".
COMIC MAGAZINE (Japan, 1987)
Director: Yojira Takita
Screenwriters: Yuya Uchida, Isao Takagi
Cast: Yuya Uchida, Yumi Asou, Beat Takeshi, Hiromi Go
     In America, we have a certain ideal of overboard press--the tabloids,
NATIONAL ENQUIRER, PEOPLE (okay, *I* think PEOPLE is no different than NATIONAL
ENQUIRER).  Apparently, the journalists in Japan make these publications look
like the LADIES' HOME JOURNAL in comparison.  This movie tells the story of a TV
journalist, raised on Woodward and Bernstein and wanting nothing more than to
do investigative reporting, who is working as the equivalent of a TV gossip
columnist.  He is extremely dedicated, and this makes him popular; but it also
leads him to do truly awful and ridiculous things: following celebrities
around, invading privacy, being incredibly insensitive to the pain of others.
As the film progresses, he becomes wearier and wearier of the Hell he creates
for others, and for himself, until he runs into the ultimate "media event...."
     Apparently, many of the events depicted in this film are based on true
events that happened in Japan recently, especially the culminating scene in
this film.  This is not a film that is fun or easy to watch, but it seems to be
working at making a point, and it does so very well.
     Grade: C if you'd like to see where the medium may be heading.  MAX
HEADROOM without the yoks.
MABOU MINES' DEAD END KIDS: A Story of Nuclear Power (U.S.A., 1986)
Director/Writer: JoAnne Akalatis
Cast: Mabou Mines Theater troupe
     Frankly, ATOMIC CAFE pretty much mined all the black humor to be had at
the expense of the nuclear insanity we live in; this film isn't that funny,
though the screenplay is skillful in the way it weaves images and symbols in
and out of the film.  But all in all, it was advertised as a black comedy, and
it tends to come out as some kind of apocalyptic high school science film.

Title
Review for Hoosiers (1986)
     HOOSIERS is the first sports movie since THE NATURAL that I've liked, and
maybe that's not surprising.  After ROCKY came out, there were about fifty
billion "sports underdog" films out, most of them pretty poor: track & field,
gymnastics, kung fu, even bowling.  But I've always found both basketball and
baseball to be the two "romantic" American sports--the two sports where a group
of people work together as a unit to accomplish a goal, where the disparate
personalities are fused into a team.  Baseball tends to be also blend in a
generous touch of nostalgia; basketball, with its speed and precision, is the
other.  Football (to me) is just too hyped and too violent to qualify for the
designation.  But I digress...
     This is a beautiful film to watch.  David Anspaugh directs, and if I
remember correctly, he has been responsible for some of the best TV of the last
decade.  I particularly remember an old "Lou Grant" episode that (I believe)
Anspaugh was involved with, where Lou returns home to a small mid-western town
for a relative's funeral.  The show had atmosphere, and Anspaugh has brought it
back threefold for HOOSIERS.  The overcast skies, the tree-lined streets, the
leaves over everything; the small high school.  Anspaugh's eye for detail sets
the stage perfectly for the story.
     The story isn't anything new: a new basketball coach (Gene Hackman)
arrives in a very small Indiana town, Hickory, in the early 50's, and begins to
mold a champion high school basketball team despite a variety of obstacles,
including his own rather mysterious past.  A phenomenally gifted boy who is
being pressured to play; a young teacher (Barbera Hershey) who resents the
importance of basketball; a colorful drunkard (Dennis Hopper, in a delightful
role) who Hackman wants as an assistant coach, despite the differences between
Hopper and his son, who is on the team; and the inevitable Monday Morning
Quarterbacks who played basketball as boys and think the coach is screwing up.
Almost all of these subplots work; what they lack in originality they make up
in the skill in which they are resolved.  The only thing I found somewhat
awkward was Hershey's rather sudden romance with Hackman, but that is a minor
detail.  The story keeps you interested throughout, and while the conclusion
could well be anti-climatic, even this seems to fit in well with the story.
Hackman's conflict between playing the game to win, and playing the game for
sake of playing, seems to be the real dramatic theme of the film, and when it
is resolved, you tend to worry a lot less about who wins The Big Game--it's not
whether you win, but how you play.
     Certainly next to Anspaugh's name on the kudos list must be Hackman.
Someone once said that Gene Hackman was the only actor he'd ever seen who looks
like you could invite him over for a beer, and enjoy the experience.  I can't
think of another actor today who has the skills AND looks enough like a
basketball coach to pull this off.  Hackman doesn't surprise me in doing
it--he's done too much good work--but he certainly deserves credit all the
same.  The actors playing the basketball players also deserve credit, because
not once did I think of them as anything but high school basketball players and
small town kids, to boot.  It is another factor that makes the illusion of
Hickory almost seamless.  Dennis Hopper adds just the right touch of
eccentricity and humor to the film, though his scene with his character's son
deserves credit; I don't think I'd argue with his Academy Award nomination for
this film (though many friends have told me he really deserved something for
BLUE VELVET).  And finally, Jerry Goldsmith turns in another award-winning
score.  Horner is derivative, Rozsa hardly does anything any more, and John
Williams seems to have burned out; but Jerry Goldsmith has turned out original,
effective and memorable scores for the last thirty years.  Here's hoping he
(and we) will have thirty more years of his work.
     A substantively entertaining movie--perfect for a rainy afternoon.

Title
Review for Tokyo Pop (1988)
     SYNOPSIS: We have the tale of a young woman from L.A., attempting to break
into rock singing, who decides to visit a friend in Japan when she hears that
they love American rock 'n roll there.  Upon arriving, she finds that her
friend has left and that she must break into show biz on her own.  On the way,
she meets a (barely) English-speaking lead singer for a band trying to get a
hit.  They're looking for a gaijin singer as a "gimmick" to take them to
stardom, but then she and he start to get interested in one another...do I
have to spell it out, gang?  This is a USDA-approved romantic comedy.
     TOKYO POP is one of those two-handed films.  On the one hand....  Carrie
Hamilton has got a lot of screen appeal, and it works through most of the film.
Yutaka Tadokoro plays the lead singer in a very likable manner; he is able to
switch between a rather shy manner around Hamilton and a typical rocker with
the rest of his band.  The film makes some interesting points about the
fleeting nature of media fame, both in Japan and the United States.  And you
feel fairly good when you leave the theater.
     On the other hand....  It all gets just too precious at points.  If you
can't figure out what the wrap-up is a half-hour before the end of the show, go
hit the Video Palace and check out every other Lover/Rocker films.  There's not
much subtlety here (though the camerawork's good), and it needs it.  There is
also a *lot* of mugging in this film: by Hamilton (it appears that both Carol
Burnett and Martin Sheen have somehow begot physical clones of themselves); by
Tadokoro (his puppy-dog act at points is just too likeable; he gets downright
plush, like a Gund doll); and by the film, where the camera stays a bit too
long on Americanized Japanese, as if it was playing to the American audiences
specifically.  Perhaps this isn't "strictly" a foreign film (it was co-
produced in America...it uses sub-titles when needed), but I like to think
that a director is making comments about his country and his culture from his
own perceptions, and not pandering to the tastes of a market outside his
country.  Though I suppose it could be argued that directors here pander to
markets *in* our own country.  So much for that argument...
     Anyway, a good $3.50 movie, but I wonder about authenticity.
     PS to rec.arts.comics readers:  Chris Claremont would *love* this movie.
His tongue would fall out, he'd roll over on his back and drool uncontrollably
over his beard.  Then he'd make both characters mutants and put them in next
month's X-MEN.

Title
Review for Witches, The (1990)
THE WITCHES (1990, Great Britain)
Director: Nicolas Roeg
Screenwriter: Allan Scott, based on the book by Roald Dahl
Cast: Angelica Huston, Mai Zetterling, Jasen Fisher, Rowan Atkinson,
      Bill Paterson, Jane Horrocks
     Kid's films aren't what they used to be when I was a kid.  Thank
God.  Outside of one or two of the better Disneys, they were generally
populated by idiot adults, moronic plots and the general concept that
Kids Enjoy Stupid Humor.  Nothing was even vaguely frightening in one of
these; Joe Flynn dressed up in a sheet was about their level.  One of
the great pleasures one can glean from ESCAPE FROM NEW YORK is
remembering Kurt Russell in THE COMPUTER WORE TENNIS SHOES whenever
Snake Pliskin appears on the screen.  The only kids film I can remember
that seemed even moderately horrible was WILLY WONKA AND THE CHOCOLATE
FACTORY, where the producers seem to have gotten in the spirit of Roald
Dahl's story fully.  The British seem to have more of a propensity for
darker children's stories than American film-makers.
     Somewhere along the line, though, the Brits' method became more
popular.  While cutesy-poo still dominates Saturday Mornings, there is a
breed of kids films out today which are darker, more sardonic, and more
importantly, intended to entertain adults as well as children.  Terry
Gilliam's less serious films (TIME BANDITS and THE ADVENTURES OF BARON
MUNCHAUSEN (sp?))  sort of set the standard in this category (arguably,
neither *are* children's films); THE DARK CRYSTAL and LABYRINTH, while
not as enjoyable to an adult audience, had their moments of real tension
and evil as well.  While each is built around a children's
point-of-view, more or less, the saccharine has been sucked right out of
the marrow, and you get a funnier, nastier, somewhat more edgy product
in the end.
     THE WITCHES is a fine addition to this sort of film, and given the
people involved, I'm not at all surprised.  First of all, the screenplay
is based on a book by Roald Dahl, a man who encapsulates the ability to
walk the line between spooky and silly.  Secondly, the late Jim Henson
was the executive producer, and he had shown the inclination in the past
to go beyond the niceties of SESAME STREET and THE MUPPET MOVIE and toss
a bit of darkness into the pot.  Finally, completely out of left field,
Nicolas Roeg directs, thus adding a wildcard factor into the whole thing
-- Roeg is one of the most unpredictable directors around today, both in
choice of subject matter and general quality of output.
     The opening of the film is marvelously spooky -- a young boy named
Luke is being warned by his grandmother about witches.  Various
attributes of witches are recounted (they have funny eyes, their hands
are always hidden in gloves, and children smell like dog droppings to
them.)  She also recounts a story from her childhood about a girl who is
taken by witches.  The boy is impressed (stogie-smoking Norwegian
grandmothers tell stories effectively); luckily for him, because later
in the film, he meets up with a whole mess of them -- including the
Grand High Witch, played to the hilt by Angelica Huston, who is really
getting *sick* of the smell of dogs droppings everywhere...  and has a
plan to make that particular problem...  smaller...
     The film is very enjoyable, though it never quite coalesces
together.  The individual elements work: the actors are fine (Huston,
Mai Zetterling as the grandmother, Jasen Fisher as Luke, Bill Paterson
in his typical overbearing style; only Rowan Atkinson seems a bit
underplayed, but after THE BLACK ADDER, he'd look underplayed as the
lead in DIE HARD); the script, which keeps the whimsey and the
wickedness in equal measure, and has that great rarity, a kid's outlook,
in the forefront throughout; and the special effects by Henson studios,
which has some of the most amazing puppetry I've seen in years.
("You'll Believe A Mouse Can Talk".)  
     The weak spot is the combinations of the elements, i.e., Roeg, and
also some of the camera-work.  The cinematography tends to be very
frenetic -- often reminding you of the "on-the-spot" style in HILL
STREET BLUES -- and the special effects shots are refreshing in their
comparative smoothness when they appear.  Also, the Halloween-ish feel
of the first part of the movie gives way to a busier, more
action-oriented ending where a lot of the atmosphere is traded for
comedy.  (Much of it rather gross humor -- the kind that kids *really*
enjoy.)  Given a choice, I prefer atmosphere, but the film has an
interesting ending and it only really loses steam for about 8 minutes in
the middle.  
     Not a great film, but a fun one, and certainly a notable entry to
the films that Jim Henson leaves behind him.  It might scare really
young kids at points; and if you have qualms about violence against
witches, be warned that they go beyond attacks with buckets of water in
this film.  Eight-year-olds, however, will eat it up, and their parents
will find it equally enjoyable, if for different reasons.

Title
Review for High Spirits (1988)
     Short-take of my reaction to HIGH SPIRITS:  Staggering out from the
theater in exaggerated Peter O'Toole shambling walk, opening eyes in terror and
going "OH  MY  *GOD*!"  in the best O'Toole-ian tones.  Talk about wretched
refuse.
     The story of this film (about a castle run by O'Toole which is about to be
moved to the United States unless O'Toole can turn it into a successful
"haunted" hotel) splits down the middle, the first half being O'Toole and Irish
cronies trying to convince the tourists that the house is haunted with *very*
*bad* slapstick.  The second half is where one of the tourists, Steve
Guttenberg (surprise, surprise), discovers a real ghost (Darryl Hannah) and
promptly falls in love with her.  The script at this point makes no sense
whatsoever, pulling scenes from previous ghost films as some type of precedent
for what happens here.  It's awful, and I mean AWFUL -- my review of SCROOGED
is going to be bad, but I laughed at that.  There wasn't one single solitary
laugh in HIGH SPIRITS, not *one*.  A complete waste of my money.
     Not to mention a waste of talent, as three very talented (at least, in
previous films) people worked on this:
     1)  O'Toole, who has done crap before (anyone remember SUPERGIRL?), but
whose performances of genius (THE STUNT MAN, THE LION IN WINTER) excuse him --
at least until he does a PORKY'S sequel.  This is close to the limit, though.
     3)  Neil Jordan, the director/writer.  OK, reality check: have I read the
credits to HIGH SPIRITS incorrectly?  Neil Jordan is the director/co-writer of
the brilliant MONA LISA a few years ago.  What happened since then?  Complete
mental collapse?  HIGH SPIRITS gives one the feeling that he gave up by the
time shooting began.
     PS)  Not under the heading of "waste of talent," but have you wondered if
Steve Guttenberg ever says "No" to any part he's offered?  Or is he just listed
by Actor's Equity as "generic amiable dolt"?

Title
Review for Unbearable Lightness of Being, The (1988)
Quick three film reviews, so I can start up on the Seattle Film Festival (yes,
here we go again -- a pre-festival report will be out before the Thursday night
starting gun).
Not much to say other than very entertaining film and a few comments:
    Noticed the poster as I went out -- this film is the first film in years
    that had everyone who had the entire solarsphere of critics behind it.
    Siskel & Ebert, Reed, NEW YORK TIMES, the L.A. paper, TIME, NEWSWEEK,
    VILLAGE VOICE, and (I believe) a favorable quote from Kael.  When did
    this last happen?  GONE WITH THE WIND?  (Waters would love that on his
    ad -- "The first film to gather universal praise since GONE WITH THE
    WIND!").  And David O. Selznick never had to overcome having shot
    someone eating dog doo...
    Basically, this is the same as one of those Kurt Russell Disney films
    where the school outcasts have good things happen to them with a minimum
    of struggle in a Happy Environment.  Except that these people are
    outcast which ol' Walt would never have approved of (let's face it --
    Kurt Russell an outcast?  ESCAPE FROM NEW YORK, maybe, but he had
    Adrienne Barbeau...).  And, more importantly, Water's never loses his
    spoofing, satirical bite -- in fact, it runs concurrently with the
    starry-eyed plot, neither stealing cycles from the other.
A solid $4.50 film.  Take the kids, they'll love it (the 10-year-olds in the
audience were really enjoying it, and I'd deem everything in this film
wholesome for 10-year-olds, or even 6-year-olds).
So this is what all the hoopla is about.  Well, it's a good film; my main
observation would be that the best part of the thing was John Lone's
performance as the Emperor, and that's the one thing the film didn't get
nominated for (which keeps my opinion of the awards at it's previously low
level).  Nice ending, but rather bloodless for an epic.  You can either do an
epic without involving interesting characters intelligently or ridiculously,
but it needs to be pervaded with an overpowering sense of the
Larger-than-Life.  A little schmaltz doesn't hurt, either -- yeah, I liked
DR. ZHIVAGO.
Again, a nice ending.  $2.50 film, see it on Economy Hour.
This is one of those films that becomes manically annoying during its length,
but leaves you with a favorable impression because the ending is good enough to
wipe out what came before.  It's one of those love stories which follows the
lives of several characters over a period of years.  It works, but it has
drawbacks.  Daniel Day Lewis (what *has* this man played in before?  His face
looks very familiar -- oh, wait, I know, MY BEAUTIFUL LAUNDRETTE) and the
actress who plays his lover tend to be rather hollow through much of the film.
The actress who plays his wife, though, comes off very well, and damn near
saves the film during the last half-hour.  Good parts: their early encounters,
the invasion of Czechoslovakia, their return, the move to the farm (I have
great affection for merry older rural people.  And pigs.)  Bad points: Day and
his character's lover's affairs, the photo-session scene.
Two Points:  Why is this film considered more "sexually honest" than others?  I
keep hearing that from all sorts of newspaper reviews.  What, every guy is out
boinking a lover while his wife sits home and suffers?  They squeal more
realistically during intercourse in this film?  I guess film journalists live
fairly Bohemian lives...
And... do you think that the Czech couple really die in the end?  Or is it
that Day's character, in his typically egocentric manner, is day-dreaming
about his lover's reaction to news of their death?  I go for the former, but
either way, it's a damn inventive way to end the film, and very satisfying.

Title
Review for Himmel über Berlin, Der (1987)
See at the Seattle Film Festival:
WINGS OF DESIRE (West Germany, 1987)
Director: Wim Wenders
Screenwriters: Wim Wenders and Peter Handke
Cast: Bruno Ganz, Solveig Dommartin, Peter Falk, Otto Sander
     I see a lot of films -- particularly at the Festival -- which try to
induce a surrealistic, dream-like state upon the viewer.  Very few of them come
close to succeeding.  WINGS OF DESIRE is 2 hours and 10 minutes long, and for
85% of that time its attempts to lull me into such a state were entirely
engrossing and stimulating.  This is a lyrical film: lyrical in its story, its
photography,  and in particular the original conception of its setting.
Wenders portrays divine characters in a manner that is extremely innovative, at
least to film, and when he lays out his world before us, divided into earthly
and ethereal halves, it is a new world.
     The film opens up with East and West Germany below us, in black and white.
We see an angel (Ganz) looking down on the city; he has wings, but they
disappear, and he floats through the city, intercepting the thoughts of people
all over the city.  Only an occasional rare child actually notices that he is
there.  The by-play of the voices and the "floating" camera is excellent; you
let it wash over you, and it is quite an experience.  Eventually, he meets and
talks to another angel (Sander) about his experiences, and how he yearns to be
human and sample what humans feel, in particular the actual progression of
time, which immortals cannot feel.  Angels all wear long coats, have pony
tails, and while they cannot interfere in what happens, their presence
(particularly their touch) can bring hope and health back to their spirits.
     After this point, the film begins to rotate around three other characters.
One, and old man, is observed by both Sander and Ganz; he is a survivor of the
Holocaust, and is often thinking back on it, and what it means about humanity
as a whole.  The second is a circus aerialist (Dommartin), a sad, beautiful
girl who loves her trapeze work but is lonely, and who Ganz falls in love with
(she senses his presence somehow, though not explicitly).  The final one is a
kick: Peter Falk, playing Peter Falk (he's shooting a detective/WW II movie in
Berlin).  He really *does* sense Ganz's presence, and for good reason, too --
he's a former angel who decided to become human years ago (to play Columbo, I
guess).  It's a delightfully strange performance, and Falk gives Ganz the
courage he needs for the final plunge: humanity.
     The film ends concentrating on Ganz and Dommartin; both Falk and the old
man are phased out (it's a bit annoying, but not very).  It also gets a bit too
longer here -- there's about twenty minutes here that could be trimmed without
anything being hurt (the bar scene, for those of you who've seen it).  But it's
a wonderful love story, the kind of dreamy, philosophically-drenched romance I
dote on, and it's one of the two best films I saw at this year's festival.
Ganz is excellent; the man has the kind of gentle, old-wise-innocent face an
angel would have; Dommartin is excellent at the subject of his love; Falk is
the occasional kick-in-the-butt the film needs for plot advancement -- and
besides, he's damn fun to watch.
     I should point out, though, that you shouldn't expect to be seeing a
"romance" or a "comedy" or anything of that sort.  I'd put it down as more of a
surreal experience, very pleasant and not at all disorienting, combined with
romantic and philosophical elements.  If that sounds at all appealing (for a
little over two hours), I strongly suspect you won't want to miss the film.
Technically, the film is marvelous; why I don't understand all of the changes
from B&W to color and back, they fit in with the feel of WINGS OF DESIRE.  The
script is very good; Wenders' and Handke's ideas for what angels talk about
(and listen to) is delightful (Stanley Kauffmann of THE NEW REPUBLIC said this
is one of the few scripts he'd almost prefer reading than watching).  Overall,
it could use a little more editing at the end; but a success all around, I
think.
     Rating: Not for everyone, but if the synopsis above sounds appealing , you
definitely should not miss it.

Title
Review for Coming Up Roses (1986)
     This is certainly one of the more unusual films to come along during the
festival--a foreign language film shot in the heart of England.  In other
words, the film is about a community in Wales, and (properly) the actors speak
in Welsh, with English subtitles.  The story is reminiscent of the older Ealing
comedies of the 1950s--it has the uniquely British low-key humor that permeated
so many of Alec Guinness's and Peter Sellers's early films.  It tells the story
of the employees of an old movie theatre, the last of five in a Welsh mining
village that is slowly dying from lack of work.  The elderly owner is forced to
sell it to a holding company, and the projectionist, a wonderfully honest
character who has never wanted to do anything but show movies, is forced to
find work elsewhere, along with the plucky concessions woman.  As they both
vainly try to find a job that they think is responsible, and watch their hopes
of seeing the theatre refurbished and returned to its former glory die, they
become more morose, until they come up with a scheme involving the vacant
theatre with what they hope will allow them to make an "honorable living."
This, a budding romance, some of the unlikeliest people you could mention, and
the old theatre owner's last wish make for an excellent bit of drollery which
fans of films like A PRIVATE FUNCTION should enjoy.
     The director of the film appeared afterwards, and I admit that I enjoyed
his discussion of the making of the film almost as much as the film itself.  It
turns out that the theatre that they used for the film was, in fact, abandoned
and about to be torn down--it had been bought by the local bingo parlor so that
it wouldn't provide competition.  However, members of the town, in conjunction
with the director, came together to get the theatre restored, and it is back in
business, providing entertainment for a community where economic depression is
a way of life.  It is the first film ever made in Welsh, a project initiated by
a government grant to create television and films for the Welsh audience.  He
wanted to make a film that reflected the "Welsh 'toughness of spirit'" that
keeps their dignity and sense of humor in the face of intimidating day-to-day
living conditions.  In that, I think he has succeeded; this is both an amusing
and affectionate tribute to this country.
     GRADE: B for British understated humor buffs; may be less appealing to
those who prefer Benny Hill to Bill Forsythe.

Title
Review for Story of Temple Drake, The (1933)
The following two films were shown in William K. Everson's "Hollywood and the
Code" series at the Seattle International Film Festival.
THE STORY OF TEMPLE DRAKE (USA, 1933)
Director: Stephen Roberts
Cast: Miriam Hopkins, Jack LaRue, William Gargan
NIGHT NURSE (USA, 1931)
Director: William Wellman
Cast: Barbara Stanwyck, Clark Gable, Joan Blondell, Ben Lyon,
      Charlotte Merriam, Charles Winninger
     THE STORY OF TEMPLE DRAKE was used by Everson to illustrate the problems
of adapting a work that dealt with material considered too risque for the
times.  While previous films examined in this series had added elements of sex
and violence to attract audiences, TEMPLE DRAKE is a film which contains these
elements but doesn't attempting to pander to the public.  For years, several
people at Paramount had wanted to film William Faulkner's short story
"Sanctuary";  however, it was always considered an impossibility, as the
subject matter (a young southern girl who is raped and then abducted by a hood)
was considered way too touchy for that period.  Finally, after much cajoling,
Paramount was able to get it made.  It has the texture of a Warner's crime
drama in many several senses; and much is hinted at, rather than explicitly
shown -- the actual rape scene is basically communicated by a candle
approaching Drake's bed and a scream.  It also has more of a social conscious
than most films of the times; the hero of the film (a public defender in a
small Southern town) is defending blacks before the imperious Judge Drake,
Temple's grandfather.  The Judge's continuing ideas of "Southern classes" are
seen as generally corroding his daughter and his community towards the end.
     Ironically, the film raised little controversy, because the publicity was
fairly non-exploitive in theme.  However, it was one of the last films of its
type to make it through the Hollywood studio system until the loosening of the
code in 1938.
     NIGHT NURSE was one of the other films that Everson had listed as being
most instrumental in the institution of the code (with a title like NIGHT
NURSE, you might guess that this isn't exactly MY BRILLIANT CAREER).  Barbara
Stanwyck becomes a nurse trainee in a local hospital, where the doctors and
nurses all seem pretty cynical (these people make St. Elsewhere look like a
paradise).  She teams up with another trainee, Blondell, who wants to use her
position as a nurse to find some rich old patient to marry.  She also befriends
one of the nicest bootleggers I've ever seen in the movies, a chap who looks
like he sells magazines to get through State U., except that he meets Stanwyck
to have a bullet removed from his arm.  Guy just radiates boy-next-door charm,
and we can tell that these two are made for each other.
     After nurse graduation (or whatever the hell they call it), the two women
take a job nursing a pair of children who, as it turns out, are being starved
to death.  Their mother, a rich alcoholic, is being seduced by her evil
chauffeur (played by Clark Gable, dressed like Kato); he plans to scrag the
kids and marry their mother, so that he can get all the money; also, he
probably knows that the lovable tykes will laugh at how his ears stick out.
Gable has arranged for the kids' doctor to be a drug-addicted surgeon (we know
this because he twitches like a fiend), who confines the little girls to their
room without food.  The children look remarkably healthy, by the way, except
that they swoon every five minutes from hunger.  Stanwyck, of course, won't
stand for it, and after haggling with a decent doctor at the hospital to skip
ethics (rather like Jack Klugman as Quincy, but with better legs), she gets him
to come in and save the girl.  Gable tries to put a stop to it, but Stanwyck's
boyish mobster gets the drop on him and makes fun of his ears.  The girls are
fine, the quack doctor brought up on charges, and Gable apparently goes for "a
ride."  The last scene is Stanwyck and boyfriend driving off into the sunset
("So, honey, who would you like me to rub out next?")
     It was something of an exploitation film -- "extremely tawdry," in
Everson's best British accent; the really isn't a *really* sympathetic
character outside of Stanwyck, though by today's standards the bootlegger would
be a saint, compared to Chuck Norris or Dirty Harry.  Blondell and Stanwyck
spend an inordinate amount of time in their lingerie.  Gable punches Stanwyck
(I mean *punches*...  bloody nose and everything.  I expected to see her lay
him out, as she is definitely the toughest character in the cast...).  All in
all, this would almost be worth watching for unintentional laughs, and Stanwyck
(of course) holds your attention.

Title
Review for Do the Right Thing (1989)
     After having watched SHE'S GOTTA HAVE IT and SCHOOL DAZE, getting me to go
see a Spike Lee movie isn't particularly difficult.  Any writer and/or director
who can spin characters such as his during the length of a film gets attention,
because, gang, there ain't many out there who can.  What Lee has done with DO
THE RIGHT THING is to jump yet another notch up in my estimation: he's using
his abilities at characterization to examine the personalities and emotions in
a neighborhood which lead to a violent incident -- the kind of complex event
that is so often explained away with a simplistic rationalization or off-hand
prejudice.  By spending a day with each person, and detailing each of their
personalities (and their relations with one another) in such detail, we come to
understand why and how they get to the state their in by the end of the film;
and, in turn, to be caught up in the intensity of the conflagration that
engulfs them.
     It's not a new concept in film, to be sure, but it rarely done this well;
trying to center on these many people, and build complete characters out of
them by the end of the film, is a monumental task for a writer or a director,
because by the end of DO THE RIGHT THING, it's absolutely necessary to
understand where these people are coming from, or the whole film doesn't work.
Lee make it work.  Some characters are more in focus than others, but no one is
a stereotype or a cardboard reactionary, with the exception of the local police
officers.  However, the film is about the people in the neighborhood, not the
police; the police's purpose is a plot device, a catalyst to the community's
feelings -- their individual feelings, and their individual actions.
     This is also one of those films where script and direction are so
on-target that it's difficult to gauge the quality of the actors; suffice it to
say that no one gives their role less than it's due.  I imagine I'd give credit
to Lee and Danny Aiello as Mookie and Sal in particular, as they have two of
the most complex roles to deal with; but several of the other actors score deep
marks by the end of the film, in particular the actor who plays Radio Raheem.
As striking (if not more so) than any individual performance is the photography
and editing in DO THE RIGHT THING; often the way a person is photographed tells
us as much about their thoughts as their expression or their dialogue.  It
becomes very difficult towards the end to remember that there's a screen
between the audience and the characters; that familiar, comfortable barrier is
broken down by Spike Lee by the end of this film.  This is not a film where
you'll walk out and switch back to what you were doing before you entered the
theater; it required a cooling-down period and a good deal of reflection (and
conversation) in my case.
     A brief side note: from some of the net traffic, it appears that a number
of people see the film as "promoting racism", or excusing racial violence, or
something of that nature.  I can't see it.  Lee presents a number of
points-of-view, and allows us to understand why each individual feels the way
they do during the length of the film.  As for justifying any particular
viewpoint, I must have missed it (other than "racism is bad").  The only thing
that confused me were the quotes by Martin Luther King and Malcolm X at the
end.  The person I went to see it with suggested something that appeals to me,
however: that these two differing views of the use of violence in regards to
racism, simple in the axiomatic nature, are contrasted with the complex
situation and feelings that confront the members of the block in
Bedford-Stuyvesant.  The only person who clings to these viewpoints through the
film is Smiley, who appears to be simple; the Mayor, arguably the most
sympathetic character in the film (to me, anyway) has a hazy, less clear-cut
philosophy that provides no easy instruction: Do the Right Thing.  Humans
follow ideals, but they live with what they run into in life.  The Mayor, and
the title of the film, deal with this type of situation: no easy situations or
answers, but the necessity of Doing the Right Thing is underlined.

Title
Review for Da (1988)
     Martin Sheen's character is a popular New York playwright in the middle of
preparations for an opening night performance.  One morning, he receives a
long-distance call from Ireland; his father, affectionately named "Da" by
Sheen, has died.  Sheen flies back to attend the wake and take care of
arranging his father's business affairs.  Then, in a rather matter-of-fact
manner, Sheen begins to see his deceased rapscallion of a father (Hughes)
wandering around the house.  The rest of the film is taken up with
conversations between Hughes and Sheen; sometimes there are flashbacks,
sometimes Sheen appears (and converses) with his earlier self.  It's basically
a stage play adapted to film (very well, mind you) where two men become
familiar with one another after many years, even though one of them is dead.
     On a film like this, you have to grade on acting and script, because plot
is really not there for the majority of DA -- it's just two men talking.  And
the script is good, though not particularly funny or touching.  It's
comfortable: you can watch it and have your attention held, but it leaves
plenty of room on the back burner of the brain for other things.  Hughes'
acting is rather like that, too: comfortable.  He's playing the old Irish
rapscallion with just the right amount of blarney; he never really tries to be
more than a codger.  Sheen, on the other hand, has to attempt jumping from an
adult to a sometimes-reminiscing child in an adult's body; he doesn't do very
well with the latter.  The really standout performance is William Hickey as a
financier in the village who took young Sheen under his arm, and was a marked
contrast from Sheen's anarchist father; Hickey also gets all the best lines
(with his scratchy voice and shrunken face, he walks off with some wonderful
bits during his short appearances).
     But generally, you're left with Hughes and Sheen, and while that isn't
objectionable, it isn't enough.  Rating: Not bad, but I'd rather wait for it
appear on TV, and even then I think I'd read a book instead.

Title
Review for Licence to Kill (1989)
     Pity me: I began going to see James Bond pictures right when Roger Moore
took over the part.  I didn't find out quite what I'd been missing until the
Guild Theater in Portland began running the entire series twice a year (one of
the few theaters with class enough to serve Vanilla Cokes), and I got a chance
to see DR. NO, FROM RUSSIA WITH LOVE, and GOLDFINGER.  I would admit that
there were other non-Connery Bond films I enjoyed (ON HER MAJESTY'S SECRET
SERVICE is a favorite, for Diana Rigg if nothing else, and FOR YOUR EYES ONLY
seemed to *want* to go back to an espionage storyline), but in general, trips
to a new Bond picture were saved until everything else of interest had been
seen, accompanied by an air of resignation that was usually fully justified.
When Timothy Dalton took over as the new Bond, I couldn't have been more
pleased; while THE LIVING DAYLIGHTS dragged a bit at the end and had
exceptionally weak villains, the first half was everything I could want from a
Bond picture.  When I heard that LICENCE TO KILL would have a script written
for specifically for Dalton (THE LIVING DAYLIGHTS had been written with Moore
in mind), I was even more hopeful that we were heading back towards the good
ol' Bonds.
     Well, we've still got a ways to go, but things continue to look up.
LICENCE TO KILL has several strong points: some depth to Bond, some interesting
companions, a strong villain, some *real* suspense (find some of *that* in a
Moore Bonder!), and some opportunities for Dalton to stretch in the role.  The
problems with the film can generally be summed up by changing the instances of
"some" in the last sentence to "more."  There's still too much emphasis on
stunts and not enough on characterization, suspense and movie espionage.  (As
opposed to "real espionage," e.g., LeCarre.)   LICENCE TO KILL is a tantalizing
film, because you can hear the motor revving up during its entire length --
it's just that the engine never seems to catch.
     The film concentrates on Bond on a mission of revenge, and Dalton does a
good job with this: his obsessive drive to avenge a murder occasionally clouds
his normally cool judgment, and he has to depend on the help of several friends
to survive (a very nice touch).  Dalton continues to play Bond as the
professional of DAYLIGHTS (this is a Bond who is an assassin, and he works like
one -- the double-oh licence is not for show); unfortunately, the script
centers on Bond's obsession so completely that he's still fairly one-note.  I
kept feeling that John Glen, Michael Wilson and Richard Maibaum needed to be
violently jarred during this film and told to tone down the stunts and keep the
plot beefed up.  Things get too loose before the final stunt/battle sequence
(which is admittedly a doozy).
     Other actors: Robert Davi, who's played villains for years, seems to
really be picking only the cream of the crop for Bad Guy roles these days:
Sanchez in LICENCE, and the Jersey don in the current WISEGUY arc.  He's not a
Gert Frobe or a Klaus Maria Brandauer, but he does a nice job with it.  (I
really wished the script filled in his character a bit.)  It's a bit much to
swallow underground cities of SPECTRE agents and island retreats with private
armies these days; a South American drug kingpin has the same general
capabilities, and a touch of realism to boot.  Carey Lowell is excellent as
Bond's lover/accomplice; it's a little much to see her get teary when someone
else kisses James after she's held her own in a bar fight, but that's why the
phrase "artistic license" was invented (also "Bond Women").  Anthony Zerbe
plays a variation of all those flunky roles he used to play in Quinn-Martin TV
series.  David Hedison makes Bond movie history as the only man to play Felix
Leiter twice -- a real first.  (He also played Leiter in LIVE AND LET DIE.)
Too bad he didn't have the Flying Sub in the opening sequence....  The rest of
the actors are no great shakes, with the exception of Q, who doesn't overplay
the role too badly this time.  (Ah, hell, all of us engineers love him anyway.
We'd all like his job.)  And while we're at it, whose idea was it to stick
Wayne Newton in here?  "Bless your heart," my ass....
     Overall, I found LICENCE TO KILL to be a good deal like THE LIVING
DAYLIGHTS: strong start, but weak towards the end.  Fully entertaining enough,
though, and better than any of the Moore Bonds.  Keep Glen & company under
tighter control next time out, and let's have some more meat to the plot; these
guys show promise for producing a Classic Bond in the future that could stand
up to the Big Three.

Title
Review for Field of Dreams (1989)
Summary: The Best Film of the Year (so far)
     No, I'm not a baseball fan, and yes, maybe this film is a bit too Utopian
for some of you.  That's your problem.  There is no film I've seen this year
that I've enjoyed more than FIELD OF DREAMS; it combines an absolute sterling
story and script with excellent performances, and I enjoyed the living
daylights out of it.
     First the story -- and don't worry, I'd feel criminal if I gave anything
away.  All I'll say is that it's about a novice farmer in Iowa who hears voices
in his cornfield, and it weaves heaven, nature and baseball in and out of one
of the most graceful plot designs I've seen placed on the screen.  I can tell
you what it has in it, though.  It's got a basic plot that twirls around on
about 6 different axes, each independent but linked to the others, each
beautiful in its own right, each culminating in a resolution (actually, the
same resolution) and each catching me completely off-guard when it touched
down.  It has characters who get their personalities across in about three
minutes (aided by some very skillful actors); I found them uncommonly easy to
laugh with and impossible to forget.  It contains some of the most beautiful
images I can remember, looked for in a place few others would give a second
glance to.  And it has more imagination and creativity than any fifteen films
out there today.
     The actors uniformly absorb the spirit of their characters and literally
radiate them out.  I kept wondering if Costner's role in BULL DURHAM would
slide over to FIELD OF DREAMS, on my part or on his.  It doesn't; he is a
character the others react to, and when he finally has the spotlight... well,
it's a fine thing to see, a fine thing.  Amy Madigan has *never* been better;
she juices her role into three-dimensionality in about thirty seconds.  A
delight!  James Earl Jones is absolutely a pleasure to watch; his unrolling of
his character from the tight, cynical ball it arrives in was a pleasure in
itself.  The players are all good, especially Ray Liota as Shoeless Joe
(certainly a change in roles for him), and Burt Lancaster is himself, which
should be enough.  Only the guy from "thirty-something" seemed stuck in a rather
deadpan manner as the heavy, but that's really having to scratch at the dirt
for criticisms.
     This is a picture of dreams, of images, of men fading into the shadowed
green of a cornfield, and of white spheres fading into the dusk beyond the
lights.  It's romantic, and hopeful and it believes in magic and family and
baseball.  And probably Mom.  I don't know about apple pie, but I'll give it
the benefit of the doubt.

Title
Review for Alien Nation (1988)
     First of all, you should go into ALIEN NATION knowing that this really
isn't a science fiction picture per se.  It's a "partner" cop movie (my god,
we've had enough of these things to actually give it a genre) with science
fiction elements, most of which are used for either a) humor, b) social
commentary or c) the rather contrived finale.
     Anyway, if you view it as a "partners" movie, I think it works pretty
well.  50% of a such a film depends on the chemistry between the partners, and
between James Caan and Mandy Patinkin, the chemistry is there.  Both create
characters who are complex (and in Caan's case, not particularly likable), yet
who mesh very well towards the end.  Caan may be crude and bigoted (at least at
the beginning of the film) as a police detective who's partner is killed by a
criminal who is also an alien -- aliens landed sometime in 1988 (the film takes
place in 1991, and much of the humor takes place from near-future jokes),
refugees from a slave world, and were integrated into society.  Patinkin
(recognizable only by his voice -- I've been listening to music from SUNDAY IN
THE PARK WITH GEORGE) plays the first alien to make it to the grade of
detective is partnered with Caan, who wants his help in tracking down his
ex-partner's killers.  He nicknames Patinkin's character "George" (an in-joke
to Patinkin's musical role, I'd bet), since the indoctrination site gave him
the name "Sam Francisco", and you can guess what happens next: in the course of
the investigation, they gain grudging respect for one another, become friends
and eventually, partners.  Patinkin's gentle sense of humor, his immigrant's
love of America (to the aliens, America truly is a land of freedom), and his
outrage as the plot unfolds, endears him both to us and to Caan.  These guys
work so well together, I'd like to see them in a sequel with a somewhat better
plot.
     The plot is, really, cops vs. drug kingpins.  Frankly, I usually find
drug kingpins rather tired, overworked villains, but Rockne O'Bannon (the
screenwriter) makes them, and the drug they sell, repugnant through Patinkin's
reactions and his explanation of what the drug was used when his race were
slaves.  O'Bannon also does a lot of quality dialogue, and between that and the
performances by the two leads, the movie was a thumbs-up experience.  There's a
lovely line by Patinkin about the difference between America's ideals and how
they are practiced by its citizens....
     Its greatest failing is in the last fifteen minutes, where the crime plot
was dropped and another, more hackneyed one is appended.  I don't want to give
it away, but suffice it to say that this would be a fine time to head to the
restroom or stop by the concession stand -- you'll be able to predict what's
going to happen, and you'll be right.
     Conclusion: it's flawed by its ending, but as an example of its genre, I
found it satisfying and a nice twist on several conventions.  Special kudos to
Caan and Patinkin for rising above the low points of the scripts and making
the film enjoyable and (ha-ha) human.  A good matinee-price film.

Title
Review for Back to the Future Part II (1989)
[Don't worry, kids, no real spoilers lurk within]
     Actually, about the only spoiler that I will reveal about BACK TO THE
FUTURE PART II is the fact that the story is left with a cliff-hanger of an
ending, and is continued in BACK TO THE FUTURE PART III, coming to a Sequel
Auditorium near you next summer.  I remember people walking out of the LORD OF
THE RINGS in an extremely peeved mood due to the annoying surprise that the
film only covered half of Tolkien's trilogy; I wouldn't have that on my
snow-white conscience, so, Happy Holidays.  Now you can go prepared.  (I must
admit that I didn't hear too much grumbling on leaving BACK TO THE FUTURE PART
II; I assume the knowledge of it being continued is either fairly common
knowledge, or the film is more satisfying that LORD OF THE RINGS, installment
or no.  (A rather back-handed compliment...))
     So, how is it?  And, of course, the really *original* question: how does
is stand up to its predecessor?  Well, first of all, the high points of BACK TO
THE FUTURE were a) a clever use of time-travel machinations (many already
familiar to me through the wonders of science fiction and comix), b)
Christopher Lloyd's Doc Brown, c) some cute humor, and d) Alan Silvestri's
charged-up theme music.  And I liked the car.  However, the characters were
mostly pastiches, keeping it at the level of an above-average exercise in comic
plotting with an under-used plot device -- time-travel.  A satisfying movie,
but not something I was anxious to see over and over.
     Thus, I have to say that BACK TO THE FUTURE II pretty well meets up to my
expectations, because they weren't abnormally high in the first place.  The
cleverness and time-related in-jokes are pretty good, and the time-travel theme
holds together if you don't think about it *too* closely.  (See assorted heaps
of rec.arts.movies articles for examples of intense chrono-temporal
reflection.)  No real plot shocks or surprises   There's a sense of rushed
urgency in this film that was absent in the first BACK TO THE FUTURE film, and
this gives the film an edge (or at least becomes reminiscent enough of IT'S A
WONDERFUL LIFE to simulate one); however, what it adds in suspense, in takes
away from the one enjoyable friendship in the first film, the one between Doc
Brown and Marty.  Doc seems to be in the picture merely to hustle Marty from
time-period to time-period, and (except for one pleasant sequence where Brown
bumps into himself), gets to show very little personality; his main
contributions to the film are the better historical jokes.  (From the previews
of Part III at the end of the film, this may be remedied in the concluding
film.)  Michael J.  Fox seems to be trying to beat Cary Grant's record of
double-takes in ARSENIC AND OLD LACE, and while he's adequate, he's no Archie
Leech.  (The idea of Cary Grant as the protagonist in a slightly-altered
version of these films really appeals to me...)  Everyone else is a
cookie-cutout character (Biff especially); they also toil who only serve the
plot, etc.
     So, is it worth seeing?  Depends how well you liked the original BACK TO
THE FUTURE PART II is more of the same; the good news, in these sequel-riddled
days, is it's not worse than the same.

Title
Review for Pascali's Island (1988)
     There was no question that I came out of this film sober and impressed.
The problem is that I was impressed with only one aspect of the film though:
Ben Kingsley as Basil Pascali, a translator and spy for the Ottoman Empire just
before the outbreak of World War I on a small Greek island.  What's amazing is
that Kingsley, through his superb performance in this film, is almost able to
carry the film despite an uneven script, uninspired acting in other quarters,
and rather wishy-washy composition.  It could have been a great film; it is
instead a good film, but that should not in any way degenerate Kingsley.  It's
as if he understood some universal body language so well that he can make you
recognize his character before the story even unfolds; he makes slight motions
of the eyes and face that communicate a soliloquy, but it's subtle enough that
the viewer feels as if they've almost missed it.  Simply amazing.
     This is a tragedy, in the classic sense (character is brought down by a
fatal flaw); it is not a film that I imagine you'll feel good about after
seeing it.  I felt like sitting in my theater chair for a half hour before even
going near sunlight.  But if you're looking for a decent story and a stunning
performance, see this film.

Title
Review for Scrooged (1988)
     I have to wonder what drug-addled studio executive came up with the idea
of having Michael O'Donoghue co-write an adaptation of a Charles Dickens short
story.  O'Donoghue is probably to Dickens what the Anti-Christ is to Jesus; the
man is brilliant at producing dark satirical humor, but I've yet to see him
come up with anything that could be even remotely referred to as
"heartwarming".  Or "civil," for that matter.  So I went into this film
assuming that it was going to be a complete send-up on A CHRISTMAS CAROL, and
for a little while, it does.
     OK: the good points: it has a three-minute opening sequence, a promo for a
"holiday special" with Lee Majors, that I literally howled at.  Pure
O'Donoghue.  Then...  zip.  Outside of a decent (but not inspired) zinger from
Murray on the average of once every two minutes (not counting the *ugh*
finale), and *maybe* Carol Kane (I think she's been over-rated here), the laughs
are few and far between.  What's worse, the film keeps trying to waffle between
satiric jesting and endearing sentimentality, and it ends up being icky.  How
icky?  Oh, lord.  You've heard other reviewers mention how bad the last ten
minutes are, as the "reformed" Murray address a TV audience?  Trust me, it made
me *angry* to watch this.  I nearly killed an usher with a glower on the way
out of the theater.  All the actors try to look like they think Murray's
artificial speech is touching, while the silent audience appeared to be
memorizing where the exits were in case of fire.  This was bad -- Golden Turkey
level bad.  Nas-teee.
     Besides Kane, I have to credit Alfre Woodward for one of the two moments
that had any real warmth to them; I knew she was a good actress, but how she
remained convincing during the conclusion is truly incredible.  And a few
points to Bill Murray for trying to drag something out of this (the scene where
he finds Michael J.  Pollard frozen actually worked, at least for the first
minute).
     But really, avoid this like the plague.  Except for the Lee Majors promo.
That was cute.

Title
Review for Sticky Fingers (1988)
STICKY FINGERS (United States, 1988)
Director: Catlin Adams
Screenwriters: Catlin Adams, Melanie Mayron
Cast: Helen Slater, Melanie Mayron, Danitra Vance, Eilleen Brennan,
      Carol Kane, Christopher Guest, Stephen McHattie
     Well, what can I say?  These two musicians (Slater and Mayron [the latter
also co-wrote the film]) are living hand-to-mouth in New York as park
performers, going through various romantic tribulations (McHattie and Guest)
and avoiding their landlord (Brennan).  A drug-dealing friend asks the pair to
keep an eye on a bag while she's out of town.  Of course, they decide to open
it and find that it's full of money.  $900,000 worth.  Of course, they
initially want nothing to do with it, but....look, do I have to draw you a
picture?
     Mayron and Catlin Adams showed up after the showing, and everyone was
very polite, which is never a good sign.  They said they had wanted to do
a "Laurel and Hardy" type film; at times, I thought it was a Lucy and
Ethel comedy, as Slater and Mayron tend to look at each other and go
"WAAAAHH!" throughout the picture.  Sorry, but give me SONS OF THE DESERT
any time.
     There are a couple of performances that do stay above water -- you'd
expect it with such a good cast.  There is something about Carol Kane that
makes me grin idiotically whenever she's on; here, she plays here a ditzy
Southern woman bit as Brennan's sister, in New York to help Brennan recuperate
from broken legs.  Her romantic dalliance with the parking lot attendant next
door is really good.  Danitra Vance, one of the best Ebersol-produced SATURDAY
NIGHT LIVE performers of the early 80s, does a nice job as the girls' rational
musician friend.  And Mayron, who is a favorite of mine on the TV program
THIRTY-SOMETHING, is appealing in her quiet moments; it's a pity she didn't
bring the writers from the show onto this project.  Christopher Guest, one of
the best comic performers of the last decade, isn't given anything to be use,
and ends up being rather dull.
SUMMARY: Slapstick and shopping humor, all having the general humorous
composition of soggy cardboard.  There's better things out there, gang...
LINER NOTES:  Sorry these are taking so long to get out -- STICKY FINGERS was
shown a week ago, and is already out in the theaters.  I'm just now catching up
with the reviews.  Observations so far: seen quite a few films, though I
avoided IT'S ALIVE III on the basis of the lateness of the hour, IGUANA because
the showing at the Secret Festival (which I can't tell you about, sorry) was so
disturbing that I went home and read for the rest of the day, and A KILLING
AFFAIR on the recommendation of Peter Reiher.  Good films so far, and one GREAT
film: DOMINICK AND EUGENE, which is out in theaters already.

Title
Review for Colors (1988)
     After all the hoopla going on in the press and elsewhere, I came out
without much of an impression of the film as narrative entertainment.  As a
story of a particular group of people living in a particular area based in
reality, I certainly can't comment on it's validity (having never ventured into
L.A., much less East L.A.) other than it didn't seem to eject logic at any
point.  I didn't form any idealized portraits of the gangs (or the police); the
movie's main intention apparently was to outline the gang life there and the
tragedy that it produces.  It doesn't blame any central reasons for the gang
problem, nor does it provide panaceas or easy answers for the problem.  It
basically tries to snatch up a microcosm of this area, and (admittedly ignorant
of the area) it seemed successful in that.
     So much energy is being used to keep things focussed that other elements,
like characters and story, are kept in the background.  Not out of negligence,
I think; I think it's Hopper's method to view the forest instead of the trees,
though he does some pretty impressive landscaping.  None of the actors stand
out, but all of them seem to fit their roles like a glove.  Duvall adds the
usual personal quirks to his character that he's famous for, but that just
seems to add more reality to him.  Penn plays the young, brash officer who sees
the gangs as opponents decently.  Of the other actors, most fill the characters
to the brim without glomming the spotlight; only Trinidad Silva (Henry Silva's
son?)  seems to draw attention whenever he's on camera, something he used to do
on Hill Street Blues when playing Jesus Martinez, the gang leader of the
Diablos.  The man is hopelessly type-cast, but, like Edward G. Robinson, he
brings a fascination to the archetype again and again.
     I felt it was worth the $2.50 I paid for admission -- in fact, $3.50 would
have been fine -- but it's aftermath is reflection, not emotional stimulation.
Take that into account...

Title
Review for Good Morning, Babylon (1987)
Seen at the Seattle Film Festival:
GOOD MORNING, BABYLON (USA/Italy, 1987)
Directors: Paolo and Vittorio Taviani
Story and Screenplay: Paolo and Vittorio Taviani; screenplay
                      in collaboration with Tonino Guerra
Cast: Vincent Spano, Joaquim De Almeida, Greta Scacchi, Desiree Becker,
      Omero Antonutti, and Carles Dance as D.W. Griffith
Partially subtitled.
     This was the much ballyhooed closing film at the festival, made by the
Brothers Tavianni who have gained such fame from films like KAOS and NIGHT OF
THE SHOOTING STARS; an Italian/American production, it tells the story of two
brothers, skilled artisans who move to America to practice their trade.  They
end up working in Hollywood, attempting to work on D.W. Griffith's production
of INTOLERANCE, and to stay together.
     I don't know what there is to compliment in this film.  The dialogue is
usually in English, since the brothers speak it after arriving in America, but
the dialogue is usually stilted, with exclamations that seem unnatural and
artificial.  The plot is too simplistic throughout most of the film, and the
characters seem to be something out of a Horatio Alger story; D. W. Griffith
is treated like a cross between Leonardo and Moses, and INTOLERANCE is made to
look like the ultimate statement of anti-war sentiment (it wasn't).
     The brothers are broken up by moronic family pride, which makes them look
suddenly stupid and macho, and this finally turned my sympathies against them--
one of their wives dies, and they are no longer "equal," which causes the
widower to leave for Europe and WW I.  This all winds up in an utterly and
unintentionally hilarious ten-minute sequence which was supposed to be a
tear-jerker, but instead had the audience giggling uncontrollably.  The
brothers meet up on an Italian battle field, and are individually bayonetted by
a fleeing German infantryman while they're bending over one another.  And then,
in their dying moments (which are drawn out to a fantastic degree), they
photograph one another with a newsreel movie camera so that "their sons can see
them."  I thought part of it was based on a Monty Python sequence I remember,
but I can't be sure.
     A fair-to-poor film, ending in a truly astonishing screw-up.  F.  Avoid.

Title
Review for Chorus of Disapproval, A (1988)
[Seen at the Seattle International Film Festival]
A CHORUS OF DISAPPROVAL (Great Britain, 1989)
Director/Producer: Michael Winner
Screenwriter: Alan Ayckbourn and Michael Winner, from the play by Ayckbourn
Cast: Jeremy Irons, Anthony Hopkins, Jenny Seagrove, Prunella Scales,
      Lionel Jeffries, Richard Briers, Patsy Kensit, Alexandra Pigg
     Rambling comedies with eccentric characters have been very much in vogue
within the independent cinema over the last decade; and indeed, some very good
work has been done with this kind of premise.  A CHORUS OF DISAPPROVAL is not
one of them.  It opens with a very shy widower (Irons) who has been moved to a
British seaside town by his company deciding to start a social life again.  He
comes upon an ad in the local paper about a volunteer production of "The
Beggar's Opera" looking for players, and decides that this will be the means
for his reentry into a social life.
     The cast of "The Beggar's Opera" is a collection of characters from all
social and financial strata, most of them rather strident; the only really
enjoyable one is the director, played by Anthony Hopkins with hearty grouchy
malice.  Irons starts out with a bit role, but due to either illness on the
part of a cast member, or bad blood between actors, he finds himself moving
into better and better roles.  At the same time, Iron's personality begins to
change as he takes on bigger, more challenging parts; he becomes more
self-confident, more charming -- and more manipulative of the people he's
working with.  He also starts affairs with two of the company, one of them
being Hopkin's wife.  The dilemmas this creates throw Irons back and forth
between the Garrison Keillor side of his personality and his "star" side -- and
several levels in-between.
     This isn't new ground for a film, but that doesn't matter; the point is
really that it isn't very funny.  The dialogue is fairly flat, and the
characters never take on any real dimension (except for Hopkins'); if it was
meant to be more of a drama than a comedy, then the characters need added
dimension.  It ends with no surprise, just a wry side-glance at the acting
profession and those who work in it.  The trouble is, the events of A CHORUS OF
DISAPPROVAL, presented the way they are, are hardly worth a side-glance in the
first place.

Title
Review for Straight to Hell (1987)
Seen at the Seattle Film Festival:
STRAIGHT TO HELL (USA, 1987)
Director: Alex Cox
Screenwriters: Alex Cox, Dick Rude
Cast: Joe Strummer, Cy Richardson, Dick Rude, Courtney Love, Dennis Hopper,
      Grace Jones, Elvis Costello, Jim Jarmusch, and The Pogues
     Certainly one of the most eagerly awaited films at this year's Film
Festival was Alex Cox's STRAIGHT TO HELL; Cox has produced two other films,
REPO MAN and SID AND NANCY, which garnered both critical and popular acclaim,
especially REPO MAN.  STRAIGHT TO HELL was advertised as a return to the
bizarre humor of REPO MAN, combined with a satire of the "spaghetti western"
popularized by Sergio Leone.
     Well, great plan, and the sense of humor that Cox used in REPO MAN is much
in evidence.  What's missing is any semblance of a plot, if only to
self-lampoon as it progresses.  REPO MAN had a story unfolding, which gave the
bizarreness of dialogue so much of its bite.  The plot of STRAIGHT TO HELL
reminds one more of CASINO ROYALE or THE CANNONBALL RUN; it seems to be an
excuse for guest stars to make minute cameos.  REPO MAN mixed fantasy and
reality to produce a wonderful hybrid of new-wave humor; however, the tiny
thread of reality in STRAIGHT TO HELL is lost after the first five minutes,
which recount the exploits of three inept hit men and their shrill moll.  When
they fail to fulfill their contract in Mexico due to oversleeping, they resort
to bank robbery, and wind up fleeing to an obscure Mexican ghost town,
inhabited by a family of bandits, merchants, repairmen, and hot-dog salesmen
who exist on coffee and expresso.  Yeah, I know--it sure *sounds* like a
winner.  The rest of the film takes place in the village, and here is where the
film breaks down; ANYTHING can happen, it appears, and thus insanity builds on
insanity.  The implied satire of Italian westerns occurs in several scenes, but
most sequences just get their laughs from being strange, in dialogue and
behavior.  The problem with this is that the previous scene was strange, the
scene before that was strange, etc....  There's nothing to play against, like
bouncing a raquetball against a wet sponge.  Not that there aren't funny
parts....  I really enjoy bizarre humor, and there are some outstanding examples
in STRAIGHT TO HELL; the scene where the the local hot dog man is forced to
sing "The Wiener Song" at gunpoint would make anyone grin.  But this kind of
thing is unrelenting, and we really do need some kind of anchor, or the whole
thing generates into complete absurdity.
     I WILL say that I'd love to get the soundtrack to this film...almost
everyone appearing in the film had something to do with the music.  The Pogues,
in particular, produced a wonderful opening theme that combines with some
interesting optical effects to make the best opening credits I've seen this
year ("Cruelty and Abuse Consultant").  Most of the well-known actors appear
for no more than two minutes: Elvis Costello, Dennis Hopper, Grace Jones, and
Jim (STRANGER THAN PARADISE) Jarmusch.  Of the other actors, I only recognized
Joe Strummer from REPO MAN; the others are, I suspect, musicians I just don't
recognize (Cy Richardson, Dick Rude, Courtney Love).
     This might make a good midnight movie, or something to be watched under
the effects of certain illicit substances; but that's not enough to get a
thumbs-up from a pillar of the community like me.  D (with affection), but let
me know if you find a soundtrack!!

Title
Review for I Know Where I'm Going! (1945)
[Seen at the Seattle International Film Festival]
I KNOW WHERE I'M GOING (Great Britain, 1945)
Director/Producer/Screenwriters: Michael Powell and Eric Pressburger
                                 (The Archers)
Cast: Wendy Hiller, Roger Livesey, Pamela Brown, Finlay Currie,
     Capt. C. W. R. Knight, Petula Clark, Valentine Dyall, Nancy Price,
     John Laurie, Jean Cadell
[Part of the TRIBUTE TO MICHAEL POWELL series]
     One of the first films that Powell & Pressburger produced under their
Archers emblem, this is a romantic comedy that works very well, due mainly to
casting (of both major and minor roles) and a decent script.  It also attempts
to capture a magical Scottish atmosphere in the bargain; it's a respectable
attempt, but it only seems to ferment at the very end of the picture.  However,
there is enough good work going on elsewhere in the picture to leave a
satisfying taste in one's mouth throughout its running time.
     Wendy Hiller plays Joan Webster, a strong, materialistic woman who has
finally manipulated her millionaire boss into marriage; before leaving for
Scotland to meet her fiance, Joan describes to her father how everything in her
life is going exactly as she had planned it to, and that this is the
culmination of her dreams.  Her father warns her that the best things in life
are often the ones which aren't planned, and of course he turns out to be right
by the end of the film.  (Fathers always are in films like this.)  While
waiting to get across the loch to the island castle owned by her fiance, Joan
meets a brace of eccentric characters who live in the area, including Roger
Livesey as Torquil, the local laird who has just returned from the war.  The two
begin to fall in love, with Joan's dreams of financial independence hindering
and the awful weather over the loch helping the budding relationship.  The
varied personalities and activities of the locals, along with the ruins of a
castle and its ancient curse on Torquil, keep I KNOW WHERE I'M GOING from
having any bare spots; and the performances of Hiller and Livesey make for a
very fine romance, indeed.
     According to Maltin, this isn't out on video yet; however, with the
continued interest in Powell & Pressburger's work, it may not be long before it
is available.  A solid romantic comedy with a bit more emphasis on the romance
than the comedy, and a feel distinctly different than, say, Capra or Lubitsch.
     [Bias Disclaimer:  I think Wendy Hiller was born to play Dorothy L. Sayers'
Harriet Vane, and I really haven't seen anyone else who's come close.]

Title
Review for Dream Team, The (1989)
     This is one of those unusual films where every member of the cast and
creative team have a high point at one time or another during the film.
Unfortunately, their zeniths never peak at the same time, and you're left with
a film that is excruciatingly close to being over the thumbs-up line, but which
never quite makes it.  The story covers a group of four mental patients
(Michael Keaton, Peter Boyle, Christopher Lloyd, and Stephen Furst) who are
taken on a day trip to New York City by their doctor.  Unfortunately the doctor
witnesses a murder and is assaulted, and his patients are blamed for the
attack.  They're left to their own devices, which is the point of the film....
     I like the concept of the writer adding a bit of drama to the comedy --
letting the audience see a few of the struggles these people are having to make
to deal with "sanity."  I just wish it could have done better.  Lloyd's reunion
with his family comes particularly close, but again, it never crosses the line.
As for the rest of the script, the writer has given several of the characters
some *very* funny dialogue, but it only comes in spurts, and at the oddest
times.  And it's unevenly distributed, going mostly to Keaton and
(sporadically) to Boyle.  Lloyd is left with a character who is supposed to be
annoying and funny, and ends up only being annoying.
     [Note: to anyone who sees this movie, or has seen it and who has a better
memory than me (not much of a feat), could you please drop me a line with the
exchange between Peter Boyle's character and Keaton's girlfriend's yuppie
room-mate, about the sculpture?  *Beautiful* line.  Also any good lines Keaton
had that you can remember...]
     As to the actors, there's some very good work here.  Lloyd, as I've said,
comes very close to making his unsympathetic character sympathetic, but he just
doesn't have the script to do it with.  Boyle is OK but has some great lines;
Furst is Furst.  The fellow who plays their doctor was *excellent* -- one of
those small roles where the actor fits the role so perfectly that you keep
pointing it out later.  Keaton, however, is the star, and he certainly carries
things whenever he's given the opportunity.  True, he has the best lines, but
he always takes them as far as he can.  The man has an intensity that makes for
a very believable violent psychopath; what you like about him is that he seems
to get angry with all the right people.  (Which I guess is a definition of his
role in BATMAN.  I still don't know if he can pull off his role in that film --
I keep wondering if he might have made a better Joker.  At any rate, he is the
only actor I know of who should be allowed to play Jack Nicholson...)
     I can't really recommend THE DREAM TEAM, but I have to give it a B+ for
effort.   Better luck next times, guys.

Title
Review for Dangerous Liaisons (1988)
     I guess I look at it this way: you can stuff Close and Malkovich into the
dress of the nobility, place them in lavish sets (though, surprisingly, fairly
pedestrian photography), and give them tons of room to emote in (I didn't see
FATAL ATTRACTION, but I bet it was a lot like Close's next-to-final scene where
she starts ripping up her dressing room); however, without a lot of quality,
acid dialogue, there isn't a lot that separates DANGEROUS LIAISONS from
DYNASTY.
     This became evident pretty quickly into the picture.  The plot is complex
enough to be interesting, but since it all comes down to who-is-diddling-who,
it resulted in a plot that was only marginally more interesting than a study of
Paddington Station train schedules.  What I really started to look for -- and
what I never found -- was some witty, pointed dialogue that would supplement a
group of characters I had no interest in following for two hours.  Nada.  I
damn near fell asleep a couple of times.
     Malkovich rarely seems to show emotion, and his final agony isn't very
believable to me.  Close is fun to watch, and she really can add some interest
to the picture through her ability to look coy in 791 different ways, but it
certainly isn't enough to save the ship.  The others left next to no impression
on me, except that the young man who duels with Malkovich played Ted in BILL
AND TED'S EXCELLENT ADVENTURE.  I fervently wish those two had shown up
somewhere in this film.

Title
Review for Kitchen Toto, The (1987)
THE KITCHEN TOTO (Great Britain, 1987)
Director/Screenwriter: Harry Hook
Cast: Bob Peck, Phyllis Logan Edwin Mahinda, Kristen Hughes
     THE KITCHEN TOTO details the life of a young African boy living in Kenya
in 1950.  His father, the village minister, is killed for not supporting a
group of tribesman who are intent on ridding themselves of the British colonial
rule.  His mother sends him to work as the "kitchen toto" -- the kitchen boy --
in the home of the local British military constable.  He soon finds himself
trapped between trying to live in the British way, which is relatively pleasant
but where is he is wronged again and again by his employers, and the
gangster-like terrorists who make up the Mau Mau revolutionaries.  He struggles
to live neutrally between the two factions, only to be drawn deeper into the
Mau Mau sect.
     The film opens with a scene of native children being treated to Christmas
gifts by the British colonists.  It is a cheery portrait: the kind, generous
landowners entertaining their African wards and servants.  Indeed, there are
benevolent British characters here, people who believe that they are helping
their "primitive" brethren to civilization.  The distinction of the film is how
it shows that even the best of intentions contribute to the desecration of a
people -- or peoples.  For the whites in this film are degraded by the same
imperialism that humiliates their black countrymen: their foibles and ignorance
is put on display, and they defend it out of fear of losing control over their
subjects.  The film shows how even the least slight, which would be nothing
more than a social faux pas in a equal society, can develop into the most
tragic circumstances.
     It's unnecessary to underline the validity of the film's message -- I
can't imagine there is anyone on the net stupid enough to champion
Arpartheid-like regimes -- but I have to credit the film for its enormous
skill in bringing the message across.  There are no stereotypes, no
easily-digested characters; it shows how an innocent is persecuted, tortured
and eventually destroyed by bigotry and its repercussions.  The cinematography
is excellent, as the darkness of the jungle seems to touch every shot; the
director has done a film without any wasted motions.
     Every year, the Academy of Motion Picture Arts gives out rewards to
"message" films.  I wish the majority of them were as effective as THE KITCHEN
TOTO.  It makes its point without pandering or stooping to entertain as it goes
along.  Instead, a story is told in a way that makes its point very clearly.
There are some people is South Africa whom I think should see THE KITCHEN TOTO.
Soon, and for their own sakes as well as others'.
LINER NOTES:  This is the second small quality film I've seen this year to be
released by Cannon/Golan-Globas.  They do seem to import some good
international works, to go along with HE-MAN and Chuck Norris' latest
flag-waver.

Title
Review for Lawrence of Arabia (1962)
     Within a week, I've doused myself in the fountain of film retrospectives,
to wit, seeing the restored versions of GONE WITH THE WIND and LAWRENCE OF
ARABIA.  Both of these are film classics in the strictest sense of the term,
both are epics, both have intermissions (thank God!), and both are noted for
all-star casts and memorable scores and impressive cinematography.  And both of
them, while entertaining diversions, struck me as being less impressive than I
had expected from the superlative comments that have been written about them
(though one was far more disappointing than the other).
     First, GONE WITH THE WIND.  Not having read the novel by Margaret Mitchell
(nor having any particular wish to -- hint, hint), I can't comment on how well
I thought the actors played their particular roles.  If I have to give Victor
Fleming credit for anything, it's the way he frames a shot: zooming slowly
backwards to reveal the lines of wounded men in Atlanta (and the Confederate
flag), zooming back to take in the staircase of the Wilkes estate.  Come to
think of it, was GWTW Fleming's vessel for introducing the world to the use of
the zoom shot?  Or the back-lit shadowed-figures framing?  If he'd used the
zoom lens any more often, it would have looked like one of SCTV's old 3D movie
spoofs....
     Yeah, the Technicolor's impressive as heck, and Gable's performance rarely
sunk into ham acting, and Vivian Leigh had a few good scenes, too.  But most of
the writing isn't that impressive, and much of the acting is just plain
mediocre.  I've seen Leslie Howard in PYGMALION, and I know he can act (and
direct), but you wouldn't know it from this.  I can see why they picked Olivia
De Havilland for Melly, though; by the time this was shot, she had the
goody-two-shoes chipmunk look down pat.  (I'd have to put De Havilland down as
one of the three actors I'd have the most fun with if I dubbed over their
dialogue.)
     Okay, let's get down to brass tacks.  It's one big long soap opera.  Sure,
the first half has some epic parts, but the second half is all bubbles, and
then everybody decent dies in the final reel.  Two women sitting next to me
were crying during the last half hour.  Now I cry at movies at some pretty
stupidest things.  (Remember Vincent Spano's girlfriend reviving at the last
minute in CREATOR?  Eyes got runny and everything.  Yeah, I know, what a sap.)
But for these characters?  There's not a sympathetic one in the bunch, and
certainly not Scarlett.  Must be a side effect of all that zoom lens action...
     Now, LAWRENCE OF ARABIA is another thing.  It definitely *is* an epic, and
it uses the land as a symbol more powerfully in a single frame than 20 minutes
of Vivian Leigh holding up soil in the air while the camera zoooooms back...
anyway, I saw it in 70MM, and visually it is fantastic.  The panoramas, the
scenes of unbelievable scope (approaching the Bedouin camp, I kept thinking
"This must be a matte!"  It wasn't...), the aftermath of the battle with the
Turks.  This is a masterpiece of what can be done with a camera and some damn
talented actors.  It's also an amazing performance by O'Toole, though I had
thought, from other reviewers' comments, that his character would be considered
more heroic and/or tragic.  I came away with the feeling that this was a man
without all his marbles in one knapsack to begin with, and his combination of
delusions and conscience strive to send him completely off his bean.  A little
bit of lithium, and think of the wonders he could have achieved....  I also
thought that some of the desert/battle scenes dragged on a bit, but that could
be a) because of the added footage or, b) my allergies were in full swing and I
came home to discover I was running a slight temperature.  So take into account
a small bit of crankiness.
     In short, I went to both these films expecting to see something special;
only in LAWRENCE did I find what I was expecting.  If the latter arrives in
your town (especially in 70MM), do not miss it.  As to GONE WITH THE WIND, wait
for it to come on television again; then you'll be able to say you've seen it,
and get some ironing done while you're watching.

Title
Review for Cocoon: The Return (1988)
     Short description: Not much of a movie, but it make a nice bookend to go
with COCOON.  Well, everybody comes back from the first movie (*everybody*), and
a lot of them think about whether it was a good idea to leave Earth in the
first place, and one of the cocoons gets picked up by an oceanographic research
institute where Courtney "Assault Dimples" Cox works, and...
     Brother, is there a lot of padding in this film.  40 minutes could have
been cut out and nobody would have been the wiser.  Yes, some of the charm of
the original is still there, but it's either strained or canned from COCOON.
There are some really ridiculous plot holes running around (especially
regarding how security for the alien is handled -- Carl's Rent-A-Cop guarding
extra-terrestrials).
     *Sigh*  After the Christmas season so far, I'm having to put all my hopes
on THE NAKED GUN...  the local radio promos have been hilarious: "LESLIE
NIELSON as Virtue Incarnate!  PRISCILLA PRESLEY as Lust Personified!  RICARDO
MONTELBON as Pond Scum in Human Form!"  "You've heard the ad...  now see the
movie!  Then buy the silverware."

Title
Review for Canterbury Tale, A (1944)
[Seen at the Seattle International Film Festival]
A CANTERBURY TALE (Great Britain, 1944)
Directors/Producers/Screenwriters: The Archers (Michael Powell and
                                   Eric Pressburger)
Cast: Eric Portman, Sheilla Sim, Sgt. John Sweet, Dennis Price, Esmond Knight,
      Charles Hawtrey, Hay Petrie
[Part of the TRIBUTE TO MICHAEL POWELL series]
     I start this review with some trepidation, because of all of the films
done by The Archers, this may well be my favorite (which is saying something,
considering they also produced, wrote and directed THE LIFE AND DEATH OF
COLONEL BLIMP, A MATTER OF LIFE AND DEATH, and BLACK NARCISSUS); and the
reasons are difficult to encapsulate into rigid paragraphs.  Alright, let's try
the trilogy angle...
     If you view Powell & Pressburger's other great wartime movies as
propaganda films (which is sifting some very fine cinema to one particular (and
not especially flattering) element), you could see 49TH PARALLEL as the "Know
Your Enemy" component; it views a group of fugitive Nazis traveling through
Canada, comparing their philosophy and motives against those of Canadians.
[TBRL: To Be Reviewed Later].  THE LIFE AND DEATH OF COLONEL BLIMP was both a
affectionate character sketch (with some wonderful moments) and a pointed slap
about the realities of the Second World War when compared to previous wars
Britain had fought in.  [TBRL]  A CANTERBURY TALE could almost be considered
the third element, the "Why We Fight" feature; a bit like THE BEST YEARS OF OUR
LIFE, turned sideways and taken before the end of the war, instead of after it.
And it's more subtle than that, too, dealing as much with ideals and traditions
as it does with the personal aspects of the war.
     The film opens with a brief recreation of Chaucer's Canterbury Pilgrimage
on the Pilgrim's Way, segueing into wartime England via a hunting falcon which
becomes a diving Spitfire.  Three people have come to a small village on the
Pilgrim's Way.  One (Sheila Sim) is a city-raised Woman's Corps farm worker,
taking the place of local farm workers who have been enlisted into the Armed
Forces.  Her fiancee, a pilot, was lost in action several months earlier; the
idyllic Canterbury countryside, seemingly isolated from the war despite
blackouts and the occasional war game, begins to restore her interest in life
after the loss of her lover.  A second (Dennis Price) is a musician, a
university-trained organist who found himself working in movie-houses before
war broke out.  He is somewhat bitter about where his life has brought him, and
cynical about the war and its eventual effects on England.  The last is an
American private (John Sweet) from Oregon, on a week's leave to visit
Canterbury and the Pilgrim's Way, not to mention getting his mind off an
absence of letters from his girlfriend.  The three meet on a train, and become
involved in a local mystery, a prankster called the Glue Man who pours glue in
women's hair.  Interested in the stories of the Pilgrim's Way as related by a
local squire (Eric Portman), they travel around the country surrounding
Canterbury, ostentatiously to discover the identity of the Glue Man, but
ultimately to lose themselves in the history and beauty of the area.  They
finally become companions on a weekend trip to the Great Cathedral of
Canterbury; at the end of their pilgrimage, they are given an opportunity to
see their lives in perspective to their hopes, and to their fellow pilgrims, in
this and previous eras.
     Spiritual messages rarely come off well in film; they're either laid on
with heavy-handed imagery, or are so ephemeral that they get lost under the
tread of the rest of the film.  A CANTERBURY TALE avoids this nimbly; it
appears to be uncovering its message in the beautiful footage of the
countryside and its people, rather than implying it.  Powell grew up in this
area, and he uses the images of his childhood to infer much of what he loves
best about his country.  If Olivier's HENRY V was a (belated) battle cry to
spur the British to war, then conversely A CANTERBURY TALE is something of a
visual encapsulation of Shakespeare's "This England" speech from RICHARD II.
     One might think of A CANTERBURY TALE as a reminder of one the better
aspects of civilization, the quest for knowledge and self-awareness, made in an
era when these things seemed eclipsed by the threats of invasion and fascism.
It is subtle when compared with most Home Front movies of the time (Halliwell,
usually a great fan of The Archers in general, seems confused by what they were
shooting for in this film), and indeed, perhaps it has found a resonant chord
with this reviewer which will not be commonly repeated.  But personally, it is
a special film, both in the perspective of a wartime picture, and in its calm
reflective nature within the eye of the hurricane.  It certainly rates with the
best The Archers produced; perhaps this newly-restored full-length print of the
film will be made available to video companies in the near future.

Title
Review for Burglar (1987)
     I hate having to echo Siskel & Ebert, but something *has* to be done about
getting Whoopi Goldberg some decent scripts.  Her latest film, BURGLAR, once
again tantalizes us with brief glimpses of potential, but smothers it under
ridiculous plotting and inadequate backup from supporting characters.  The fact
that I left the movie liking Goldberg's character, DESPITE some of the
lines/situations that had been fed to her, says what kind of actress she is;
she has a lot of charisma.  A cinematic natural resource, if you please.  But
she keeps getting into these half-baked projects (like this and JUMPIN' JACK
FLASH) which end up making me distraught because, while giving some degree of
satisfaction, they consistently reminded me how good they COULD HAVE BEEN with
a little work in the script department.
     BURGLAR is an adaptation of Lawrence Block's "Burglar" books, specifically
"The Burglar in the Closet."  I've read most of these books (I'd give them a C
average), so I my be more sensitive to anomalies in the script that those who
have not read these books.  In some bizarre twist, the sex of the majority of
the characters in the book has been changed: Bernie Rhodenbarr (sp?), the
burglar, has gone from a he to a she (Whoopi Goldberg); his lesbian friend and
neighbor has become a male heterosexual flake (Bob Goldwaith), the dentist who
has hired Bernie to ransack his wife's apartment has become Leslie Ann Warren,
and the wife has become a husband.  Actually, it works pretty well, especially
Goldberg, with the exception being Goldwaith, whose character has to be one of
the most annoying to appear on the screen in years.  If you disliked the old
Saturday Night Live characters "The Whiners," you're going to HATE Goldwaith in
this film.  How did Goldwaith get here?  Personal friend of the producers?  Of
Goldberg's?  Did she marry him?  (I understand she recently got married).  You
keep wondering why someone as together as Goldberg's Rhodenbarr is hanging out
with this nebbish.  Other characters who don't work very well are G.W.
Bailey's crooked cop, who was generally fairly friendly in the book, but here
often acts like a savage.  Warren overacts, which is her standard modus
operandi these days, as far as I can tell.  The rest of the cast is forgetable.
     I really wish I knew what the scriptwriters were trying to do--the plot
of this movie is absolutely schizoid.  On one hand, it seems to be trying to do
a fairly accurate adaptation of the film (despite the sex changes et al); and
then suddenly it goes for a car chase or some action sequences which really
don't work with the rest of the movie.  It's not a terrible script, but it is
blazingly awkward, consistently stumbling when you were just getting interested
in what's going on.
     Throughout it, Whoopi Goldberg plays Bernie Rhodenbarr into an
interesting, level-headed character; actually more appealing than the burglar
in the books, in my mind.  There are points where even she can't overcome the
script--her having to consistently rattle off the spiel about how she only
robs people who "deserve it"; you expect her to jump up on a rock and give an
Errol Flynn speech about robbing from the rich to give to the poor.  And she
does go into Whoopi Goldberg schticks on occasion--but many of them fit into
the character of the burglar, so it works (I especially liked the Italian game
show host, as she examines the dentist's husband's closet).  But over-all, she
plays a self-assured, in-charge character you really get to like by the end of
the film.  She also is the only heroine since Sigourney Weaver in ALIENS that I
can remember who saves the day and brings in the criminal herself, without any
help from a man.  Wish we'd see more of that...
     End result:  A film that is marginally watchable, and constantly shows
potential that it never lives up to.  Dammit, Whoopi, get a new agent!

Title
Review for Personal Foul (1987)
Seen at the Seattle Film Festival:
PERSONAL FOUL (USA, 1987)
Director/Writer: Ted Lichtenhaeld
Cast: David Morse, Adam Arkin, Susan Wheeler Duff, F. William Parker
     This is a film that I was inclined to like at the outset: the two main
characters had been involved with the fine television drama ST. ELSEWHERE
for several years, and I had understood that the director/screenwriter had
written for the show on occasion also.  I am sorry to report that the results
were not up to my expectations, nor were they satisfactory.  If I had to list a
reason why....  but that would be getting ahead of myself; besides, it's not
immediately clear, as there are so many problems with the film.
     Adam Arkin plays a grade-school teacher who is sardonic, cynical, and
somewhat abrasive, but a good teacher.  He spends his lunches playing
basketball by himself on a nearby court.  One day, he meets a drifter (David
Morse, who plays Jack Morrison on ST. ELSEWHERE) in the park, and inveigles
him in a game of one-on-one basketball.  Morse turns out to be good, and a
friendship slowly develops between the two, as their respective professions
progress on the screen--Arkin's teaching, and Morse's selling of paper flowers
to passing motorists.  So far, my major complaint would be the lack of
dialogue, and the constant intrusion of the musical soundtrack.  Good music to
be sure, but it doesn't replace the dialogue for setting the mood or telling
the story--it makes the film somewhat minimalistic, a technique I rarely
admire.
     Suddenly their friendship is interrupted by Morse's introduction to a
fellow teacher of Arkin's, a woman Arkin has long admired from afar, but it too
reticent to approach.  It appears that she begins to admire Morse (who enjoys
here attentions, but isn't sure what to do about it--she doesn't realize that
he is a drifter, and knows nothing about his past), and this causes friction
between Arkin and almost everyone else.
     Until then, I had only a vague dissatisfaction with the film.  The
conclusion is where it begins to evolve into a full-fledged failure.  The
woman, at least to me, appeared to be fairly shallow; I didn't realize how
shallow until her final scene with Arkin, where she reveals that she has been
trying to make Arkin jealous by her attentions to Morse.  Somehow, this is made
to appear as if it is Arkin's fault, and it is left with him feeling somehow
victorious that he's gotten such a find of girlfriend.  Frankly, dropping her
on the spot would have seemed the most civilized action Arkin could make;
punching her in the mouth not the least.  After this, the childish
confrontation between Morse and Arkin at the end seems almost natural.
     If I had to summarize a major gripe, it's that this is a story spread too
thin, that creates semi-likable characters at the outset, and then suddenly
jerks them into being 16-year-olds at the last moment.  It might be
true-to-life with some people; but that doesn't mean *I* have to like it.  I
don't.  Grade: F.  Avoid.

Title
Review for White Mischief (1987)
WHITE MISCHIEF (Great Britain, 1987)
Director: Michael Radford
Screenwriters: Michael Radford, Jonathan Gems; based on the book WHITE
               MISCHIEF by James Fox
Cast: Joss Ackland, Greta (hubba-hubba) Scacchi, Charles Dance, Sarah Miles,
      John Hurt, Susan Fleetwood, Geraldine Chaplin, Trevor Howard
     I've been trying to think of whether to classify this as a drama, comedy
or mystery; instead, I think I'll just label it "British" and leave it at that.
Brother, is it British -- cliche British throughout, though that seems to be
the intention.  The story centers around a beautiful young woman (Scacchi) who
marries a much older landowner (Ackland) for his money in 1940 and travels with
him to his estates in Kenya.  Here, the war is incredibly distant; there are no
shortages and most people are living decadently, if not hedonistically.  An odd
group of characters reside there, and in the center is a statuesquely handsome
rake (Dance) who has had affairs with almost all the sought-after British women
in the colony.  He seeks after the young wife almost immediately, and they
become lovers in a stereotypically formal British manner.  The elder husband
tries to ignore being cuckolded in his best old-boy manner, but soon he
realizes he has lost her to his younger competition.
     Suddenly, the younger man is found murdered in his car, and the husband is
brought to trial.  The rest of the film deals with the aftermath of the murder
and the revelation of who the murderer is.  The resolution is not particularly
satisfying, nor does it make much sense; but that's not the appeal of the film.
     WHITE MISCHIEF's greatest appeal is to put a series of veteran British
actors before the camera in rather bizarre roles, and give them witty lines to
deliver for 90 minutes.  There are some wonderfully quotable bits here, the
kind that used to be delivered in sophisticated drawing room mystery/comedies.
The film would almost fit into the proper British mysteries of Tey, Christie
and the like, but there really are no sympathetic characters.  The young wife is
mercantile, the husband rather pathetic, the lover imperiously superior, and
his ex-mistresses are loony (though Sarah Miles carries the day when on
screen).  The only two neutral characters are Hurt, as a rich farm owner who
has gone "native," and the late Trevor Howard as the elder husband's rather
pachyderm-like friend.  The main point, though, is the bizarre humor, mostly
resulting from everyone's exaggerated stiff-upper-lip manner.  By the end of
the film, the events of the film have driven the young wife almost around the
bend.
LINER NOTES: The young African boy whose face closes out the film is, by
coincidence, the same actor who played the innocent protagonist of THE KITCHEN
TOTO.  Seems to add extra symbolism to the end.
Short: WORDS by Chuck Workman (USA, 1987)
     Last year, Chuck Workman put together clips of over three hundred films
into a short named PRECIOUS IMAGES for the celebration of the Director's Guild.
It was one of my favorite shorts, and is a real treat for any movie lover.
This year, he has another one for the Screen Writer's Guild, filled with 235
famous lines from film and TV over the last sixty years.
     Does anyone know where I could buy a tape with either PRECIOUS IMAGES or
WORDS on it (preferably both)?  I'd love to have a copy of this at home.

Title
Review for Jean de Florette (1986)
Seen at the Seattle Film Festival:
JEAN de FLORETTE (French, 1986)
Director: Claude Berri
Screenwriters: Claude Berri, Gerard Brach; based on a novel by Marcel Pagnol
Cast: Yves Montand, Gerard Depardieu, Daniel Auteuil, Elisabeth Depardieu
Subtitled
     This is the first half of what is being described as a "French Epic"; it
is an adaptation of a fairly well-known French novel about the efforts of two
bachelor farmers, an older man and his rat-faced nephew, who covet the spring
on the land of their neighbor.  After the neigbor is killed by the older farmer
in an angry confrontation that is made to look like an accident, the two
farmers' plans are thwarted by Jean de Florette, the last heir of their
neighbor and a hunch-backed tax-collector who has moved to the farm with his
wife and young daughter to "return to nature" and start a farm.  Unfortunately
for them, the two farmers have hidden the spring on their land, and are working
behind the scenes to make their moves a difficult one.
     This film had several features of interest for me.  It is about men and
women who work the land, and thus needs a director and a cameraman who can
communicate the beauty and hardships associated with farming.  In that they
have succeeded admirably, using color to its full potential and employing wide
shots of the land.  It is also a reminder of how cruelty can be generated by
lack of actions as well as actions, and how villainy is frequent among the
petty, and for petty reasons.  The two farmers are not sadists or vice lords;
they remind us more of the comic foils one finds in a mild English comedy.
They are absurd and sympathetic--they are even worried about the neighbors
they are attempting to force out.  Yet the consequences of their meddling are
no less tragic.
     This is not a complex story, and it is somewhat long; but the
concentration on the land made it interesting to me for the majority of the
film.  I also want to see the sequel, MANON DES SOURCES, when it is released in
the United States.  An elderly French woman who sat next to me in the audience
said she had read the book when she was a child, and felt that the filmmakers
had been very faithful, so those of you who liked the book have a
recommendation other than mine.
     For those who didn't read the book (like moi), C+ ($3.50 movie).

Title
Review for Out of Rosenheim (1988)
Seem at the Seattle Film Festival:
BAGDAD CAFE (West Germany, 1987)
Director/Screenwriter: Percy Adlon
Cast: Marianne Sagebrecht, CCH Pounder, Jack Palance, Christine Kaufman
     BAGDAD CAFE is one of those comedies that derives much of its humor from
the strangeness of its characters.  The question I think is critical to rating
such a picture is this: how long did it take for the characters to become more
funny than strange?  In the case of this film, about twenty minutes.
     The Bagdad Cafe is a run-down little cafe that Brenda (Pounder) runs.
It's dilapidated, frequented only by truckers, and home for a number of rather
odd people: Brenda herself, her rather dim-witted husband, her two children
(one is an abandoned father of a little tyke who plays classical music all the
time, while the other is a beautiful teenager whose attentions are favored by
the local bikers, truckers and high school kids), her Indian counterman and
cook.  Then there's the residents of the adjacent motel; a hooker who does
tattoo work on the side, and Jack Palance as a Hollywood drop-out from the
sixties who seems absolutely *delighted* with whatever is going on.
     Into this steps Jasmin (Sagebrecht), a stout Bavarian woman who has just
left her husband during their visit to the United States.  She knows little
English, and her first encounter as she walks down the highway (her American
Tourister luggage wheeling along behind her) is The Bagdad.  Brenda is in a
really bad mood, as her husband just left her (he sits about a half mile away
in a car, watching the Bagdad through binoculars and muttering "Oh, Brenda.")
Due to a number of misunderstandings, it takes Brenda and Jasmin a while to hit
it off, but when they do a bubbly, infectious happiness seems to grasp the
entire group of characters; indeed, one leaves because things are "too
compatible."  From there, this giddiness doesn't threaten to overwhelm BAGDAD
CAFE -- it *does* overwhelm it, slamming it (and the audience) into a grinning
choke-hold for the rest of the film.
     BAGDAD CAFE won the Golden Space Needle Award (I hear you gasp) for best
picture, and it certainly seemed to be a crowd-pleaser; the audience I left
with seemed to be buzzing about how good it was.  I felt it had a slow
beginning and slow ending, but then I'm not as enchanted with unusual
characters (being one myself, I guess).  Palance character was a delight, but
it gets a bit too giddy for my tastes at the end.  Still, a heckuva lotta fun
with a big audience.  Rating: $3.50 or $4 film.

Title
Review for Playing Away (1986)
See at the Seattle Film Festival:
PLAYING AWAY (Great Britain, 1986)
Directed: Horace Ove
Screenwriter: Vijay Amarnani and Caryl Phillips
Cast: Norman Beaton, Robert Urquhart, Helen Lindsay, Nicholas Farrell
     This is one of those little character films which are such a delight to
find at the festival; they pick you up for a couple of hours and let you down,
emotionally and mentally sated.
     PLAYING AWAY is a study in the contrasts and similarities of two modern
British cultures.  One is the familiar (to filmgoers, anyway) country village,
replate with farmers, the good-hearted local minister, and a few of the gentry.
It also has a collection of surly, disaffected teenagers found even in rural
Britain.  The other culture is represented by a cricket team of West Indian
immigrants living in a black London neighborhood.  These left their home to
come to London and get jobs; now, their jobs are becoming endangered by the
poor economy and their race, their children seem to be falling into the morass
of urban blight, and they miss the islands greatly.
     The two cultures run into one another when the villagers invite the city
team for a weekend cricket match in their town.  The two groups meeting tends
to bring out the best and worst in several people; much of it is very funny,
but some of it is frightening and not at all attractive.  What makes it work,
as either comedy or drama, is how carefully the characters are drawn within the
100 minutes of the film.  Each member of either team is brought to the point
where, at the end of the film, you feel as if you know them all quite well.
What makes the film so much fun is watching how the various characters from
both "sides of the fence" deal with each other (or fail to); scenes like the
meeting between Willie Boy, the leader of the city team, and the local squire,
are a delight; some people find they have much in common, while others find
they have nothing (or so they think).
     The cricket match itself at the end is something of an anti-climax, and
suffers from slo-mo sports sickness a bit too much.  But it never lags below a
rating of good, and the ending gives you some faith that the good in people
can find the good in other people, no matter how great the difference of birth
and background are.
     Rating: $3.50 - $4.00 film.  Perfect for an early weekday or a Sunday
evening.

Title
Review for Cop (1987)
     For my money, the actor who delivers more emotional punch to his films, no
matter what problems the script has, is James Woods.  True, he often plays
roles where his character is on the edge (of lunacy, of society, of moral and
ethical behavior), but he scintillates in such parts.  His eyes get bright, he
gets that sideways grin/leer, and he uses his voice like an electric carving
knife, cutting into whoever he's talking to.
     He does it again in COP, which almost (but not quite) makes it as an 
excellent film.  Woods plays a hot-shot L.A. police detective, a real  cowboy
who literally loves his work.  He's smart and intuitive and slick  and very
brash and socially a fair-to-middlin' creep; he's also so caught  up in his
work that his home life has gone to hell.  Underneath it all is  an obsession
with "innocence" that is coming out as things begin to fall  apart
domestically, some concept that he sees in the faces of the female victims he
comes across in his day-to-day work.
     The film opens with Woods' character investigating a tip from a burglar 
about an apartment homicide; he finds the body of a young woman who has  been
gruesomely murdered hanging from the ceiling.  As the film  progresses, Woods
becomes convinced that she is a victim of a serial  murderer; however, he has
no real evidence of this (much of his  conviction comes from the look of
"innocence" in the photos of the  victims), and the department doesn't like the
possibility -- serial  killers indicate that they got away with it for months
or years before  the police noticed it.  
     So we are left for much of the film trying to figure out whether Woods is 
an obsessive, rather repugnant investigative genius, or whether he is off  his
nut and interpreting a single murder to be the latest in a long line  of
executions.  It's a fascinating dilemma for the viewer, and Woods just 
equivocates back and forth between the two positions.  An excellent
performance, a balancing act that works like a charm, and it continues to  keep
Woods in my book of the five best character actors working in  American film
today.
     The other actors are good, too, and the script deserves credit for not 
making anyone a stereotype, either good or bad.  Well, almost everyone -- 
Charles Haid comes off very poorly as a Beverly Hills cycle cop, perhaps 
because I have a hard time not seeing him as Renko on Hill Street Blues.   And
the script has a good sense of the humorous, though it's often rather  morbid.
The burglar's monologue as the opening credits roll by, and  Woods' evening
story to his 6-year-old daughter, seeded with police terms  like an official
report, are quite funny, and liven the film up at  points.
     But now for the drawback of the film -- the ending.  The last fifteen 
minutes show that the screenwriter, who had some very good moments  through the
early part of the film, really lost it in the end.  It would  be a pedestrian
ending except for its abruptness (though it does leave  Woods with a hell of a
good line).  No follow-up on the characters; it  just left me hanging for more.
     Its finale is too flawed for me to give the film a full thumbs-up, but 
the it's worth $2.50 - $3.00 for the first 1.5 hours.  An economy hour 
choice...

Title
Review for Born To Be Bad (1934)
Both of these films were shown in conjunction with the "Hollywood and the Code"
Series at the Seattle Film Festival.
BABY FACE (USA, 1933)
Director: Alfred E. Green
Cast: Barbara Stanwyck, George Brent, Donald Cook, Margaret Lindsay,
      Douglas Drumbille, John Wayne
     BABY FACE and BORN TO BE BAD are rather interesting sides of the same
coin.  The first, made in 1933 and listed by William Everson as one of the
films most responsible for the institution of the code, is a surprisingly
entertaining story of a down-and-out girl from the slums who sleeps her way to
the top of a corporation.  Barbara Stanwyck redeems the film a good deal with
her presence, but it has appeals beyond that.  To get a job in a major business
office, she takes advantage of the considerable number of dorks who promote her
to the top in exchange for her affections.  After a fall from grace (so to
speak), she is given a position of responsibility in France, which she does
extremely well on her own (even though she's never heard French or studied
accounting -- well, she *is* Barbara Stanwyck).  When the Big Boss falls in
love with her on the up-and-up, she plays along, but she believes that all
she's interested in is his money (the interplay between her and Brent is
excellent -- she tosses in a couple lines that Mae West would have been proud
of).  Right at the end, she realizes that she *does* love him (surprise,
surprise) and it has a rewritten ending that combines a "happy ending" with a
fate that was supposed to satisfy the "punishment of evil" theme that the
religious reformists were crying for (her husband and she give up all their
money to get his company back on its feet, and they go to work in the factory
town she came from {until the company hits the big time at the very end}).
     I really enjoyed this for a number of reasons, though Stanwyck was the
main point.  She plays a woman who is much smarter than the bozos she's working
for; cynical but very intelligent, capable of doing anything they toss at her
(legitimately), and able to manipulate them in a number of ways.  The romance
between her and Brent works rather well; he knows what she's done but loves her
anyway, and doesn't treat her like the Scarlet Woman (he treats her
indiscretions as minor ones when he first meets her, as opposed to the "pull
out the crucifixes and garlic" attitude that other films impose on such
characters).  And the performances are rarely dated, especially Stanwyck's
(her early scenes in the mill town have a particularly gritty, realistic feel
for Hollywood).
     Right before the code was instated, a lot of the "tawdry" films were
rationalized by the studios as "moral parables."  Rather than watch some
character doing naughty bits, you held up that person's behavior and insured
that she came to a bad end.  A prime example (and another film Everson used as
a precursor to the code) is a ridiculous film named BORN TO BE BAD, with
Loretta Young as a beautiful young woman with a son born out of wedlock (Henry
Travers, in an immensely annoying performance -- Everson listed it as the
single worst child performance he'd ever seen, and I see no reason to dispute
it; even the kid in DONDI had more appeal than this).  Young is tough but
appealing, but the script is so stupid that nothing could help it.
     Young tries to put her kid up to a false injury suit against Cary Grant's
dairy (he's the president of a huge milk company, but is driving the truck that
Young's brat runs in front of because "one of my employees was ill."  Sure, and
I bet you fill in for your secretary too, Cary).  Once the false nature of her
claims against Grant become apparent, the court takes Travers away to a home
for wayward boys, where Grant decides to be a foster home for the boy.  Grant's
wife (so saintly the audience was breaking up) and Grant work towards reforming
the kid, so Young decides the only way to get the kid back is to vamp Grant.
After being utterly goody-goody and refusing all Young's attempts (put this in
Cary Grant-ese: "You're bad, bad, bad, a bad girl"), she shows up in flimsy
evening gown, and ba-boom!  From here it gets *really* ludicrous, as Grant makes
love to her in his own house (and keeps her there!  Those lusty dairy
magnates!); and his wife -- get this -- decides to release him to "true love"
and gets ready to leave...but not before she saves Obnoxio, the boy wonder
from a fall in the pool.  Of course, Loretta sees things in a new light, leaves
kid to live with Grant and wife, and goes to work in the bookstore where she
gave birth to the kid in first place.  The entire thing is such a hoary failure
that today it's tough to see why people got upset.  But of course, we've had
DALLAS and DYNASTY to guide us through such bathos...
     Side observations: Young has a tendency to run around in her undies; there
is a pretty offensive stereotype of a Jewish shyster lawyer; and the comment
"That's white of you" (which Everson [said] was fairly common for that period).
One of the things I found most unpleasant was how Grant is viewed as some sort
of innocent throughout it (OK, he has a baby face, but still...); as if it's
all Young's fault that he jumped her (there was a lot of women hissing from the
peanut gallery at The Egyptian, and I don't blame them).  BABY FACE is heads
above this, both from the script and from the acting.

Title
Review for Bellman and True (1987)
Seen at the Seattle Film Festival:
BELLMAN AND TRUE (Great Britain, 1987)
Director: Richard Loncraine
Screenwriters: Desmond Lowden, Richard Loncraine, Michael Wearing;
               from a novel by Desmond Lowden
Cast: Bernard Hill, Kieran O'Brien, Richard Hope, Frances Tomelty
     BELLMAN AND TRUE is a caper film, and one of the very best ones in recent
memory.  What it lacks in sympathetic characters it makes up for in realism and
technical panache, and in controlled, on-key acting.  The film opens with an
engineer named Hiller (Hill) and his stepson on the lam from some criminals.
Hiller was paid to go in and steal some information about the company he worked
for from their computer banks; instead, he took the money and ran.  They catch
up with him, and get him to decode the information they are looking for.
Hiller also learns that the information will be used to rob one of the most
heavily guarded banks in Britain; his technical abilities are in demand, and he
decides to throw in with the caper.
     Outside of Hiller and his son, there are hardly any sympathetic
characters; the burglars may be interesting, ingenious and remarkable in their
"old world, new world" thinking, but they are also brutal and quite willing of
kill anyone who stops them from the heist or causes problems afterward.  So the
audience is left rooting for the father and son combo, and this works very
well, thanks to Hill's understated performance.  Both are people who've never
been particularly well-treated by anyone before the other came along, and their
love for one another is the only warm, tender thing in either of their worlds
-- or this movie.  They form a nucleus that one worries over during the course
of the film.
     And rightly so.  It's a dangerous break-in, but fascinating in its
ingenuity.  The technical jargon is right on -- how often does that happen, eh?
-- and is as intriguing as the British underworld jargon; "bellman" is the
title of Hiller's job, to disable the alarm systems.  It is particularly
fascinating to see how the thieves deal with the new technology and the new
gangland ethics -- the money-man for the operation is a yuppie who none of the
burglars seem to be too enthused with.  At any rate, the suspense is palpable
throughout, and everything is down-to-Earth -- *including* the ending, which
has constantly been reported as "unbelievable" by other critics.  I can't
imagine why; the entire film seems enormously plausible.

Title
Review for Shame (1987)
Seen at the Seattle Film Festival:
SHAME (Australia, 1988)
Director: Steve Jodrell
Screenwriters: Beverly Blankenship and Michael Brind
Cast: Deborra-Lee Furness, Tony Barry, Simone Buchanan
     Ever see BILLY JACK, or the incredibly bad TRIAL OF BILLY JACK?  I always
liked the initial concept, i.e., a violent liberal with Kung-Fu skills; rather
than wiping out commies or Mafia gangsters, Billy would wipe up the floor with
rednecks who messed with kids, minorities, hippies, peace-loving eccentrics or
disabled people.  It's rather incongruous to disembowel folk in the name of
peace and love, I guess, but as a ten-year-old it did hold a certain logic for
me when I saw it at the theater (my dad thought it was hilarious).  Where it
really got stupid was in TRIAL, where all manor of shocking atrocities were
carted across the screen so that the audience was primed to see Billy ream the
bad guys.  As a kid, the slaughter and rape scenes really disturbed me (as they
should have, come to think of it); when viewing them at a later date, they
disgusted me because their only purpose was to build the audience up to frenzy
(rather like atrocities in a Rambo film, but that's usually pretty cardboard
all around).
     I have that problem with SHAME, a film that appears to be a drive-in
exploitation film with trappings of social justice.  It opens with a motorcycle
rider (Furness) in black leathers crossing the country in Australia.  She stops
in one of those small towns for bike repairs, and right away we know there's
some nasty stuff going on, because the Sheriff is a good ol' boy (or mate, as
this is Australia), and the boys and young men in the neighborhood are tossing
her crap, and suggesting that she get out of town.  Major conspiracy city, it
seems.  She stops at a garage on the outskirts of town, where a dour but decent
mechanic lets her sleep in the garage while her extremely fine looking Japanese
bike (the kind that promote chase scenes) is being fixed.
     That night, the mechanic's daughter (he is a widower) is verbally
assaulted by several of the lads from the town.  The cycle rider (who is a
junior barrister on vacation) discovers that the daughter was gang-raped by a
group of the local boys, and that her father has not spoken to her since as he
thinks it is "her fault."  While waiting for the bike to be fixed, Furness gets
the girl to open up and realize it wasn't her fault, and eventually gets it
through the mechanic's head that his daughter was raped.  A reconciliation of
sorts occurs between the two, and the daughter and father go to the police
station to swear out a complaint against the rapists.  I was beginning to hope
that the film was going to avoid the drive-in cliches and do something
original, like have Furness get these people legally.  Of course not.
     The main industry of the town is a cannery that keeps most of the
population employed, and one of the rapists is the son of the owner, the Jane
Wyman type from Falcon Crest who owns the town and treats the locals like lower
class citizens.  The women does everything but rub her hands together and order
the butler to off the mechanic and his family.  After getting her son and his
cohorts out of jail, they go on a rampage.  The barrister, trapped with the
daughter inside the garage, puts on her leathers and revs up the bike.
Coincidentally, the mechanic's mom and the mechanic are fighting off the mob of
drunken scumbags with a steam machine, so the glowing dials of the motorcycle's
instrument panels (somewhat more complicated than the one in BLUE THUNDER) and
the rider (now completely obscured in her black leathers and reflective helmet)
really look mysterious with the smoke swirling around her and the soundtrack
music going "duh-DUH!" in the background....  I think you get the picture.  If
this followed the buildup it had been given, I expected to find that the cycle
was armed with heat-seeking missiles....
     No such luck.  She puts the kid on the back of the cycle and gets her out
of there.  Then the "good" townspeople get large sticks and track the sadistic
little whooses down and turn them over to the sheriff (who says the Down Under
equivalent of "Well gosh-darned if you weren't right, Ma'am.").  The ending and
the crimes committed in the rest of the film, would have had impact if the kids
and rapists weren't such cardboard villains; here, they seem to be waiting to
be knocked down by a Hero/Heroine, and when the film tries to spotlight them at
the end, as if they were making moral commentary, it's comes off as ludicrous.
Against realistic deviants, it would have been acceptable, but the director
tries to have an exploitation film and wring his hands over it, too, and it
torked me off.
     It does have good points: Furness is quite good at times, especially with
the daughter, and the middle lulled my misgivings about the film away with some
good character development around the mechanic and his family.  But in general,
rate this a no-go.

Title
Review for Other Side of the Wind, The (1972)
     I'm not sure whether to call this a retrospective or a review of
newly-released work.  Come to think of it, it hardly matters -- it seems
unlikely that you will ever see the majority of the films I'm about to
describe.  Most of them were brought up by Gary Graver, a cinematographer who
worked with Welles during the last two decades of his life.  I've heard Graver
called any number of things -- a talented collaborator of Welles, a hanger-on
who has lived off Welles "memorabilia," and other sobriquets; I'll leave it
that I haven't the slightest idea one way or another.  I'm glad that he
provided the clips and films that he did; they were certainly of interest to
anyone who has followed Welles career in the cinema, and his isolation from the
mainstream of the film industry.
     Whether the average viewer would enjoy the majority of works shown here...
that's another question.  Two parts of THE UNSEEN WELLES, "Fountain of Youth,"
a wonderful half-hour TV pilot for an Orson Welles weekly television playhouse,
and OTHELLO (1952), shown in a new 35mm print, were real treats (more about
them later).   The rest of the clips, however, while being of interest to the
film historian, were not what could be called of general interest.  Most were
very unfinished, and showed the signs of extremely limited budgets and
production values.  It was impressive to see how clever Welles could be with a
Super-8 movie camera; but the average film viewer would have been bored stiff,
I think.  The trailer of F FOR FAKE, clips from his unfinished works THE
MERCHANT OF VENICE, THE DEEP, and others were often rather tedious and
extremely unfinished (no editing, sometimes no sound).
     The only set of clips I was fascinated with were from a film Welles
attempted around 1967 to 1972 (I believe -- it's a bit fuzzy at the moment)
called THE OTHER SIDE OF THE WIND.  The story deals with a Raoul-Walsh-like
director (played by John Huston) who is being financed by several producers to
do a film marketed at the EASY RIDER audience.  The film deals with a party the
director throws at his ranch, where many sixties new-wave film makers are
invited to attend, all with cameras in hand.  The film yanks back and forth
between different cameras' point of views, and it's a nice touch, though a bit
tedious towards the end (however, it was unclear whether this would have been
edited down or not when released).  Also interesting was spotting some of the
actors in it: Huston, Robert Walden (Rossi of "Lou Grant"), and a few others
whose names have faded in the last month (damn, I have to start writing these
columns when I get home...).  The second set of clips were of two men and a
women driving through the rain at night on a desert highway, and is one of the
most erotic sequences I can remember.  The final sequences were of a young man
(who looked and sounded a *hell* of a lot like an 18-year-old John Savage)
chasing around a naked girl, apparently under Huston's direction; Huston's
character never appears, but his voice instructs both in such a way that you
wonder if it's supposed to be a scene in Huston's movie, or whether the two are
really performing their run-around with Huston providing sardonic comment.
Also, I was never sure whether the sequences' very "Sixties" appearance were
real or the result of Welles wanting to make it *look* that way -- the man
could affect current fashions faster than "People" magazine.  Very impressive,
though the production values were again dismayingly poor; Graver says that the
film is co-owned by himself and Welles' longtime associate/lover, Oja Palinkas,
and that when and if they get the money, they will work at editing it and
releasing it (not-too-subtle hinting there; I'm surprised a plate wasn't passed
around).
     The rest of the evening (except for OTHELLO and the TV pilot) were clips
of Welles doing magic (really boring) and some out-takes from test film.  No
redeeming value whatsoever.  Considering the show got out so late (I left at
11:10 on a Monday night, and the German TV documentary "The Making of
OTHELLO" had still not been shown), I think Graver could have cut much of this
out.  I refrain from mooning over the cinematic and photographic leftovers of
Marilyn Monroe that seem so prolific; Orson Welles smoking a cigar for Japanese
commercials is even less interesting to me (for obvious reasons).
     The evening was still a success, however; "Fountain of Youth" was a
delightfully droll story about a romantic triangle between a Narcissistic
young actress, an equally vain tennis pro, and a clever professor whose work
with glands acts as a potent weapon against his rival.  This is *witty* comedy,
and I wish to heaven that someone would sell the pilot to the people releasing
Golden Age television on video -- this is a gem.  Unseen for years, it was
Welles' effort to compete with the likes of "Texaco Theater" and other
television dramas;  directing, writing and narrating, he brought the pilot in
on time and under budget, often using slides and silhouettes in an appealing
manner that added to the "gossip column" atmosphere of the play.  CBS paid him
for the pilot and then put it on the shelf.  They finally showed it during the
summer when faced with an empty half-hour slot when Edward R. Murrow fell ill.
This was the only time "Fountain of Youth" was ever broadcast, but it went on
to win the Peabody Award that year, which must have been sweet to Welles after
having been shunned by the network.  If it ever comes out on video, I recommend
that you get it.  This is the kind of thing that they don't do on television
anymore (not even "American Playhouse" -- they're all 1-1/2 to 2 hours long),
and Welles' made it a high point of the genre.  The story unfolds like one of
Woody Allen's amusing short stories: snappy, sardonic and assuming a reasonably
intelligent audience.
     The other work was OTHELLO; shot in black and white in Spain in an ancient
castle, it is full of Wellesian camera tricks and angles -- wonderful moving
shots of Welles (as Othello) striding through the ancient halls, the pillars
dividing the shots.  Halliwell asks if this was the best way to film
Shakespeare; I don't know if it serves as a fit introduction to the Moor for
the first-time reader, but it is a kick to someone who enjoys lively
cinematography and who has seen OTHELLO several times before.  An interesting
mix: some Olivier-like symbolism (the hanging cage), moderately good acting
(not great, though) and the feeling that you're watching a suspense movie at
times (I half expected Alan Ladd to walk in with a trench coat at the end).

Title
Review for Dead Pool, The (1988)
[also a couple of corrections/additions to the SIFF reviews at the end.
-Moderator]
     Before seeing THE DEAD POOL yesterday, I watched the original DIRTY HARRY
on CBS last Friday.  I enjoy that film a good deal (and also MAGNUM FORCE);
while it's not exactly an even-handed crime drama, it sets the standards for a
character who's gone on for a hell of a long, popular run.  In the early Dirty
Harry films, San Francisco was always portrayed as a place to stay the hell
away from because of those long-haired crazies, some of whom were homicidal
maniacs -- you can always tell these guys because a) they giggle hysterically
all the time and b) Harry says something pithy before slamming a bullet into
their forehead.  And Harry's always portrayed as one of the last few bastions
between Decent Folk and The Crazies, and it's a thankless job....  I believe
that some of my older relatives in Iowa got their ideas of San Francisco (and
California in general) from Clint Eastwood movies.
     The last couple of "Harry" films, however, have spent a lot of time
parodying that image (apparently not well enough, though, since Eastwood got
elected in the Carmel mayoral race -- watching John Vernon ask him for advice
in DIRTY HARRY becomes all the more funny).  Having his dog get blown away in
the last film was taking the "dead partner" bit about as far as it would
stretch, and you felt as if the formula had gotten so re-used that they were
playing part of it for laughs.  Funny, but I missed some of the character and
eccentricities that made Harry such an interesting cop in the first movie -- all
I can remember about the film preceding THE DEAD POOL is that Harry's tag line
is "Make my day."  It's outlasted almost all remembrances of the film itself.
     THE DEAD POOL starts out with several efforts to get out of the rut, and
most of them work pretty well.  Harry has just put a big-time gangster in San
Quentin, and two things have come of it.  One are numerous attempts on Harry's
life by the gangster's associates, which of course he's used to.  What he's NOT
used to is being in the good graces of the department and the public due to his
work, and he has something to say about attempts by the police PR man to make
him a celebrity.  We also have a series of murders going on among San Francisco
movie people, which continues to twist in the film's general "news and hype"
theme.  This is all done pretty well.
     About halfway through the film, though, things begin to return to the
self-spoofing stage, though THE DEAD POOL is more subtle about it than the
previous Harry films.  Also, the city is portrayed in a less gritty manner than
in some of the early films.  Except for kids robbing Chinese restaurants, it
looks like a paradise to me.  The ending is straight formula Harry, and for
that it was enjoyable, but I could have asked for watching the character go
somewhere.
     MISC: There's a great spoof of San Francisco chase scenes towards the end.
Harry's methods are still not very legal, though some of them are
understandable (strikes me that if a guy unloads a machine gun into your car
(with you in it), you can't be faulted too much to shooting him in the back as
he runs away).  The romantic interest in THE DEAD POOL looks like a more
elegant version of Sondra Locke.  I liked his new partner, who can out-one-line
Eastwood at times.
     Basically, worth $4.50 or $5 if you like Harry, or limited crime dramas in
general.  If you an informal Harry-watcher, wait for it to hit the discount
houses.  
Several people have pointed out two mistakes I made in the Seattle
International Film Festivals I wrote: 
     First, that was Kristy McNicol in TWO MOON JUNCTION, not Jodie Foster.
Sorry, it wasn't in the credits of the SIFF program, and I got mixed up and put
Foster's name down.  Lord knows why I would get the two mixed up....  Anyway,
it's a stupid movie, you *still* don't want to see it....
     Secondly, in the Hollywood and the Code retrospective of BORN TO BE BAD, I
mistakenly put down Henry Travers as the obnoxious child actor who played
Loretta Young's kid.  Several people pointed out that Travers was a older,
pleasant character actor who was a Hollywood staple; these days, he's best
known as Clarence the Angel in IT'S A WONDERFUL LIFE.  I got the name mixed up
-- I forgot that in the thirties, child actors got much lower billing than they
do nowadays (unless their name was Shirley Temple), and since Travers was
listed below Grant's name, I expected that was the kid's name (he's on-screen a
lot).  Travers plays a kindly old bookstore owner who is always trying to keep
Loretta Young on the path of virtue.  Good luck!
     One last addendum to the festival: The Market Theater, which closed down a
few weeks ago, has been picked up by the Cineplex Odeon chain of theaters, and
is currently showing DOMINICK AND EUGENE.  I can only hope that, since DOMINICK
AND EUGENE is the kind of film the Market always enjoyed showing, that Ann
Browder and company are still in charge; and maybe -- just maybe -- they can
wangle Cineplex Odeon into using the Market for next year's festival.

Title
Review for Extreme Prejudice (1987)
     Warning: anyone offended by blatant, leering machismo had better avoid
this film.  Or lots of blood & guts, men against men and mano-et-mano stuff.
     In other words, it's a Walter Hill film!  With a John Milius script!  I
always picture these guys getting together and producing a movie between
arm-wrestling matches.  These films always contain male characters I have a
very hard time identifying with, probably due to the likelihood that any
meeting between them and me would result in my arm being ripped off and then my
subsequent death by beating with said limb.  And we got tough guys galore,
here; drug-running banditos by the dozens, all dirty and sweaty and pretty
ill-tempered, overall; a secret task force of army commandos who are in the
area to cover-up (supposedly) any connection between the government and the
drug runners; and lots of shit-kicking Texas dirt farmers who'd as soon shoot
you between the eyes as look at you.  In particular, we got Nick Nolte as one
hard-ass Texas Ranger, Powers Boothe as the drug kingpin, Michael Ironsides as
the leader of the secret army, and Rip Torn as the local sheriff.  Torn is the
sympathetic figure of the group; he smiles before shooting anyone.  As to
women... well, I've never seen Jane Fonda or Meryl Streep in a Walter Hill
film, and at this rate, I doubt I ever will.  Women exist here to look good,
comfort the man, and get argued over.  Gosh!  Just like the old days...
     Frankly, this is a pretty good movie, if you can accept the premise and
can take the macho stuff.  The cinematography is excellent, the cast of
characters is broad and has texture, the script is quite good, and the film
lets you keep up with what's happening yourself, without spelling it out to
you.  I appreciate a film that makes me have to think to keep up.  Finally,
there's lots of Sam Peckinpah slow-motion shoot-ups.

Title
Review for Earth Girls Are Easy (1989)
[Seen at the Seattle International Film Festival]
EARTH GIRLS ARE EASY (USA, 1988)
Director: Julian Temple
Screenwriters: Julie Brown, Charlie Coffey, Terrance E. McNally
Cast: Gena Davis, Jeff Goldblum, Julie Brown, Jim Carrey, Damon Waylans,
      Michael McKean, Charles Rocket
     As Dennis Miller might say, "Hey, what can I tell ya?"  You got your horny
aliens from outer space, who (once they've had the Nair treatment) look just
like humans.  You got your attractive, pleasant, somewhat naive hairdresser
who's looking for Mr.  Right.  You've got that mythical plastic Southern
California Suburban World of beaches, bimbos and blondes to let the cast play
around with.  And you've got 45 minutes of the old "gotta keep the nice aliens
from being discovered" theme, which was getting stale back when Bill Bixby
hadn't even thought about having a weekly green steroid treatment.  What do YOU
think is going to happen?
     Well, you're right.  Outside of some of Julie Brown's bouncy pop tunes,
there isn't much here to entertain.  There's certainly no surprises; I found
about two jokes funny (and a nice shot which is FLY-inspired), and the scenes
with Goldblum (head alien and romantic love interest of Davis' character (and,
I guess, Davis)) and company learning Earth customs is a pale retread of other
pale retreads.  (I can remember the one part I enjoyed -- the prosthetic tongue
scene -- simply because it stood out among such a completely familiar
background.)  Goldblum looks a little uncomfortable, even for a space alien in
California.  Davis holds up well, and you end up hoping that she and Goldblum
had a good time working together again.  Charles Rocket plays his usual role as
the yuppie rotter; he must be sorry that MOONLIGHTING is gone, as it appears to
be the only place he ever got to stretch his talents some.  The only thing I
really enjoyed about the film were the opening credits (you'd think they were
done by Pee-wee Herman), the art direction, and the old SF props/masks/suits
that they got out for Davis' dream sequence.  Other than that, *yawn*.
     I have the feeling that the director and screenwriters saw HAIRSPRAY and
thought they were working at something similar here.  They aren't; HAIRSPRAY is
an immensely well-crafted film that balances its elements with exceptional
precision, and comes out with a film that is parody, satire AND an actual
"teen" film at the same time.  This film just reminds you of how many comic
alien films you've seen before, and that while you might like Julie Brown's
songs, at least they're over in five minutes.

Title
Review for Midnight Run (1988)
     Friday mornings are tough enough to wake up to; however, I have a few
habits which have made the process easier to bear in my twilight years.  I get
up at 6:45, tune the radio to NPR and twist the volume up a couple of notches.
Then I tramp into the shower and wash in a slow-motion manner while my stupor
begins to melt.  About the time coherent thoughts are possible, Tom Shale (TV
critic for the WASHINGTON POST) is on doing one of his guerrilla film reviews,
and that brings me (usually chuckling) to consciousness.  While Shales and I
don't always agree (I like films that he hates), he's so cutting and
inventively nasty that he's fun to listen to, opinion regardless.
     So, imagine my surprise upon hearing Shales' voice boisterously praising a
new film as my senses begin to function.  After checking that there wasn't any
shampoo in my ears, I struggled to hear the name of the film.  Shales actually
*liking* a film all the way through!  What freak of nature had caused this
hiccup in the law of averages?  Some new Dutch wunderkind with a film on lovers
during the Falklands war?  Well, no...it's an *action/comedy* picture!  By
the guys who did BEVERLY HILLS COP, no less!  MIDNIGHT RUN, with De Niro and
Grodin.  While struggling into my rather wrinkled chinos and rugby shirt, I
made a mental note to catch the film that weekend and see if Shales had his
shit together....
     He does.  There have been so many unsuccessful "buddy-buddy" action films
of late that it's easy to be cynical about the whole schtick.  These movies
usually walk too far on one side or the other of the the action/comedy
partition -- too funny to be real, or else the comedy is plastered on with a
trowel, hardly meshing to the plot at all.  MIDNIGHT RUN doesn't have that
problem; suspense is not a put-on to the audience, and the comedy is based
almost entirely on the relations between a series of major and minor
characters.  This film is like some molecular model: everything that happens
results from various supporting characters bouncing into the two main
characters (De Niro and Grodin), who are themselves chained together (often
literally) by their circumstances.  MIDNIGHT RUN walks the razor blade of a
genre film and pulls it off -- completely -- due to the skill of the people
involved.
     Robert De Niro is an ex-cop who works as a bounty hunter in L.A.  He wants
to make one final "midnight run" that'll pay big so he can buy a coffee shop.
He's got scruples and rules that few bounty hunters (and, as it turns out, few
cops) have.  A sleazy local bail bondsman wants him to find and bring back to
LA a mob accountant who skipped bail (Charles Grodin); he needs to be back in
five days.  Unfortunately for De Niro, a lot of other people want Grodin: the
mob, because Grodin stole millions from them and gave it to charity; the feds,
so that Grodin can testify (headed by Yaphet Kotto in his best role in years);
and a bungling bounty hunter brought in when the bondsmen gets worried about De
Niro's chances.  After finding Grodin in New York, De Niro begins a cross-
country trek with his prisoner, who both gnaws and ultimately grows on him.
And at every step of the trip, they find themselves running into or from the
supporting characters.  It almost becomes a ritual, but it gets funnier each
time it happens, and it never slows down.  This film has all the bubble and
bite (and I'm not handicapping it any) of a Preston Sturges film at his best,
and I can't think of a much better compliment than that.  The story holds up
perfectly: everything happens for a good reason and hardly anything is
telegraphed (unless it's intentionally to divert the viewer in another
direction).  The conclusion is especially good, and I walked out vowing to see
this again in a couple of weeks.  I'm looking forward to it, too.
     De Niro plays his role with the hundreds of quirks he puts into any of his
character, physically and emotionally; he can be a clown, but he never mugs for
the camera, and his character is full-blooded.  This isn't ONCE UPON A TIME IN
AMERICA, but he doesn't put anything less into it.  Charles Grodin is just as
good, but his watchword is control.  He could have played this like Tony
Randall, in a broadly neurotic TV-style eccentric.  Here, however, he is
restrained, and gets his laughs from his low-key snipes at just the right
times, and in the right tone of voice.  And he also ends up with a character
who is as three-dimensional as De Niro's; it turns out that both their
characters believe in certain rules, and sticking to them; and both of them do,
and you end up admiring them for it.
     The other actors are all (*all*) top-notch.  As I said, Kotto has a slow
burn in this film that Edgar Kennedy could envy.  The two mob underlings after
Grodin are hilarious; their obvious affection for one another (one is former
pug, and neither is too bright) is another of those bright touches that litter
this film.  Dennis Farina (of the late, unlamented "Crime Story" on TV) plays a
mob boss with the kind of vicious conviction that breaks through that kind of
role.  And Melvin, the bumbling class-B bounty hunter who competes for Grodin
with De Niro, carries out a running gag (there are *lots* of running gags in
this film, and all of them are good) with the best of the slapstick fall guys.
These guys are all archetypes, not stereotypes; they start from the standard
character type and go on from there, fleshing themselves out with each movement
and sentence.  The writer for MIDNIGHT RUN, George Gallo, had these people
pinned down in his head, and with director Martin Brest he brings each to the
forefront.
     Along with BIG, one of the best comedies in the last two years.  Worth
every penny of $5 and then some.

Title
Review for Amazing Grace and Chuck (1987)
Seen at the Seattle Film Festival:
AMAZING GRACE AND CHUCK (USA, 1987)
Director: Mike Newell
Writer/Producer: David Field
Cast: Joshua Zuehlke, Alex English, William L. Peterson,
      Dennis Lipcomb, Jamie Lee Curtis, Gregory Peck
     Every year--every year at the festival, I wait for that film to come
along, that one that just pulls me out of my seat, sticks its face up next to
my nose, and roars "SUR-PRISE!" into my bewildered visage.  It's almost always
a surprise.  It sure as Niflheim was this time.
     AMAZING GRACE AND CHUCK is being advertised as a modern fairy tale, of a
boy in Montana who quits his Little League team for a very unusual reason.
And, in the hands of anyone less careful than the creative staff of this film,
it might very well be nothing more than a fairy tale, where we roll our eyes
occasionally, smirk to ourselves, and maybe get a forced tear out of the eyes
and a "boy, I wish that could happen" sigh out of the lips upon exiting the
theater and tossing the empty Pepsi cup into the trash.  Another E.T.  Another
SHORT CIRCUIT.
     This film floored me, for the simple reason that while it has a fairy tale
concept, the rest of the film takes itself seriously enough, and presents itself
well enough, to make it more of an American folk tale, with characters who are
both icons and real people at the same time.  America has always had its
mythical heros, its Paul Bunyans and John Waynes; this film presents us with
more general, but still universal, ideals: the honest, innocent children who
have their own inner wisdom; the athletes who seem to be amalgamations of
courage, honor, and love for their respective sport; the venerable elected
official who leads with kindness and understanding, but has the grit to get
things done when they need doin' (does the latter sound familiar?).  AMAZING
GRACE AND CHUCK is a showcase for these characters, but it never leaves you
with the feeling that it's artificial, that it stands behind glass, or that any
sharp breeze--or, more importantly, sharp thought--will shatter the wax facade
of the panorama.  This is a very sturdy scenario.  The principals are always
given dialogue, and always give performances--ALWAYS (it just blows me away)--
which made them seem real, yet enforces their particular mythic role.  The
writer/producer, David Field, seems to literally take all the "yeah, but in
REAL life, this would have happen" thoughts you get in your head, sticks them
in the movie and uses them to bend the plot around to his original heading, in
a stronger way then before!  Astounding!  He uses obstacles to the plot to
*enforce* it!  I am truly impressed (indeed, envious) with the skill in which
he wrote the story and screenplay; it's so very unusual, especially in a
Hollywood film.
     I don't want to give too much away, but the basic premise is that Chuck
(Joshua Zuehlke), the Little League pitcher, decides to give up baseball
because of nuclear weapons.  His decision begins an unlikely series of events
that involve another athlete, a Boston basketball player (Alex English),
"Amazing" Grace Smith, and, well, I'm leaving it at that because I wouldn't
spoil this film for you for the world.  Let me just say this, though: I am not
recommending this film because I think it has a great message or because of any
political positions it might imply.  I don't give a rat's ass for the political
point-of-view this film expresses, one way or another; I'm recommending you go
see this film because, and only because, it's an excellent story, told with
excellence.  No, I don't believe what happens in this film could happen in real
life; while I tend to believe the arms control policy of this country is
stilted, I believe in careful negotiations, mutual verification, etc.  Screw
what I think.  The point is, this film is able to suspend my disbelief and tell
a story that is one of the most finely crafted pieces of American Dream I have
ever seen on the movie screen.  This is THE NATURAL and more--all the mythic
qualities without the pretentiousness or the forced feeling of the conclusion,
and a MUCH better script to boot.  It carried me into the beliefs and ideals of
my boyhood--and, more importantly, without any bumps or jolts that would snap
me out of the trance with some hint of self-consciousness.
     Special kudos to: both Zuehlke (a real-life Little League pitcher who was
picked for the part) and English (a forward for the Denver Nuggets) for their
seamless personification of their characters; Jamie Lee Curtis, who takes a
surprisingly small role and makes it exceedingly memorable as Amazing's manager
and friend; William L. Peterson (in a *big* change from his role in TO LIVE AND
DIE IN L.A.) as a father who shows principles without having to stand up and
wave a flag doing it; and Gregory Peck, as the guy we wish Ronald Reagan REALLY
was (and who some numbskulls still probably think he is 


Title
Review for Ben-Hur (1925)
BEN-HUR (United States, 1925, silent)
Director: Fred Niblo
Screenwriters: Carey Wilson, Bess Meredyth
Cast: Ramon Novarro, May McAvoy, Francis X. Bushman
     Well, all in all, I'd rather be in Philadelphia.  This print of the 1925
silent epic (a film which almost broke Sam Goldwyn and MGM) is certainly of
interest to the film historian, archivist, and anyone who needs reminding of
why so few silent dramas are still shown.  It's been a while since I've seen
BIRTH OF A NATION; this production of BEN-HUR made Griffith's masterpiece look
restrained in comparison.  The actor playing Ben-Hur resembled a younger
version of John Lovitz's "Master Thespian" character on SNL -- you can just see
him winking to the other actors and actresses and whispering "I was only...
ACTING!"
     As to the plot, it appears to be Hollywood's effort to turn the Easter
story into a Western.  After beating his Roman enemy in the chariot races,
Ben-Hur becomes the richest man in all the world.  He raises two great armies
that will help Christ overthrow the Roman Empire ("Chapter IV: The evil Pontius
Pilate is building a giant Death Coliseum to destroy the rebel Christian
Alliance....").  But then word comes to him that Pilate is condemning Christ to
death.  Hur leaps onto his horse, yells for his men to follow him, and speeds
away to Jerusalem.  Will he make it in time?  Frankly, I thought SILVERADO did
it better....
     There are other humorous parts.  Ben's mom and sister have become lepers,
and wherever they go, people yell "Lepers, lepers!" in such a way that I was
reminded of Monty Python's "Llamas!  Llamas!" bit.  And, like many films
before 1950, Jesus's face is never shown; what's exceptional about BEN-HUR is
how clumsy they are at avoiding it.  You either see only his hands (sticking
out of the side of the picture like Mr. Hands on the Mr. Bill Show), or they
block his face with someone standing in front of him.  This could have been
done realistically, but it culminates in a scene of the Last Supper where some
guy (the waiter?) stands in front of Christ during the entire scene.  All you
can see is his halo, like a nimbus around the blocking actor...wouldn't it
have been easier simply to put a black square in front of his face, like they
do on 60 MINUTES?
     The Technicolor parts of the film are interesting -- 1925 is about the
earliest I ever heard of color being shown in theaters.  It's used strictly for
the scenes straight out of the Testament, and it gives them a rather
gospel-like look; they resemble the illustrations you find in religious
children's books.  The chariot races scene is exciting, also.  But it won't
keep you entertained for 2 hours, so I'd generally say skip it, except to the
most serious historian.
LINER NOTES:  I stuck around to see the short preceding the next film; it was
Bill Plympton's newest animated short, ONE OF THOSE DAYS.  Unlike YOUR FACE,
this was a straight-forward cartoon short where various pratfalls, accidents
and misfortunes befall a fellow (we see everything from the fellows point of
view).  Rather like a Tom & Jerry cartoon, except that Plympton's art makes it
funnier.  Nothing exceptional, though.

Title
Review for Hôtel Terminus (1988)
     First of all, whatever you think of Marcel Ophuls's work on HOTEL TERMINUS,
a five-hour documentary on the life and career of Nazi war criminal Klaus
Barbie, credit should be given to the man for a priceless piece of historical
evidence.  Ophuls has interviewed hundreds of people who came into contact with
Barbie, and when future historians work on papers dealing with the Holocaust,
and particularly the way the French and Americans dealt with war criminals,
this film will be an invaluable resource.  Historically, this is a gold mine.
     As a documentary for the general public, however, it may be a bit tedious
at five hours long.  Ophuls carefully follows Barbie's escape from Germany
(working as a mole/spy for the U.S. against the Soviets), his escape to South
America, his involvement in murder and fascism while living under a variety of
dictators, and his eventual expulsion back to France to be placed under trial
are followed carefully and with attention to minute detail.  It's fascinating
stuff, but there's a lot of it; if I had it to do over again, I would have
preferred getting it on videotape and taking a few extended intermissions
between stages.
     To be frank, Ophuls's documentary style is often annoying.  Some of his
interview styles seem to be based on the worst aspects of Mike Wallace and
"Sixty Minutes," where he spends more time showing himself being hassled than
concentrating on the subject he's interviewing.  (He also has some far-too-cute
scenes as he works on tracking down some ex-Nazis, acting as if he's looking
for them under greenhouse sheeting.)  However, one can't knock the results, and
Ophuls has some amazing interviews on film.  One who particularly stands out in
my mind is an ex-stormtrooper who talks about his days with Barbie with
nostalgia; the man is hardly the stereotype of evil or ignorance one expects to
be watching -- he's one of the most jovial people interviewed -- but this makes
what he believes, and what he is saying, so incredibly horrible in retrospect.
The man is so familiar in his general attitude and character -- and then he
begins talking about the process of sending people to death camps like it was a
production problem.  Or when several of Barbie's business associates speak of
him, the way that greed has blocked off all their ability to judge...  it is
awful, and at the same time it is very, very authentic.
     If you are at all a student of history, or crime, or some rather ugly
truths about the world, I recommend this film highly, though I might put a
slight recommendation for picking it up when it makes it on videotape.  Rarely
do students of history have such a trove of evidence that is so extensive, and
at the same time, so vivid.  This is the kind of film that could justify the
invention of celluloid by itself.

Title
Review for Witches of Eastwick, The (1987)
     I'm not sure I should be writing a review of THE WITCHES OF  EASTWICK,
because I'm not sure just what the hell (pardon  the expression) was going on
in it.  However, I can express the most important observation I made of it,
i.e. I didn't  like it.  If I had to summarize this film, I think I'd conclude
it was an updating of one of those old New England folk tales of someone
selling their souls to Old Scratch and how they try to get out of the deal.
That's the kernel of it, anyway.  Tossed into this are little bits and pieces 
that occasionally seem to be saying something about men and women, feminism,
the role of the devil, modern reformers, and friendship.  Unfortunately,
little or no effort is ever made to follow up and elucidate on these concepts;
they're simply thrown out and then left to rot while the film goes on apace.
     Actually, I think that most of the audience was even more confused than I
was.  They came in expecting some kind of supernatural comedy, on the level of
GHOSTBUSTERS, and were a bit confused to be getting a folk tale with
philosophical overtones.  They laughed, or tried to laugh, at moments that 
were either barely funny, or much more horrible than funny, as if that could
bend the film away from it's rather frightening direction.  Three women (Cher,
Susan Sarandon, and Michelle Pfieffer) live in Eastwick, a small midwestern 
town.  One night, while drinking late into the evening, they begin wishing for
the ideal man to drop into their lives.   In seeming answer to their idle
daydreams, a wealthy eccentric moves into a mansion on the hill and seduces
each one by attempting to be everything they want him to be.  He soon shows
evidence of mystical--perhaps demonic--power, and his devotion to the women's
merest fantasies or wishes has dangerous overtones.  Even worse, when
ignored his moods become ugly, and he mistreats the women for spurning him.
     Anyway, the problems: all three female characters are fairly 
uninteresting, and several are cardboard stereotypes, especially Sarandon's
character.  We never get inside them, never feel sympathetic to them, because
their dialogue and personalities seem pretty bland.  As for Nicholson, well,
even The Devil needs a direction to go in, and while Darryl Van Horne is the
most interesting character in the movie (due to the grace of the screenwriter
and, more importantly, Nicholson's acting), he still can't be yanked in one
direction and then another without making him a little vague.   And then
there's the special effects.  Not in themselves--they weren't that good--but
their overuse.  I was almost positive, until I saw the credits, that THE
WITCHES OF EASTWICK was either produced by Alexander Salkind (who has turned
out the slop named SUPERMAN II and III and SUPERGIRL), because of the big name
actors in dopy stunts, or Stephen Spielberg, after the 18th vomit scene and
the Nicholson-blown-down-the-street stunt.  Nope, it's another bunch of guys,
and directed by George Miller, who has shown great skill with stunts/special
effects before (THE ROAD WARRIOR, "Nightmare at 20,00 Feet" episode of 
TWILIGHT ZONE: THE MOVIE) but apparently doesn't know when to turn off the wind
machine and let his people act.  F'gawds sake, guys, this is JACK NICHOLSON!
Let him loose!  Let him grin demonically!  Skip the splitting earth and fake
lightning!  Watching the scene where Nicholson is tossed out of the car by the
voodoo doll, all I could think of was, "What a waste".  If you're going to
use slapstick like that, use it up on Pee Wee Herman.
     Nicholson does what he can with the role, and when he can find his
bearings, can be extremely good (the scene in the church, for instance), but
most of the time, he seems a bit stiff, as if he's not sure what he should be
doing next.  And no wonder.  This script goes all over the map, giving you
the feeling that it'd just love to be allegory, but it's not sure about what--
maybe if you give it time it'll think of something.
     So what is THE WITCHES OF EASTWICK?  A horror movie?  A folk tale?  A
comedy?  A statement about women?  An examination of the religious right or
comparitive morality?  I tend to think of the image that seems to dominate the
movie for me...watching someone regurgitate half-digested bits of food and
cherry pits all over rooms, people, the screen, and ultimately, the audience.
In other words, a mess.  Grade: D ($2.00) if you like Nicholson enough to
watch him here; maybe 25% of his charm is able to make it through the logjams
of others.

Title
Review for Un zoo la nuit (1987)
Seen at the Seattle Film Festival:
NIGHT ZOO (Canada, 1987)
Director/Screenwriter: Jean-Claude Lauzon
Cast: Roger Le Bel, Gilles Maheu, Lynne Adams, Lorne Brass, Germain Houde
     NIGHT ZOO had a lot of good "word of mouth" before it reached the
festival, and I was looking forward to seeing it.  Set in Montreal, it talks
about an ex-con named Marcel who is released after serving a sentence for
drug-smuggling.  Upon returning to his apartment, he is rousted by a pair of
sadistic cops who he sold the drugs for; Marcel hid the money before getting
inside, and the cops want it back.  At the same time, his father and he are
estranged, and his father is in very poor health.  As Marcel's situation with
the two cops becomes more tense, the wall between father and son crumbles, and
he plans to take his father away from the cesspool of the city.
     NIGHT ZOO has mainly been praised for being able to move between dark,
very brutal crime drama and the tender relationship between Marcel and his
father.  I'd agree with that up to a point; the scenes with Marcel and his
father fishing, and their gradual reconciliation, are quite good.  However, the
final "hunting trip" at the end just becomes odd, and the drug smuggling plot
is resolved as an afterthought.
     The photography is quite good, and reminded me somewhat of DIVA -- slick
city views, combined with romantic shots of the country.  The story, though,
lacks staying power, and the performances, while good, need more support from
the story.

Title
Review for Raising Arizona (1987)
     Alright, new approach:  I liked RAISING ARIZONA.  Laughed throughout it.
Wanted to write down quotes from it (this film has enough for three movie
quizzes in it).  Absolutely the best "zany" film to come along in two years,
and the finest slapstick I've seen since THE GODS MUST BE CRAZY.  But I came
out realizing that I knew a lot of people who weren't going to like this.  So,
rather than review the film listing the aspects that make the film appealing,
I'm running through points which might dissuade a viewer from enjoying this
film:
WARM HUMAN COMEDY:  This isn't the Huxtables here, folks.  This isn't even
Woody Allen's family in HANNAH AND HER SISTERS.  The Coens (writer/directors of
RAISING ARIZONA) are not trying to have you leave the theater imagining how
pleasant it would be to have dinner with the protagonists; having dinner
with H.I. and his wife and their house-guests would probably be the most
dangerous social visit of your entire lifetime.  However, these characters have
a movie screen between them and us, and this certainly allows the viewer a
certain emotional distance, i.e. you can laugh your ass off about what happens
to them.  We're going for yoks here -- rude yoks, satirical yoks, farcical
yoks, and just plain gut-busting Friday night yoks.  If your diet requires some
emotional attachment to the main characters (say more than 30%), then perhaps
you should skip it.  However, if you're a comedy mercenary, giving no quarter
and taking none, this is meat & potatoes.
UNDERSTATED COMEDY:  Really like subtlety in your humor, eh?  Prefer the
understated, symbolic approach to comedy?  Have an oil portrait of Noel Coward
hanging in your library?  Better avoid RAISING ARIZONA like the plague.  Not
that the humor is crude -- it's not.  As a person who believes that the world
would be a far better place if every print of PORKY'S and its sequels were
buried in a Hanford nuclear waste site, I am in opposition of stupid humor as
much as the next mutant.  The jokes here are not stupid, but their not wearing
much in the way of formal wear, either.  They're not going to politely knock on
your door and ask if they can borrow your expensive brown mustard; they're
going to trudge in through the back door, grab a beer out of the fridge and
sprawl out over the couch.  And you're going to be happy they did, unless
you're picky about these sort of things.
JET PLANES WITH ACCOMPANYING ROCK MUSIC:  No, sorry, no jet planes in this
film.  Some of the characters do talk like Goose, though.
DON'T FIND BABIES OR PEOPLE WITH THICK SW ACCENTS AMUSING: Gosh, I'm not one of
those people you see in the Magic Mushrooms commercials, but I have to admit
that the lil' tykes in this flick are just Gosh-Darned cute.  And I do find
those accents amusing.  I'm from Iowa, and no one ever saw fit to give ME an
accent.  Well, nobody ever said life was going to be fair.
HATE SLAPSTICK:  Well, considering how much bad slapstick there are in movies
today, I can understand your reservation.  However, this is really good
slapstick.  There is a 10-minute chase scene in the middle of this film which
should be used to teach both chase scene dynamics and visual joke-telling.
Absolutely wonderful.
CAN'T STAND TO HEAR BACH PLAYED ON A BANJO:  Look, if Bach hasn't complained
about it, what are you bitching about?

Title
Review for Radio Days (1987)
     I've been a little lax in getting out movie reviews -- imagine that this
is the time to get down to it....
     It's been a Woody Allen kinda week.  Went and saw RADIO DAYS on Sunday,
and then HANNAH AND HER SISTERS (for the second time).  I thought HANNAH was
probably the best picture I saw last year, and my favorite Allen film (which is
taking in a lot of territory).  It dispenses a sense of easy good humor among
the audience, never pushing it, and presents situations with a sense of
familiarity that would be uncomfortable if handled less capably.  It has pieces
of dialogue that are gut-busters, accentuated by the low-key storyline
surrounding them (Max Von Sydow's line about Jesus never fails to make me grin
like an idiot).  Finally, Allen does something he has yet to do in his previous
films: he takes his depressed, if wry, view of life, and gives himself (and
those watching his film) an opening at the end of the tunnel -- or at least a
tunnel one can live with.
     Well, so much for HANNAH -- I babbled glowingly about that last year, and
once is enough.  I didn't like RADIO DAYS as well, but then, I didn't like
anything I saw last year as much as HANNAH, so I guess that's not much of a
criticism.  Good.  RADIO DAYS isn't as easily likable as HANNAH, and it's not
going to win the audiences HANNAH did -- but it's as finely crafted (perhaps
more so), and satisfying in different ways.  While HANNAH celebrates friends
and families as an adult, RADIO DAYS is a tribute to nostalgia: nostalgia of
the family, nostalgia of the world, and the nostalgia of being a kid.  ZELIG
and THE PURPLE ROSE OF CAIRO have had touches of this before (and the "short
story" quality of those movies is found here, too -- the opening sequence about
the burglar winning the "Name That Tune" show from the phone of the house he's
broken into), but Allen drenches this film with it.  Not surprisingly, though,
he knows when to hang it out on the line to let it dry, using a few straying
plotlines about himself, various radio characters, and his family to string us
along.  With someone else (say, oh, I don't know,  maybe....  NEIL SIMON?!),
this could get cloying very quickly; but Allen  managed to turn it around and
get me enjoying the film for the same reasons he seemed to enjoy recounting the
stories: nostalgia.
     When my folks lived in DC during the early 70s, several radio stations
were playing old shows every night.  My parents hold the same affection for the
radio they grew up with (Sky King, I Love a Mystery, The Lone Ranger) as I had
for the TV I grew up with (Thunderbirds, StingRay, UFO); they managed to pass
that on to me, and I spent a year listening to radio more than I watched TV (I
was just past 10 at the time).  The Lone Ranger was a favorite -- I always
loved how, as LR and Tonto were riding off, some schmoe would step in and ask,
"Who was that Masked Man, anyway?"  This, of course, gave the poor innocent
(usually a widow woman/lone rancher & family/grateful sheriff) the opportunity
to say something incredibly profound in tribute about the Masked Rider of the
Plains, like "He's the man who's made The West safe for men, women, children,
and Mormans alike, and has given Manifest Destiny a good name again, By Golly."
We used to laugh at it, but it was always with affection, and I can't help but
think that's what Allen is doing here.  Wally Shawn makes an unlikely Masked
Avenger, but there's a certain thrill when he shouts, "Beware, Evildoers!"  --
radio doesn't play through the speaker in the receiver, but in your
imagination, and it allows you to create a scenario just complete enough to
have some sense of excitement, but private enough that you can laugh at it
later.  On radio, Adam West's paunch doesn't lap over Batman's utility belt
(unless you want it to), and space ships aren't Estes models with sparklers
stuck out the back.  Allen's bouts with unreality seem a little more logical in
a radio world.
     It's funny, in retrospect, that Orson Welles name comes up so often in the
dialogue of RADIO DAYS.  Allen could almost be the Welles of the 80s -- he
makes personal, quality films under his complete control, using a small
repertory group of actors over and over again (note Tony Roberts is in this
one, also -- he seems to be Allen's Talisman, at time.  Oh well, whatever
works...).   A Mercury Theater for the movies.  One wonders if he sees the
similarities, too.  Anyway, Allen continues to produce his yearly snowflake,
different from the previous film, and the next film, but with features of both.
I hope he goes on making them for a long, long time.
     Finally, if the film has done nothing else for me, it's given me something
to shout next January 1st, other than "Happy New Year!"...

Title
Review for Fatal Beauty (1987)
     I try to avoid hyperbole when I review anything, and most of the time, 
it's pretty easy to do.  Most of the films I go to see are fairly close to the
median thumbs-up/thumbs-down line, and then a few are memorably good.  Most
rare, though, are the films that are so bad that I get *angry* that I am
sitting and watching the drek.  Even worse is seeing a talented script or
actor wasted by bumbling direction or a stupid plot.  But those are very rare.
     They happen, though.  I *HATED* FATAL BEAUTY.  The term "mindless 
violence" is a cliche that is used far too often when reviewing action films,
but it is totally appropriate here.  A undercover narcotics agent tracks down
a couple of psychotic thugs passing out quick-killing cocaine.  Lots of people
get shot.  A mall gets destroyed.  MTV music in the background.  Well, let's
see, black comedi{an,enne} + cop + violence + rock music = BEVERLY HILLS COP!
Gosh, I love a film where the marketing strategy is almost displayed in the
opening credits.
     Of course, other films have risen above pedestrian plots.  They have good 
characters.  They have a good script.  They have good actors.  Well, FATAL
BEAUTY has a very good actress, but I only know that because I saw THE COLOR
PURPLE and JUMPIN' JACK FLASH (where she showed through some pedestrian
material).  There is not a character in this film that I could *stand*, much
less like, much less care about.  Goldberg's fellow cops are crude, cruel
Neanderthal bumpkins who appear to be there so that  Whoopi can one-up them
with similar humorless comebacks.  Really, this is thirteen-year-old "dirty
humor."  The plot is transparent.  The criminals are crazy, but their familiar
psychos.  And people change character like an on-off switch.  There's a
Beverly Hills mother who doesn't care that her kid got arrested and works at
playing an incredible bitch for the first time she's on.  Then, her son slits
his wrists, and, *bang*, concerned mother.  Whoopi says, after the mother has
supplied the name of the cocaine dealer who gave her the coke she gave her
kid, "you're beautiful."  Right.  Got that.  Blech.
     Script -- everything was telegraphed at least an hour ahead of time.  
Acting should be changed to over-acting, even Whoopi -- her tale of why she
hunts down drug dealers with such fervor is tacked into the last third to
provide her 3 minutes of acting potential, but to no avail; I was so numbed by
that time to notice even a glimmer of talent.  The clumsiness of the plot
dominated everything.
     And, of course, the pity is that Whoopi Goldberg can play interesting 
characters; she can keep a lame script going.  She is one of the few 
actresses who seems to be given heroic action roles.  Great!  Now could 
someone **PLEASE** give said role a script that hasn't been produced by 
some PR research dweeb!  But she has to take some of the blame herself; I 
cannot imagine how a film this bad could look good in script form.
     This is, by far and away, the WORST film I have seen this year.  Even 
worse than that Australian horse picture I saw at the festival.  I would have
walked out, but it was the first part of a double feature.
     Oh, the following film *seemed* to be better; but FATAL BEAUTY could make 
GILLIGAN'S ISLAND look promising in comparison.  It was SOMEONE TO WATCH OVER
ME, a 30's style love/thrill story that Ridley Scott has reanimated 
wonderfully -- he is perhaps the only person alive who can still make New York
look glamorous.  Good acting, solid script and characters, FANTASTIC music and
cinematography.  A simple plot with a MAJOR stumbling block of a plot element,
something too large to enjoy; but worth $3.

Title
Review for Comic Book Confidential (1988)
     A form of graphic storytelling receiving more and more critical and
popular attention over the last decade has been that of the comic book.  (I
hesitate to even mention the B-movie this summer.)  COMIC BOOK CONFIDENTIAL
tries to overview the history of comic book art in the US, from its inception
in the early 30's to the present, and also to underline how much things have
changed (and have not changed) since their initial spurt of popularity prior to
World War II.  Given that I have a rather long-lived interest in the subject of
comix, it's a bit difficult for me to rate this film in regards to the general
viewer; suffice it to say that, overall, I thought the film presented an
accurate, well-organized and (most importantly) interesting history of comix in
America.  I have a few quibbles, but I'll get to them later.
     The film is divided into sections, describing a time period or a close-up
on a particular type of comic book that dominated the period.  The body of the
film consists of covers and artwork from comics being examined, interviews with
the people who produced them, newsreel footage and period music (much of this
dealing with the Wertham "Comics and Delinquency" scare that occurred during
the 50's).  The periods generally covered are: the Golden Age of comics and
comics during WW II (with William M. Gaines, Jack Kirby and Will Eisner);
changing times after WW II: Eisner's THE SPIRIT, the EC Horror/Crime/MAD
series, and the subsequent comic book scare and the Comics Code (with Gaines,
Al Feldstein, and Harvey Kurtzman); the return of the Super-Hero (with Stan
Lee); the Undergrounds (with Robert Crumb, Spain, Victor Moscoso, Gilbert
Shelton, Dan O'Neil and Kurtzman); comics and art (particularly RAW magazine,
with Art Spiegelman, Charles Burns, Francoise Mouly, Harvey Pekar and Sue Coe);
and finishing up with a potpourri of new favorites, including Lynda Barry, Bill
Griffith, Jaime Hernandez, Shary Flenniken and Frank Miller.
     The interviews are short and to-the-point, and most of the speakers are
interesting, the exceptions being Lee, who always seems to be a parody of the
show-biz agent; Kurtzman, who seemed rather withdrawn when speaking, and Sue
Coe, who was driveling art-speak [prejudice alert!]  The rest are pretty good,
with the Eisner, Flenniken, Barry and Hernandez segments exceptionally
engrossing.  The underground segment in particular is well-covered, with a
particularly good Crumb interview (you could just see the thought balloons over
his head :-) ), and some interesting comments from Shelton and Dan O'Neil
(where *does* that guy hang out?).  Many of those interviewed read from their
works, one of the few gripes I have with the film -- it hardly adds to the
appreciation of the work being described, and the story is rarely aided by the
creator's attempt to do voice characterizations for all of her/his creations.
(I'd put Hernandez and Flenniken down as the only two exceptions there.)
     Overall, I found it entertaining and informative (what you're interested
in), and a pretty solid overview of the subject.  Unless the subject of comix
leaves you completely cold, I think you'll enjoy COMIC BOOK CONFIDENTIAL.

Title
Review for Aladdin (1992)
Short, concise review:
    I HAD A GREAT TIME.  IT WAS MUCH BETTER THAN "CATS."  I'M GOING TO
    SEE IT AGAIN AND AGAIN.
I leave the amazingly-detailed, minutae-infested reviewing of this film
to Kathy Li, and provide some short, non-spoiler observations on
ALADDIN:
 * I haven't had this much fun at the movies....  Honest-to-God, folks,
   I plan to go see this at least two more times.  Yes, the animation is
   very good, yes, the it has fine songs (which I plan to listen to on
   the CD when I get the chance)...
   Okay, short and sweet -- I went with two other people, and we were
   still buzzing about that film hours later over a late dinner.  I
   laughed at the gags, I laughed because I enjoyed the characters and
   the situations; in short, I had a helluva good time.  Definitely my
   favorite film of the year, and one of the five best films (I think
   ... well, let's wait until MALCOM X and A FEW GOOD MEN come to town.)
   But skip all that good/bad crap.  It was fun.  *FUN*!!  (And if
   you're a fan of classic Looney Toons animation:
   >>>>>
 * I think that this is something of a departure for Disney (at least in
   their animated feature-length film area), in that some of the humor
   is, well, wacky.  Looney.  Tex Avery/Bob Clampett like.  There are
   fourth wall gags in it.  There are references to other Disney films.
   In other words, they're occasionally winking at the audience this
   time -- not what you expect from Disney.  However, I don't think it
   hurts the story any.
   The gags aren't all over the place -- much of it is the usual Disney
   slapstick/character humor.  However, humor does seem to have it over
   romance this time around (at least compared to THE LITTLE MERMAID and
   BEAUTY AND THE BEAST).  Perfectly valid change in the recipe; as you
   can tell from my yammering, it went down very well.  (Frankly,
   though, it would be hard to imagine casting Robin Williams in a part
   like this, and then expecting him to just read his lines....)
 * Regarding The Williams Boy: Technology is a wonderful thing.
   Whenever we've heard Robin Williams do his improvisations, he's been
   handicapped by having to channel all that energy through a mortal
   shell.  From now on, all Robin Williams comedy routines should be
   animated, because this medium was designed specifically for him.
   Frankly, I missed 1/3 of his gags, because I and the audience were
   laughing so hard at the previous ones.  (Again, this is defintely a
   more-than-one-viewing film.)
   Really, it's a shame that the Academy has shifted to giving Best
   Actor awards, for the most part, to non-comic performances.  If
   Williams does as well as I suspect he may with Levinson's TOYS,
   this could be a killer year for him.
   (P.S.  This is the first, and I suspect only, time I have ever
   enjoyed seeing Gilbert Gotfried in anything.)
 * Technically, it's very good.  I've probably seen better individual
   examples of various bits in other animated films (mostly Disney)....
   But it's right up there.  (The rug is particularly impressive.)  I
   think the songs are less memorable (on their own) than those in THE
   LITTLE MERMAID; in how they're "staged" in the film, I think they're
   every bit as good as those in BEAUTY AND THE BEAST.
 * Yes, the inevitable comparison:  I liked it differently (but as
   well) as THE LITTLE MERMAID, and more than BEAUTY AND THE BEAST.  I
   love good romance, but I like to laugh; and Hell's bells, I'm glad I
   didn't cough up a lung.
P.S. Just to satisfy curiosity (I missed it in the credits): who did the
    voice of the narrator/peddler who opens the film?  Williams?
P.P.S. Damn, do I want this on laserdisc!  (I and the rest of the Holy
     Trinity who accompanied me to the film (Jerry Boyajian and Rob
     Ferguson as The Holy Ghost) would gladly sell Jeffrey Katzenberg's
     soul to get a good, letterboxed CAV edition of this film tomorrow.
     (But, given JK's position, it's probably too late.))
P.P.P.S.  My remaining question: What will Dan Parmenter find horribly
     wrong with this Disney film? :-)

Title
Review for Trancers (1985)
TRANCERS (USA, 1982)
Director: Charles Band
Screenwriters: Danny Bilson, Paul de Meo
Cast: Tim Thomerson, Helen Hunt, Michael Stefani, Art La Fleur
     This film is probably familiar to those of you who have righteous cable
service, but to those of us who don't, it's a mystery.  It was made before
BLADERUNNER or THE TERMINATOR, but it has elements of both.  Set in the
future, we have tough cop John Death (Tim Thomerson) tracking down Trancers,
mutants who can make "weak-minded" people turn white, froth at the mouth, and
obey their every whim (rather like some TV evangelists I know of).  The leader
has headed back into the past, to kill the ancestors of the Los Angeles 
council, thus causing their future offspring never to exist.  Death is sent
back to the past to stop the plot, and gets messed up in the kind of senseless
violence you'd expect in this kind of film, at time having to out-run bullets,
elsewhere almost being tanned to death.
     Good maniacal fun, lots of neat parts, and a very clean plot that
makes sense and is clever to boot.  It's a good idea to remember that it
precedes those other two SF movies, since so many of the elements are similar.
A grade of C, B if you're at a midnight movie to see it.
Moriarty, aka Jeff Meyer
INTERNET:     moriarty@tc.fluke.COM
Manual UUCP:  {uw-beaver, sun, allegra, hplsla, lbl-csam}!fluke!moriarty

Title
Review for Batman (1989)
     Between all the hype and anticipation surrounding this movie, I've heard a
good deal of discussion about whether the new film will be "true" to the Batman
character.  That was not one of my concerns when entering the theater.  Over
the last 50 years, Batman's gone through any number of conceptual revisions:
he's been the grim spooky loner created by Bob Kane; the gimmicky detective
with the boy sidekick; the TV camp buffoon; and the obsessed, driven vigilante
who is probably over the edge of sanity.  My feeling was this: Tim Burton could
do damn near whatever he wanted to do with the character, as long as he made
the film work.
     With that said, this film is a mess.  A visual treat of a mess, but still
a mess.  If it was meant to lean towards satire/spoof, it's not nearly funny
enough.  If it's meant to hold together as drama/action, the characters are
cardboard, and the plot is pockmarked with holes towards the end.  In any case,
the script and dialogue (with the frequent (but not continual) exception of
Jack Nicholson's Joker) isn't exceptional to entertain on it's own; it usually
keeps moving (the major exceptions are the scenes which seem tailor-made to be
used for the Prince MTV video for BATMAN), but it's all over the place.  The
conclusion suffers through Siskel & Ebert's "handy stupidity" theory, where
people act ridiculous to keep the plot moving.  And there were so many
sequences that seemed either unclear or muddled that I wondered if a lot of the
film had been cut down from the original length, or that some of the footage
just didn't come out, and they had to make do with what they had.
     As to the acting, Michael Keaton looks *damned* uncomfortable.  I still
think he could have made a decent Batman, because he has shown the ability to
throw out a lot of intensity in his previous roles.  Here, though, it's
monotone -- a stoic obsession that barely filters through his costume.  He's
given a few opportunities to escape this as Bruce Wayne, but it's almost as if
he were still playing it in costume.  Jack Nicholson is fun to watch here, and
he is definitely given the lion's share of good lines in the film, but this is
not the "exceptional performance" I've been reading about in film magazines.
It's over the top, and he's definitely having fun with it, but it's on the same
par as John Lithgow's Dr. Emilio Lizardo.  Kim Bassinger plays her usual
damsel-in-distress character; she ends up looking almost as strange as Batman
and the Joker.  The other characters (outside of Alfred) aren't given much room
to move in; Billy Dee Williams, as DA Harvey Dent, is the only law enforcement
official who appears to have his act together.  (And, if there's a sequel and
he follows the comic book scenario, he won't be working for the DA's office for
long.  :-) )  Jerre (sp?) Hall walks in and out, and Jack Palance can still
hiss like a sunuvagun.  My favorite bit character was Bob, the Joker's chief
henchman, who played the repo yard mechanic in REPO MAN.  Oh, well.
     The visuals in this film, though, are gorgeous, and almost make up for the
rest of the film.  Gotham City is a dingy fantasyland, Wayne Manor is a
moribund crypt of vengeance, and the Batcave is lovely.  This is not a
surprise; visuals and miniatures have always been Burton's strong suit, with
his background in animation.  There's a scene with the Batmobile approaching
the Batcave which is very well orchestrated between camera, music and visuals.
The music by Danny Elfman is somewhat tinny at times -- almost like BEETLEJUICE
over again.  I can't stand Prince, but even if he was Peter Gabriel, the
backdrop of the Joker's music video escapades wouldn't have helped.
     So, what's the verdict?  Some of my disappointment could be put down to
over-advanced hype, but I think most of it has to be laid at Burton and Hamm's
door.  I'd put this on a par with INDIANA JONES AND THE TEMPLE OF DOOM: a
roller-coaster ride (but with better effects, and a tolerable, over-blown
ironic/tragic air).  No depth whatever.  If you like a visual movie well
enough, go see it (and see it in 70MM for that reason); otherwise, go find SAY
ANYTHING or FIELD OF DREAMS at your local repertory theater.
     Overall, I thought the first half of the film was slow, but held together;
the last half faster, but started to fall apart early on.  On the good side,
the introduction of Batman on the roof I liked; and the drive with Vale to the
Batcave was great.  And the visuals of the Batplane over the city were a
pleasure to see -- the entire art direction kept the brooding feel glued on.
A few complaints/comments (I'm more amused than anything by this stuff):
Query #1: Where exactly *are* the Gotham City Police during the Joker's
balloon/money hoo-haa?  As far as I see, these guys only appear after they're
all holed up in the church.
Query #2: Why does Vale try to drive off without letting her reporter friend in
the car?  Never figured that out.  (Not to mention why he throws himself on the
hood of the car -- I'd put that down to "stupidity providing plot
opportunity".)
Query #3: It's just barely explained that the Joker is trying to make people
believe that his white-face is makeup -- why is this?  Is the flesh-makeup his
"secret identity."?  
Character Concept Problem: OK, I can buy Batman with guns, but firing missiles
into a crowded street?  Attempting to murder the Joker in cold blood?
(Punching him over the edge of the cathedral.)  Blowing up the gangsters
headquarters with them still in it?  I guess this is a Batman whose first
interest is definitely vengeance, over justice or protecting the innocent.
Judge Dredd in a Batman costume...  Perhaps it was Burton's intention, but I
felt that Batman, while not portrayed as a villain like the Joker, is portrayed
as a fairly negative character.  Fine -- but that doesn't jell with him posing
for his legendary shot in the final scene of the movie.
More on Nicholson:  Yes, there were some funny lines, but some of it (like the
TV commercials) became tedious fairly quickly.  Like Keaton, I thought he could
have done a better job with a better script.  I'll be curious to hear how much
this film deviated from the early revisions of the script by various netters
who read it.
The Ending: So, Vicki Vale gives up her award-winning career as a hostage, err,
I mean a photographer, to be the Batman's lover?  (Licking her lips in the back
of the limo....  I guess Alfred's kind of immune to odd behavior by then.)
Well, she does have a thing about bats....  (I did like the bit between them
about "trying to love one another" -- had a certain sadness that the movie
could have used more of.  Made me wonder if the ending had been changed to make
for a "happy" conclusion.)  Also, the police are awfully quick to turn over to
Batman's side at the end; but then, they were basically straw men throughout.
     There are probably more glitches if I thought about it, but I'll leave it
at that.  Overall, I wished they'd cut much of the background hooplah that went
on during Prince's songs, and spent the time filling in some of the gaps in the
film.

Title
Review for Wives Under Suspicion (1938)
The following films were part of William K. Everson's "Hollywood and the Code"
series at the Seattle International Film Festival.
A KISS BEFORE THE MIRROR (USA, 1932)
Director: James Whale
Cast: Frank Morgan, Paul Lukas, Nancy Carroll, Jean Dixon, Gloria Stuart,
      Walter Pidgeon
WIVES UNDER SUSPICION (USA, 1938)
Director: James Whale
Cast: Warren William, Gail Patrick, Constance Moore, William Lundigan,
      Ralph Morgan
     In this double-feature, Everson gave us a rare opportunity to see how the
same film fared when it was shot before and after the institution of the code.
What's more, it had the same director, and even better, an excellent one: James
Whale, who is best known for FRANKENSTEIN and BRIDE OF FRANKENSTEIN.
     A KISS BEFORE THE MIRROR tells the story of a husband in Vienna (Paul
Lukas) who shoots his wife when he finds her in a tryst with her lover.  His
old friend and lawyer (Frank Morgan) takes on the case.  Lukas tells Morgan how
he slowly began to suspect his wife -- one incident in particular is used to
illustrate the moment he *knew* she was cheating on him.  Morgan begins to
become obsessed with the case -- so much so that he first begins neglecting his
younger wife, and then suspecting her of infidelity herself.  There is a *lot*
of playing with the characters and audience's heads; we're often wondering if
it's all in his mind, or whether he has reasons to believe it's true.  It
becomes obvious about halfway through that it *is* true, and Morgan begins to
use the case to psychologically torment his wife (ah, Vienna waits for you),
describing how he will show Lukas was justified in shooting his wife for her
unfaithfulness.  Lukas, paradoxically, is telling Morgan not to kill his wife,
because he realizes that his life is now empty without *his* wife, whether he
is convicted or not.  By this time Morgan is somewhat mad, and his speech to
the jury is fantastic and impassioned -- which works, and Lukas goes free,
waiting to leave the country long enough to convince Morgan not to commit
murder.  There is a scene at the house where Morgan and his wife reconcile --
an excellent scene, and really not melodramatic at all.
     This is a quality film throughout, part thriller and part melodrama, but
mixed well and given the sophisticated "European" flavor many of Whale's films
had.  The sets were, in fact, leftovers from FRANKENSTEIN, which could explain
why the prosecutor's office looks like a dungeon in a castle (you ought to see
what Lukas' cell looks like...).  The film didn't create much of a stir with
the reformists, apparently -- Everson says that films set in Europe could get
away with a good deal more, since the public viewed Europeans as lacking the
moral fiber of Americans.  Good character performances and production values,
and very well shot.  Not a classic, but enjoyable to watch.
     Years later, Universal wanted Whale to recreate his success of A KISS
BEFORE THE MIRROR by refilming it in a B-picture, WIVES UNDER SUSPICION.  It
was something of a step down for Whale (he had finished SHOWBOAT and was then
began being assigned to lesser films); apparently, the studio was trying to get
rid of him -- while his films returned their investment several times over,
they were usually more expensive than average.  Anyway, the story of A KISS
BEFORE THE MIRROR had to be horribly mutilated to fit within code guidelines.
Everson pointed out that the lower quality of WIVES UNDER SUSPICION was partly
because of it's B-movie status -- poorer actors, cheaper sets -- but the film
obviously has a lot of other problems, as well.  First, it's set in some big
city, with Warren Williams playing a crusading DA who decides to prosecute a
professor who kills his wife.  The fellow tells the same story from the first
film, and Williams begins to suspect his wife.  However, here it is obvious
that she is totally faithful to him, and that they are all delusions on his
part -- the Code couldn't let any hint of impropriety *actually* be going on
without the wife being punished.  It ends in a particularly stupid, boring
manner, which fits the rest of the movie.
     The husband, as played by Williams, is supposed to be a crusading DA, but
instead comes off as an insensitive dickhead, the kind whose noses Nero Wolfe
and Archie Goodwin enjoyed twisting in Rex Stout's novels.  And the wife is
hardly sympathetic after uttering one of the worst intentional racial slurs
I've ever seen on the screen (or Everson's -- he said this was crude even by
late-thirties standards) to the horribly stereotyped black maid in the film.
For all the Code's talk of censoring racially offensive material from the film
industry, this is obviously evidence that it was paying only lip service to its
doctrine.
     I doubt you'll ever see this film, even on TV, but if so, switch it off.
However, A KISS BEFORE THE MIRROR is worth a glance; an entertaining example of
elegant melodrama, which they certainly don't make anymore.

Title
Review for One Hour with You (1932)
Director: Ernst Lubitsch, assisted by George Cukor
Screenwriter: Samson Raphaelson, based on a play by Lothar Schmidt
Cast: Maurice Chevalier, Jeanette McDonald, Genevieve Tobin, Roland Young,
      Charles Ruggles
     I must admit, I am not a fan of the musicals.  Sure, the Gene Kelly films
are watchable, especially AN AMERICAN IN PARIS and SINGIN' IN THE RAIN (what
did they feed Donald O'Connor in those days?  Rocket fuel?).  And while most
Astaire movies can't hold my interest all the way through, they contain moments
of pure open-mouthed miracles.
     But that's mostly due to the dancing.  Any film where an actor suddenly
looks to the upper left or right corner of the screen, opens his or her mouth
and begins to warble causes me to roll my eyes heavenward.  First, I'm not much
of a lyric appreciator, and secondly, the performances are very unconvincing.
Mainly, though, how many of your friends explain their feelings to you in song?
In the middle of a crowded railway station?  I think you see my point.
     ONE HOUR WITH YOU, however, has several things that make it bearable
through its length.  Ernst Lubitsch directed, with an assist by George Cukor,
Hollywood's all-around handyman director.  The lead actor is Maurice Chevalier,
and while he may be corny at times, he is corny with such enthusiasm (and "with
this out-RAGEOUS French Accent, you stupid English types!"), that you can't
help smiling.  There are even a few tunes that I was enjoying ("Oh, that
Mitzi!" is played to the hilt), and Lubitsch manages to get an extra-martial
dalliance past the censors -- the man was unmatched in getting sophisticated
humor to the audiences of his day.  The supporting cast is fine, with Jeanette
MacDonald showing none of the sappiness of her Nelson Eddy days, and two of the
best supporting comic actors of the day, Charles Ruggles and Roland Young.
     It's fluff, but it digests easily, and doesn't outstay its welcome.  They
certainly don't do it like that anymore....

Title
Review for Weapons of the Spirit (1990)
     This is not a particularly good world, or a good country, or a good era,
for idealists to live in.  Cynicism is easily promoted in almost every moral
and ethical area involved in our lives: scandals in religion, conflicts of
interests in politics, general apathy in dealing with what once were national
ideals.  Humanism is also a difficult standard to hold forth on, what with
portions the world trying to kill other portions over religious, political, or
ethnic differences.  Belief in "good" begins to wane after the constant
bombarding of reports of mankind's inhumanity to itself, and what little of it
comes our way via the media is treated with a healthy dose of skepticism.
     Pierre Sauvage lives in this world, and this country, and this era also.
He is a documentary filmmaker, of Jewish decent, and by his own account, a
fairly cynical human being.  During World War II, his parents were on the run
through France, trying to escape capture by the Gestapo or the French
sympathizers, the Vichy government.  They were taken in and hidden by a group
of farmers in the village of Le Chambon-sur-Lignon, where Sauvage was born.
They escaped from there several months later, and left for America, but Sauvage
grew up with a great curiosity about the people who had hidden and protected
his parents and himself during a period when the rest of France were deporting
Jews to the death camps.  His parents did not like to discuss this period of
their lives, so Sauvage began doing research on his own.  There was few, if
any, documents to go on, but as he progressed he came upon more and more
instances of Jewish refugees who had been hidden, fed and sheltered by the
villagers of Le Chambon and its neighbors.  Five years ago, he decided to visit
Le Chambon and investigate; his documentary, WEAPONS OF THE SPIRIT, is the
result of his investigations.  Sauvage attended the showing of his film at the
Seattle Film Festival, and talked about how the history he uncovered had
radically changed his life, and how he viewed the world.  No wonder--I strongly
doubt that anyone who sees this film can go away from it unchanged.
     Between the fall of Paris to the Germans, and the German retreat, the
lower half of France was ruled by the Vichy government, a French government
ruling with the permission of the Nazis.  The Vichy government took it upon
itself to label, persecute, and finally export Jews to the death camps, unlike
other occupied countries which refused to collaborate with the Nazis in this
task, and forced the Gestapo to hunt for Jews themselves.  However, in the
south-east section of France, there was a small community where no Jews were
ever exported.  What is more, a large number of Jewish refugees were taken in,
fed, housed, and hidden from both the Vichy representatives and the Germans.
These people were strangers to the villagers of Le Chambon and its neighbors,
families fleeing from various threats and just passing through this part of the
country.  Yet the people took them in, and took more and more in as the war
progressed.  These people were not paid, were given nothing other than help in
doing farming chores (when possible) and the thanks of people who were, at that
time, used to isolation from those who were not of their religion.  Le
Chambon-sur-Lignon had a population of approximately 5000 people, and during
this period, they had as many as 5000 Jewish refugees hidden throughout their
town and province!  That is approximately one Jewish family for every house,
farm or apartment in this area.
     Sauvage talked to many of the older villagers who were involved in this
"conspiracy of kindness," to ask how it was done, how it was accomplished.  He
asked one old woman how the refugee support was organized.  "Organized?!" she
said.  "If it was was organized, it would never have worked!"  No one person
was the ringleader, though the parish priest was instrumental in introducing a
general moral conviction to his parish, through his sermons; this way, no one
person could be interrogated for the information.  Besides the providing of
shelter and food--and this was perhaps the most difficult part, because many
of the occupants of Le Chambon were literally peasants--the villagers also
managed to support a center for making forged documents for the Jewish
refugees, and schools for their children.  And through all this, they
maintained a united, pacifistic front to the Vichy government, and later, the
retreating German army.
     Throughout it, Sauvage continually asks, "Why?"  Why would they risk the
lives of themselves and their families, go hungry at night, spend their money
supporting people they had never met, and almost certainly would never meet
again once they left Le Cambon?  Time after time after time, these quiet,
smiling people would answer back approximately the same thing:  "Why, what else
could we do?"  "It was the only thing we could do."  "It was a tenet of our
faith."  They all seemed to respond with polite surprise, as if wondering how
they could not practice the lessons of the faith that they followed.  Le
Chambon and its vicinity is made up of the descendants of the Huguenots, French
Protestants who were themselves persecuted for several centuries previous to
the turn of the century.  They are a very spiritual community, but tolerant of
other faiths; the Jewish faith was practiced in sod houses and apartments
throughout this period, with nothing but respect and deference given by their
Christian hosts.  And their history was full of stories of martyrs to the
Huguenot faith; decades later, they would find that Le Chambon could still,
tragically, produce those who would die for their religious and spiritual
beliefs.  I am an agnostic, and have become more and more skeptical of
organized Christianity over the last several years; but this film shows the
caliber of people who practice the Christian faith in their every action, who
do not quibble over differences in the letter of their Bible, but try to
practice the spirit in which it is written.  I am glad to see such examples of
what this religion is capable of; I hope others will remember it, when faced
with the latest exploits of those who use Christianity as a vehicle of hate.
     What is perhaps most unusual about this film is how it documents the
infectiousness of the kindness practiced by these people.  While the Jewish
population was hidden, they were not being kept in basements or root cellars
during this period.  The amazing solidarity of the entire community made it
possible for these people to wander around; if anyone from out-of-town asked,
they were told that these people were visiting relatives, or people vacationing
from the city.  The falsified documents were provided quickly, and the
surrounding countryside became a haven underneath the Nazis' noses.  Moreover,
records show that Vichy officials assigned to the area, people who had been
assigned to live in Le Chambon from other parts of France, regularly overlooked
the refugees (they could not have missed them--many examples of this are
given), and sent in reports to their superiors informing them that "no Jewish
activity" existed in Le Chambon.  Later, when the Germans retreated through the
town, constant examples of the German Army looking the other way occurred with
almost clockwork regularity.  It is as if the miasma of concentrated goodness,
of love, overcame much of the prejudice and evil exposed to it, so that many
people, soldiers who were butchers elsewhere, seemed to put down their hatred,
if only for a time.  Unfortunately, Klaus Barbi, the Gestapo monster currently
on trial in France, finally got wind of Le Chambon.  He was not able to flush
the Jewish community out, for the Germans were finally being forced to flee
from France, but his henchmen broke in and captured and exported several groups
of Jewish children, killing the local people hiding them, or shipping them off
to death camps along with the Jews.  The parish ministers and the local
schoolmaster would have gone to the camps themselves if it had not been for the
local Vichy official, who convinced his headquarters that these men knew
nothing about any Jewish encampments in the area (the official definitely knew
otherwise).
     And then the war was over; the refugees scattered to the four winds, and
the villagers of Le Chambon-sur-Lignon went back to their daily world of
growing crops and livestock.  They constantly seemed surprised that Sauvage
came back to see them; "We didn't do that much--we did what anyone would have
done," says one old man.  I find tears on my face when thinking back on this
scene, about this man's modesty and his assurance that the rest of the world
has the quiet strength and courage of will that he himself possesses.  Sauvage
thinks that may be the most important message that this film can pass on: that
it shows people, "ordinary" people, who are heroes in every sense of the word,
through their day-to-day sacrifice and their refusal to be intimidated into
doing what is truly wrong, and to remind us that we, too, have the potential
and the ability to be as heroic as these people are.  What a wonderful world we
would have if people such as these were truly "ordinary!"
     As a film, B+.  As an experience that you should not deny yourself, A+.  I
hope WEAPONS OF THE SPIRIT makes it onto PBS or to your local theater in the
near future; I cannot imagine not getting something positive out of this film.
See it.

Title
Review for Mitt liv som hund (1985)
Seen at the Seattle Film Festival:
MY LIFE AS A DOG (Sweden, 1985)
Director: Lasse Hallstrom
Screenwriters: Lasse Hallstrom, Brasse Brannstrom, Pelle Berglund,
               Reidar Jonsson, from the novel by Jonnson
Cast:  Anton Glanzelius, Anki Liden, Tomas von Bromssen, 
Melinda Kinnaman
Sub-titled
     Several years ago, I saw FANNY AND ALEXANDER, Ingmar Bergmen's
(supposedly) last picture, which was being hailed everywhere for its beauty and
the lightness of tone it contained (especially when compared with much of the
directors other work).  While I found the film satisfying, I still thought it
fairly stuffy and certainly overlong.  Its imagery promoted a romantic air, but
the ethereal script left little to support it.  I came away feeling vaguely let
down.
     MY LIFE AS A DOG is everything I expected FANNY AND ALEXANDER to be.
While it contains little of the cinematographic skill of Bergmen, its settings,
its characters, and especially its script, have made it one of the best "life as
seen through children's eyes" films I've ever seen.  This is up there with TO
KILL A MOCKINGBIRD and MY BODYGUARD (better than the latter, I think).  The
story centers on a young boy, something of an eccentric, who lives in a city
apartment with his older brother and his invalid mother.  His experiences are
related as flashbacks between his staring into the stars.  As his mother
worsens, he is sent to his uncle and aunt's place in the country, a town built
around a glass factory, and made up a variety of wonderful eccentrics.  It is
that kind of place that Dickens or Capra could create, and so many have tried
to imitate; here, it is done successfully.  Gene Siskel used to give his
highest ratings to films that contained places he'd like to visit, people that
he would like to talk to.  MY LIFE AS A DOG has that in spades--you want to
see it another time for the same reason you look through a photo album.
     I'm not sure I could talk about the acting here; each person seems to have
disappeared into their role with such abandon that it is difficult to think of
them as having a life outside their character--which, I guess, is the point.
How this boy comes to grip with the course his life takes is bittersweet, but
never depressing; joyful, but never saccharine.  His friends, his relatives...
all are done with a wonderful, ordinary sense of joy.  Let me tell you that the
audience was laughing throughout this film, but not harshly; and I noticed that
they were also smiling constantly, which is a sign I value even more.   The
director, who appeared afterwards, received a three-minute standing ovation; it
was, I think, deserved.  It is interesting to note that, according to the
director, it was not planned for foreign release; however, he says the same
reactions we displayed during the film seem to be universal in audiences of
other countries.
     The best film of the festival so far.  A+.  5.00+ value.  I urge you very
strongly to see this if it plays in your town.  It has an American distributor,
and hopefully will be making the rounds soon.  I really cannot see you being
disappointed; from all accounts, no one here (and this a Friday Night
audience) was.

Title
Review for Pastime (1991)
[Moderator's note: I am splitting these reviews up by country, because I
have to split them up some way.  I am not trying to be provincial. -ecl]
We were supposed to see this last year, but there were production
problems and it didn't make it.  The story of a good-natured,
positive, rather corny minor-league baseball player well past his
prime (William Russ) who befriends a young black player (Glenn
Plummer) in the late 50s.  A nice, quiet film with a love for baseball
and some very good, understated performances.  A lot of people who saw
it disliked the way the plot turned; I'll just say that the film went
in a different direction than I thought it would, and while I was
somewhat disappointed, I still thought it a valid and engaging story.
The director showed up to talk about the film afterwards; my one
kernel of advice to him would be to tell the audience about his vision
of the film *through* the film, and skip the expositions from the
pulpit.
Larry (THE STUFF, Q, IT'S ALIVE) Cohen's latest.  Cohen's usual weird,
campy style is here, and the cast is certainly interesting, but the
film lacks the strong central plot device that drives his other films
so well.  Beautiful girl (Janine Turner of NORTHERN EXPOSURE, the most
attractive woman on television (IMO), in a small role) with diabetes
is hustled into an ambulance after suffering from a fainting spell --
brought on by obnoxious Eric Roberts trying to pick her up on the
streets of New York.  The girl and the ambulance disappear, and
Roberts, playing a comic book artist for Marvel Comics (his character
is constantly nagged by Stan Lee for art (*right* -- I bet Stan
doesn't even know where Marvel's offices are these days)), tries to
track the girl down to rescue her.
That's generally the story.  What fun can be derived from the
proceedings are gotten from the supporting cast; while Roberts plays
the sort of obnoxious character he's so good at (maybe he's a
pleasant, quiet fellow in real life), the second bananas are quite
good.  James Earl Jones is only on for about 10 minutes, but his
incredibly paranoid, gum-chewing police detective is one for the
books.  Megan Gallagher (late of HILL STREET BLUES) does a commendable
job as Robert's investigative partner.  And if anyone told me that Red
Buttons could put in a good performance...  His impression of an aging
Daily News Jimmy Olsen is worth a look.
The thing runs on too long and takes it's own sweet time getting
there; Robert's romantic resolution gets a chuckle out of you, but
that's about it.  Wait 'till it hits cable, and then only for mondo
video connoisseurs.
Before embarking on his honeymoon, an artist (Colin Firth) returns
home to his cabin to discover his newlywed wife gone, and a cryptic
message saying "I don't know who you are."  He goes to nearby Los
Angeles in search of her, and therein lies the tale.  It's an
interesting enough thriller, with some nice sardonic touches (mostly
from an artist friend of the husband, played by Billy Zane) and L.A.
humor (my God, it's got its own genre), but FEMME FATALE ends up with
some thriller psychology which is just too much to swallow, and a
conclusion which is completely bogus; from a distance it looks
romantic, but given any thought, it leaves one rather queasy.  Sort of
a domestic male fantasy.  Not recommended, but points for good
cinematography.
Well, there's weird, there's funny, there's funny & weird; and
sometimes there's just plain weird.  This is the latter.  Rubin
(Crispin Glover) is a completely spaced individual who lives in his
mother's hotel.  Ed (Howard Hessman) is a self-improvement course
drone, in charge of bringing in new recruits.  Rubin agrees to come to
a meeting if Ed will help him bury the body of his cat (which has been
residing in Rubin's freezer) in the desert.  And as you might guess,
Rubin and Ed get on each other's nerves a lot.
Not much else to say.  Hessman does a good job with what he's given,
but there's no way you're going to make these two guys much fun to
watch for any period of time.  There's some clever camerawork at
points, but even that seems to dry up over the course of the movie..
There's always something about Glover that makes me uncomfortable, and
here it's his character's main point.  (Oh, Glover was scheduled to
talk after the movie; he showed up, but decided not to talk to us.
That Dave Letterman sure is a good judge of character...)
Yup, *that* HEAVEN'S GATE.  However, this is the complete, uncut
version that was shown to such disastrous reviews in New York, and
which led to the producers cutting the film down to two-thirds it's
original running time before giving it nationwide release.  (Three
hours and 40 minutes.)
So, you ask, is it that bad?  Well, there's nothing that makes you
want to stand up in the theater, point to the actions on the screen,
and scream in disbelief; but if I'd been one of those New York
critics, the last 15 minutes of this film would have left me in a
pretty savage mood, too.  The rest of the film never gets worse than
being just pointless, though the sound is surprisingly bad, and the
all-star cast has very few stand-out performances.  John Hurt has some
good lines (and his scene right before the intermission is a beaut),
and Jeff Bridges continues to demonstrate that he simply cannot put in
a bad performance, but everyone else takes a lesson from Kris
Kristofferson and puts forth a tree-like visage.  The final hour is
brutal and nasty but appears to have nothing to say, except "evil rich
people win quite often."  It shouldn't take 3.5 hours to do that.
Oh boy, another hip low-budget L.A. drug-and-crime film; I was hoping
they'd gone out of fashion when Vestron Pictures folded. Couldn't they
have just stopped after TO LIVE AND DIE IN L.A.?  Fashionable
up-to-your-hips swearing, really kinky villains, and a plot that you
just know was punched together with cries of "just like Raymond
Chandler!"  Maybe if Marlowe was still alive, he'd be running around
with Jennifer Beals, but by God, his plot would be tighter than this.
Billy Zane plays the handsome petty crook caught between nasty kinky
drug kingpins (a psychotic bodybuilding homosexual killer; how
original) and nasty smelly cops (Darren McGavin, playing it way over
the top.)  If you have any doubts as to how this film ends, you must
only see about two films a year.
ONE FALSE MOVE (USA, 1991 (World Premiere)):
This is a film in the spirit of the old Warner crime pictures; not
quite film noir, but not DRAGNET, either.  A trio of criminals go on a
killing spree in L.A., and then head across country to the home town
of two of the members, in Arkansas.  The L.A. police decide to set up
an ambush for them, and enlist the help of local sheriff Dale
"Hurricane" Dixon, a gung-ho cop played by Bill Paxton who is looking
for a chance to prove himself.  The film falls basically along those
lines, with a lot of good suspense camerawork and music.  It does bog
down before the climax with some unexpected bathos, but the finale has
all the irony any film noir fan could want.  The cast is fine, without
any standout performances.
If you like the genre, this is a decent example of it.
THE SEARCH FOR SIGNS OF inteligent LIFE IN THE UNIVERSE (USA, 1991 (World 
Premiere)):
Yup, it's the filmed version of the famed Lily Tomlin/Jane Wagner
stage play.  It's a stage performance where a number of characters,
all played by Tomlin, perform vignettes which are loosely tied
together.  The character who wanders through most of these, Trudy (?),
a bag lady with extra-terrestrial connections, zips in and out and
links things together a bit.
I haven't seen the stage play, so I can't comment on how it stands up
to that; I can say that I enjoyed the film version quite a bit.  I
ended up seeing about three "stage performances" on film this year,
and Tomlin's is by far the best; the material by Wagner is sharp and
funny and has the habit of turning on you and making you think -- a
process enhanced by that looney, thoughtful smile of Trudy.  The film
tends to suddenly jump between Tomlin playing her characters in
costume (and sometimes on a set) and her live on stage in slacks and
blouse.  I'm not sure I see the reasoning behind it, but it doesn't
distract from the performance.
The showing I saw was the world premiere; Tomlin showed up at the
theater before the screening, dressed in a cross between a Cannes
stereotype and Werner Fassbinder, and did a brief, funny bit thanking
the Festival committee.  Afterwards, she got up and talked about
production for about 30 minutes; she was obviously exhausted (much of
it emotionally -- it really was the first public screening, and she
was nervous about the audience's reaction.)  Very gracious, very
funny, and very informative; the film was made for less than $2
million (gads!), and she wished she had more money to do some more
re-editting on the film.  She jokingly referred to the Robin Hood
re-editting brouhaha when she said she had the print to SEARCH locked
up in her apartment, under her pillow.
I admit a bias for Tomlin and Wagner's humor in the first place, but
even so, I think this is a film you'll enjoy.  Tomlin said the film
will probably be out in October, from Orion, I believe.  I recommend
it to you unreservedly.
SCORCHERS (USA, 1991 (World Premiere)):
A very well-done play-to-film adaptation dealing with two basic
stories in a small bayou town in Louisiana.  The first is a wedding
between a young local couple (Emily Lloyd and James Wilder), the
problems the girl has with her wedding night, and how her father
(whose name I've forgotten -- I voted for him two times in the Golden
Space Needle ballot (Rob!  Oh, Rob!)) helps her deal with it.  The
second is a conversation at the local tavern between the bartender
(James Earl Jones), the local drunk (Denholm Elliot), the local madam
(Faye Dunaway) and a jilted wife (Meg Tilly).  As you can see, helluva
cast; of the two plots, the first comes off semi-successfully -- Lloyd
and the father go back and forth between real emotion and a sort of
syrupy sweetness; but the second ensemble makes the film worth every
penny of admission, as Jones and Elliot and Dunaway go on a verbal
romp, dealing with everything from drinking to marital infidelity to
understanding classical music.  Jones and Elliot are a delight to
watch together, and Dunaway hasn't been this good in years -- saucy
and cynical and a treat to look at and listen to.
The other standout performance is the actor playing the father, who
does a four-minute monologue to the camera at the beginning which is
absolutely riveting and smile-inducing; the director, David Beaird,
came on afterwards (very impressive, very polite and really gave me
the impression that he knew his stuff) and said there was a chance
that might get cut out of the film, as funding was up in the air as of
two months ago.  He was dead-set against cutting the sequence, and the
audience certainly showed their support for his position.  Apparently
SCORCHERS wouldn't have gotten made if Lloyd and Jones hadn't
committed to it at the beginning -- an interesting aspect of
movie-making.
Fully entertaining $5 picture.  Hope you get to see it.

Title
Review for Ping Pong (1986)
Seen at the Seattle Film Festival:
PING PONG (Great Britain, 1986)
Director: Po Chih Leong
Screenwriter: Jerry Liu
Cast: Lucy Sheen, David Yip, Robert Lee, Lam Fund, Victor Kan
     I'll be darned....  Another 'A' film, to take its place alongside AMAZING
GRACE AND CHUCK, MY LIFE AS A DOG, and WEAPONS OF THE SPIRIT.  The name of this
film is PING PONG, and it tells the story of Sam Wong, an elderly Chinese
patriarch living in England who dies and leaves an explicit and aggravating
will behind him.  Called in to supervise the carrying out of the will is Elaine
Choi (Lucy Sheen), a young law clerk who is Chinese only by her birth--she
possesses little of the customs or culture of her native land, and is forced to
come face to face with much of these customs (and the way they clash with
modern English life) through her efforts to have the will executed.  The story
is told with a good eye for the humor of many of the situations she finds
herself in (as well as the clashes in cultures), as Elaine tries to bring the
threads of the deposition of Sam's wishes together.  Blocking her are Sam's two
sons, one ostracized by his choice of an Anglo wife, the other because of his
renouncement of Chinese customs (he is a blatant Oxford man, and he runs an
Italian restaurant).  Also, Sam's wife, who wishes one son to take over Sam's
restaurant, and another to accompany Sam's body back to China.  Also, a
daughter by an earlier marriage wants to receive more than what she was given
in the terms of the will, and her husband, who deals in illegal gambling, wants
to use the restaurant to further his games.  And finally, a hilariously
out-of-touch old friend of Sam's, who thinks the authorities have been trying
to extradite him for the last thirty years, despite his citizenship.  Elaine
must try to get both the signatures, and the agreement, of all these parties.
     Along with the humor of the film, several other elements compete for
attention: a strain of suspense, in relation to the gambling husband, and a
large portion of mysticism, which appears in the oddest places, especially
around a Chinese TV series about a Woman Warrior, and the farm that the old
friend of Sam's has inherited.  Finally, there is the mystery of who Sam Wong
was phoning before his death--his body is found in a phone booth behind his
restaurant.  However, the clues in this mystery are not hidden documents or
bloodstains; they are touches of Chinese mysticism which lie just below the
surface of the world Elaine finds herself in, and she cannot begin to solve the
mystery until she begins to acknowledge the existence of this Chinese magic.
     Several plot threads seem disparate during the course of the film; it is
impressive how they are fused and molded into the delightful conclusion of this
film.  The cinematography and editing of this film are wonderful; I wouldn't
have expected it in a film of this type--I think that much of the Chinese
mysticism would never come off it without the wonderful shots inside the
church, and the concluding scenes on the farm.  The acting ranges from good to
suburb, the latter in the actor who plays the elderly, slightly out-of-touch
friend of Sam's who thinks all Anglos are after him to deport him.  Lucy Sheen
is not outstanding, but her air of level-headedness and slow delight in the
people she must deal with are perfect for a character who is the central thread
to this story.  It is an essential part, and she carries it out well capably.
     But finally, the director Po Chih Leong must be given the greatest amount
of credit, for making the conclusion of this film so emotionally satisfying--
the past and the present cultures are resolved in both the characters and the
mystery of Sam Wong's passing.  One of the best endings I can remember in
months--clever and tremendously satisfying.
     An 'A' film--of any of the films at the festival, this is the one I would
like to see again soonest (like RIGHT NOW).  I suspect that it may be better
the second time around, that there was enough cleverly-hidden symbolism that I
missed it the first time.  Perhaps not as emotionally satisfying as AMAZING
GRACE AND CHUCK or MY LIFE AS A DOG, but close, and even more intellectually
satisfying.

Title
Review for Mississippi Burning (1988)
     It was only a matter of time before the Civil Rights movement became a
background for a Hollywood production.  Periods of history where great evils
are most apparent have always been tableaus for drama, and the ignorances and
atrocities and courage which dotted the South during this period are fertile
ground for this.
     MISSISSIPPI BURNING not only uses Mississippi in the early 1960s as it's
setting, but it uses the events surrounding the murder of three civil rights
activists as the basis of the story.  Unfortunately, what director Alan Parker
leaves behind are the facts of the case.  He shows the FBI as being the force
behind bringing the murderers of the three young men, spearheaded by a younger
Justice Dept.  administrator (Willem Dafoe) and an older, Southern-raised agent
(Gene Hackman).  He tosses in a romantic interest for Hackman, whose assault
rankles him to try to find the murderers even if he has to break the law to do
it.  And Parker basically sets the audience up to cheer on the FBI as they sink
down to their opposition's level.  It's history throttled, minced and served up
in ROCKY IV style, pandering to the Friday night crowds.
     In truth, the FBI (dominated by J. Edgar Hoover, who felt that much of
the civil rights movement were sponsored by Communists) put nowhere near the
force into the field to investigate the murders (the killings did take on
national attention, as two of the activists were white).  The murderers were
finally convicted by a bribe to one of their members, not investigations done
by the FBI.  Apparently, history didn't give Parker the happy ending he was
looking for, so he decided to change it, along with many of the events that
surrounded the case, to "make a better movie."  Throughout this film, I kept
wondering why Parker hadn't made his film a fictionalized story set during this
period, but without alleged roots in the events of this case.  My only
assumption is that to Alan Parker, an Alan Parker film is more important than a
misrepresentation of one of the more important events of the 1960s.
     And this *is* an Alan Parker film.  Hollywood cliches are stuck in left
and right, particularly the old hand/young reformer saw represented by Hackman
and DaFoe.  Almost everyone is a stereotype, which leads one to wonder whether
the stupidity and bullying and violent ignorance displayed by the Klan and
their ilk are due to bad breeding or bad writing.  If you've seen TV footage of
this period, you'll know it's not bad writing, but the level of the rest of the
film brings that into doubt -- everything is so over-played that the brutality
of these people fades in comparison.  Even the carnage is stamped with Parker's
particular visual amplification; when the Klan bomb a Negro household with a
can of gasoline, not only does the house explode, but the fence and the mailbox
outside the house explode.  I think we get the picture, Alan.
     There are a few good points in the film.  Both Hackman and Dafoe valiantly
attempt to make their characters break out of their two-dimensional roles, and
Hackman succeeds at points due to sheer acting skill and stage presence.  But
all in all, it looks tailor-made to reap Oscar awards (as it already has Oscar
nominations); Hollywood likes nothing better than to applaud a film that pats
itself on the back.  The South advanced away from prejudice mostly through the
courage of black Southerners who risked their lives and their families
well-being to take a stand, with little support from government agencies until
the very end.  Watching DaFoe and Hackman ride off into the sunset, with black
and white children singing together, is sugar-coating what happened in the
worst way; it's almost as if Parker had never left advertising for feature
films.  Like, shouldn't they be holding cans of Diet Coke?
     If you'd like to see something that's twice as moving as this film and one
hell of a lot more accurate, I recommend renting EYES ON THE PRIZE, a six-hour
video documentary of the Civil Rights movement which shown on PBS last year,
and is available at local libraries and some video stores.  I guarantee you
that you won't be missing anything of interest that MISSISSIPPI BURNING has to
offer by watching this instead.  Unless you really enjoy exploding mailboxes.

Title
Review for Bill & Ted's Excellent Adventure (1989)
     Well, I have to make it unanimous.  There is something disarmingly
pleasant about BILL AND TED'S EXCELLENT ADVENTURE, and it is certainly a very
funny film, though it gets by on a premise I usually find tedious to the
extreme in a comedy.  In other words, the Laughing at the Dolts syndrome, where
the main source of humor is a group of individuals so dumb that you laugh at
them.  For instance, I don't like the Three Stooges, Jerry Lewis or any film
with Burt Reynolds and Dom DeLuise together.
     But... but there's something about Bill and Ted, two clueless dudes from
southern California whose rather dense reactions to the most bizarre
circumstances kept me a-grinnin' throughout the majority of the picture.  I do
admit that the premise got things off to a good start -- it turns out that Bill
and Ted's music will someday bring Earth to an age of Utopia (water slides and
everything, dude) -- but without the help of their ancestors, they'll flunk
their history paper and be split up when Ted's dad sends him to the military
academy.  The paper, which is supposed to be an exposition on how various
historical figures were react to being introduced to the California mini-mall
culture, is turned into a research project when Bill and Ted are handed a time
machine and decide to "go bag some historical figures, dude!"  You can take it
from there...
     While much of the humor from comes from watching Bill and Ted's
single-minded quest, there's a pleasant, humorous aura around the rest of the
film.  Little background details, like Billy the Kid and Socrates learning to
play Nerf Football in the background, and Bill's reaction to his step-mother
(nubile and only a few years older than himself) add a gentler strain of humor
than some of the more apparent slapstick.  There are slow spots (the trip to
the future, and some gratuitous water-sliding by Napoleon), but the rest is
constantly entertaining, with even a few time-travel tricks I've never seen
done in a film before (and taken to a fairly hilarious point).
     Sure, I could say that seeing Abraham Lincoln saying "Party on, dudes!"
made it all worth while.  But that would be selling BILL AND TED way short.
Hell, there's 50 zillion summer films heading your way at breakneck speed; get
a little spring humor under your belt before you try swallowing a BATMAN and
STAR TREK combo.
     And remember... be excellent to one another.

Title
Review for Desire (1936)
The following film concluded William K. Everson's "Hollywood and the Code"
series.
DESIRE (USA, 1936)
Producer: Ernst Lubitsch
Director: Frank Borzage
Cast: Marlene Dietrich, Gary Cooper, John Halliday, William Frawley,
      Akim Tamiroff, Ernest Cossart, Alan Mowbray, Zeffie Tilbury
     When watching old films, every once in a while you come across a real gem;
sometimes it's one that has been remarked upon, like BRINGING UP BABY, and
sometimes it comes out of the blue.  Here's one of the latter, a romantic
comedy which is a pleasure to sit through, and a star combination (Cooper and
Dietrich) which is dazzling to watch.  It was picked for the "Hollywood Code"
series due to its producer's ability to weave innuendo with innocence; in a
film that deals with a jewel thief's attempts to smuggle pearls, it's ironic to
see how Lubitsch smuggles Cooper into Dietrich's bedroom, and gets her off
scott-free at the end, even though she is definitely a con artist throughout
the film.  It's a pleasure to watch -- it's clear that the two have been
sleeping together, but any attempts by the censorship board to bring it up
would have looked foolish; Lubitsch's genius is how he made it appear that the
censors had dirty minds!
     A brief synopsis (I wouldn't want to spoil it for you): The opening shows
how jewel thief Dietrich pulls off an immensely amusing heist of a pearl
necklace.  On the run to Spain, she runs into (literally) Gary Cooper, a
Detroit automobile engineer who is taking two weeks vacation in Spain before
returning to the U.S.  Of course, they fall for each other, but there are some
nasty people after Dietrich on both sides of the law, and it's up to ol'
Montana Gary to get the lil' lady out of it.

Title
Review for Beetlejuice (1988)
     Well, I'd give BEETLEJUICE a rather high rating, but I have to point out
something first.  I've seen the director, Tim Burton's, other work, namely the
Disney shorts "Vincent" and "Frankenweenie" (I exclude PEE WEE'S BIG ADVENTURE
only because I think that film conformed to Paul Reuben's concept more than
Burton's), and I have loved his sense of style and humor.  It's silliness, but
silliness that draws upon an almost cartoon- like attitude and a bright
lampooning of certain cinematic fashions.  "Vincent" had send-ups of the
Corman/Price Edgar Allen Poe works, and "Frankenweenie" contained howlers from
the James Whales FRANKENSTEIN films -- an impressive achievement, considering
how well Mel Brooks mined this subject in YOUNG FRANKENSTEIN.
     BEETLEJUICE is no exception; it's got more imagination and cleverness (in
both visually and in the script) than anything else I've seen this year.  I
wouldn't highlight anything for you here, because it's too much fun to discover
what Burton has done with ghost story conventions.  For the most part, he tends
to provide a pretty logical hierarchy for the land of the undead, though he
leaves a few things (like the Sandworms and the fates of several characters) up
in the air (ha-ha).  Most of all, though, the film is a whirling dervish of
visual gags; while the special effects are primitive at points, the imagination
with which they are used makes up for any lack of technical shine.  If you like
Warner Bros. cartoons, I really think you'll like this; it contains a lot of
features which are personally appealing but not universally appealing.  Let us
just say that if you liked his earlier short films, you'll like this one.
     The last scene (Belafonte was never so good!) will last me for a long,
long time -- what a bizarre, beautifully goofy fantasy!  A big thumbs-up for
me -- worth $6, or twice at $3.50.
-----
Footnote:  Saw BEETLEJUICE for the second time last night, and whatever
reservations I had about the film in my previous film, scratch them.  The sound
was much better during this showing, and being able to comprehend more of the
lines (especially Keaton's), I think the show was firing on all eight
cylinders.  A $5.00 film, easily, and my favorite movie so far this year.

Title
Review for Untouchables, The (1987)
     It strikes me as appropriate that THE UNTOUCHABLES comes out approximately
ten years after STAR WARS opened, because this film belongs to a tradition that
began with George Lucas's classic space opera, the high-charged "Summer
Spectacular" (nit-pickers could argue that Spielberg's JAWS began it all, but
there was too many lackluster summer seasons between JAWS and the next
blockbuster hit, STAR WARS, for me to set the origin at that point).  This is a
film that is purely entertainment, with elements and composition that brings
viewers back for that most essential blockbuster ingredient, repeat viewings.
Since STAR WARS, studios and filmmakers have tried, like cinematic alchemists,
to come up with the proper incantations that will give them another summer
megahit on their hands.  THE UNTOUCHABLES is the latest attempt, and may very
well be the film that manages to get the ring for this summer.
     Which is fine, from my perspective, because THE UNTOUCHABLES is a pretty
good film, and is certain to entertain you, unless you MUST see something
original and touching every time you visit the theater.  I think the best way
to think of this is that you're going to see a 30's Warner Brothers crime film,
updated with modern violence, cinematography, dialogue (very good dialogue),
and a moral dilemma to keep those of you who need that kind of conflict happy.
     The film opens with Elliot Ness, Treasury Department agent, coming to
Chicago with orders to work with the Chicago Police to tear down Al Capone's
"criminal empire."  Due to corruption and lack of enthusiasm by the police,
Ness decides, under the counseling of an older cop named Malone, to form a
small strike force which will take Capone on.  And for the rest of the movie,
they do....  As I said before, since this is almost a homage to the gangster
pics of yore, the ingenuity of the plot isn't what's going to enthrall you,
it's the atmosphere--how well does the filmmaker bring you into the genre
without moments of self-consciousness about what's going on.  Brian DePalma has
done a magnificent job in that category, from the script to the cinematography
to the music to the shot-by-shot composition of the sequences.  David Mamet has
come up with the sort of pithy, witty dialogue that bubbles only out of movie
characters' mouths.  The cinematography is some of the best I've seen all year,
with wonderful point-of-view shots that swoop down on Capone's meetings and
sweep into beautifully restored Chicago streets.  The film has just the right
amount of sepia color to it, giving the feeling of period without making you
feel that the movie is encased in amber.  The Ennio Morricone music is perfect
for carrying the enthusiasm and suspense that is appearing on the screen.  But
most of all, DePalma's direction is tight, yet full of imagination; there are
sequences here which really carry you along with the plot, that get you excited
simply from the way that they're shot.  It is really refreshing to see after so
many films that use boilerplate composition.  The camera serves the plot, but
it also serves the purpose of film--to see in ways that we don't normally see.
     The acting is adequate, if not inspired; the roles are played effectively,
but none stands out as a knockout performance--the story comes first, and the
story calls for villains and heroes, not complex characters.  Ness himself is
the only person in this movie who questions what he is doing; but his emotional
turmoil over doing what is right without letting "the end justify the means"
takes a back seat to the action of the film.  Costner does not play Ness as a
bright man--he is serious, somewhat lacking in a sense of humor, and has a
righteous attitude which sometimes sounds like something out of the BATMAN TV
show ("Let's do some good!").  The supporting characters, while being even less
three-dimensional, are supplemented with more of the outstanding, highly
entertaining dialogue and actions.  Vincent Canby is right, I think--Sean
Connery hasn't had this good of a role in years, and his lines are by far the
best.  Charles Martin Smith plays the accountant-turned-gangbuster with his
usual youthful exuberance.  Robert De Niro, who seems to be specializing in
great villains of late, turns Capone into a charismatic brute; he often sounds
like one part politician mixed with two parts successful regional sales
manager--until a quick snap of violence reveals him for what he really is.
     But the credit here has to go to DePalma, for producing such an utterly
riveting action/suspense entertainment.  Very well done....  B, $5 film.
P.S.  Yeah, I recognized the Eisenstein sequence, too--I was chuckling as I saw
it build up (as did the rest of the audience--I guess film classes are de
riguer in Seattle).  Every film critic in the country has seen fit to mention
it in their column; after all, they don't want anyone to think they've never
taken a basic film class.

Title
Review for Dominick and Eugene (1988)
DOMINICK AND EUGENE (United States, 1988)
Director: Robert M. Young
Screenwriters: Alvin Sargent and Corey Blechman
Cast: Tom Hulce, Ray Liotta, Jamie Lee Curtis, Todd Graff
     This, I believe, is a good sign.  When a film this good appears this early
in the festival, it usually means that, statistically, other good stuff will
follow.  And DOMINICK AND EUGENE is the best film to appear at the SIFF so far;
it's the best film I've seen this year, for that matter.  By the time I've
written this and posted it, it will be in your local theater, and my one
recommendation is GO SEE IT.  You will not be disappointed.
     The film tells the story of two brothers living together in Pittsburgh.
Eugene (Liotta) is an intern at a local hospital; Nicky (Hulce) is a garbageman
putting his younger (by 12 minutes) brother through school.  Nicky is "slow", a
lumbering child who's simple nature and gentleness is endearing to those around
him (a family friend tells Eugene that Nicky is "God's child").  When Eugene is
offered a chance to study at Stanford, he is torn with the idea of either
leaving Nicky on his own, or uprooting him to take him to California.  The
situation is complicated as he begins a romantic affair with another intern
(Curtis, who has an enviable track record for appearing in excellent films).
And finally, there is a situation that Nicky stumbles upon that has haunting
repercussions to both his and Eugene's past...
     I haven't a criticism of this film.  Not one.  The story unfolds
carefully, bringing the audience into the small group of friends; it walks the
fine line of sentiment without ever becoming cloying.  The dialogue is
wonderful -- funny, startling, heartrending.  And the acting...this film is an
actor's treat.  Curtis performs the task (again) of creating an immediately
likable character without artifice.  Tod Graff, as Nicky's co-worker and
(eventually) pal Larry, balances being a jerk and a friend with precision and
charm; he underscores Nicky's particular talents, and in the end you realize
that Nicky is less intelligent than Larry in only a few areas.  I haven't
enjoyed this kind of role so much since James Woods played Aldo in EYEWITNESS.
Ray Liotta (SOMETHING WILD) is perfect, as a man who is torn between his love
for his brother, his fear for their future, and his memories of the past.  His
performance is the very definition of the word "controlled."  In any other
film, his work would stand out as phenomenally good; here, he meets and matches
the high level of quality seen elsewhere in the film.
     Tom Hulce (Mozart in AMADEUS, ECHO PARK), however, is the thing one
carries away from DOMINICK AND EUGENE.  As Nicky, his performance is...hell,
I can't come up with an adjective that won't sound overblown.  Inspired to the
point of genius.  He is be able to be a child, a man (frustrated and
courageous) and an innocent concurrently and without a seam.  The line between
actor and character are never there -- Hulce *is* Nicky, and when he becomes
riveting it seems entirely in character.  And he is electrifying here -- I can
imagine no other actor who could have pulled this role off -- not after viewing
Hulce's performance, anyway.  There is a scene where the camera stays on
Hulce's face for several minutes, inter-cut with scenes that appear from his
point-of-view; he says nothing, his face is in shock, and he can not be looked
away from.  Amazing.  There are lines which are every bit as emotionally
rending as anything Marlon Brando did in Hulce's mouth.  Over the last few
years I've come to the conclusion that the Academy Awards are royally fucked,
but if Hulce isn't nominated for Best Actor, they need to have their collected
membership put out on an iceflow.  From where I sit, it seems unlikely that a
performance of this caliber will occur over the next year.  This surpasses the
last stand-out performance I can remember in film (Klaus Maria Brandaeur in
MEPHISTO) by a good ways.  Hulce's role as Nicky will be a milestone for years
to come.
PS: I can't see not enjoying this film as entertainment, so don't be put off by
my accolades.  This is a movie worth seeing several times over.
LINER NOTES:  Hulce, Director Young and producer Marvin Minoff were there
afterwards.  The level of questions was even poorer than usual ("Hey, Tom, you
married?"  "Did you become emotionally involved with your character during the
filming of DOMINICK AND EUGENE?"  Please, if you're ever at a film festival,
don't ask people questions just to hear the sound of your voice.)   The film
should be in the theaters when I write this (saw the Film Festival showing last
week) -- wish I could have gotten it out sooner, but...

Title
Review for Housekeeping (1987)
     Here in Seattle, HOUSEKEEPING is being advertised, first and foremost, as
a Bill Forsythe film; images of his past works--GREGORY'S GIRL, LOCAL HERO, and
COMFORT AND JOY--are promoted in the trailers, and you might well think that
HOUSEKEEPING will be more of the same: a slightly spacey, gentle comedy.  It is
spacey at times, and there are prevalent elements of humor (more of them
towards the beginning), but it is more of character study than anything.  Two
young sisters are left with their grandmother before their mother commits
suicide.  The two girls grow up in very small lumber town near Spokane, until
their grandmother dies when they are entering high school.  Then their aunt,
played with distracted charm by Christine Lahti, moves into the house to take
care of the girls.  However, her casual, undisciplined manner fails to provide
much of a structure for the girls, and the older sister begins to rebel against
her Aunt's eccentricities--she wants a more normal lifestyle.  The shyer
younger sister, Ruthie (who is the narrator of the film), finds her aunt more
appealing, and a friendship begins to develop after a time--thus causing
friction between the sisters, who have only had each other to depend on before
this.
     As I said, there is humor here--Lahti's odd antics often bring out a
smile.  But there is a lot of sadness here, too, and something of pain;
Ruthie's ostracization from her sister is particularly resonant.  And Forsythe
tries to get in all sides of each of the characters; one understands, even
accepts as valid, the position of the elder sister; and the townspeople, while
narrow-minded, are shown as primarily kindly-- which makes their final
persecution more distressing.
     In short, I enjoyed this film greatly, but would not recommend it to
everyone I know--those who are looking for a standard Forsythe comedy should
look elsewhere.  If you don't mind a slow pace and can enjoy carefully-crafted
characters coming of age in a remote setting, then I think you'll find it a
rewarding film.
     A question to those who read the book: does it end so abruptly in the
novel?  Please send E-mail to me, or put a SPOILER warning in the subject line,
so as not to spoil the ending for others.  Thank you.

Title
Review for Lethal Weapon (1987)
     LETHAL WEAPON tends to be one of those marginal, on-the-border films; its
qualities and weaknesses are glaring, and tend to cancel one another out.  The
story, which is nothing special, centers on an aging family-man police
detective (Danny Glover) who is saddled with a series of drug-related crimes
and a new partner who is rumored to have a death wish (Mel Gibson).  Together
they begin to track down the men behind a multi-million dollar drug smuggling
operation, which is complicated when members of Glover's family become hostages
for the hoods.
     With almost anyone else playing the main roles, this would have been a
major failure; but Glover and Gibson begin a relationship that somehow
transcends the dialogue they've been given (or at least transmutes it into
something believable).  They form a symbiosis that the movie was no doubt
shooting for -- Glover (and family) providing Gibson with something to care
about, and an emotional base after the death of his wife, and Gibson providing
Glover with a lean, mean, crazy machine who can kill like nobody's business.
But it's not due to the script; it's almost as if the two actors pull their
characters over their heads and disappear into them.  To my mind, Gibson is
probably the two or three actors in Hollywood who really fits as an
"action-adventure" hero.  Eastwood's too old, Bronson was never any good to
begin with, Stallone too lifeless, Norris too stupid, and Harrison Ford looks
too much like John Fogerty :-).  But Gibson -- he provides something behind the
eyes to make you think he re- ally might be a psycho, yet he gains sympathy in
an early scene where he almost "eats his gun".  I loved the sequence where they
break out through the disco; Gibson pulls a nonchalant rap as he blows away
the three or four goons between himself and the door (to rec.arts.comics
readers -- yeah, the parallels between the character and The Badger are really
phenomenal).  He and Glover are very comfortable in these roles; I remember
halfway into this hoping their would be a sequel (it'd be a great basis for a
TV series, but no way would you get Gibson into it).
     On the other hand, there's the plot.  It may not be as inept or as
improbable as COBRA or INVASION: USA, but the rest of the film is good enough
to make the accompanying story jarring in comparison.  Ridiculous plot element
is heaped on to ridiculous plot element: the two cops are invited up to a
Beverly Hills home of one of the key figures in the drug organization, where an
assassination attempt is made; the police aren't going to make the connection
if their two detectives disappear during their visit?  Fire-fights break out in
the most unlikely places.  The kidnapping of Glover's daughter makes sense, and
she does act as I imagine any average 16-year-old girl would when faced by such
a dilemma -- she gets hysterical; but by the end it's almost a pastiche of the
Helpless Female role.  And nothing, absolutely nothing, could justify the
anti-climatic fight scene between Gibson and Gary Busey, the albino-crazed
henchman.  Pure, unadulterated dumb.
     I've tried to come up with a thumbs-up/thumbs-down rating for this, but my
mind changes every few hours.  Let's put it this way: it averages out to a C,
but the standard deviation is HUGE.

Title
Review for Manon des sources (1986)
     As anyone who has read my Seattle Film Festival reviews knows, I am a
prejudiced fellow.  And one of my biggest prejudices is French films.  I point
to their comedies and groan; I point to their dramas and grouse about
characters who I couldn't give a damn about philosophizing for hours on end
about their own petty problems (at least MY DINNER WITH ANDRE had Wally Shawn).
Sure, it's an ignorant generality to make, and I generally go to a film
regardless of national origin, but if I'm at the Festival and there's two films
of interest and one of them's French...
     What I *will* say for French films is that when they make an exception to
my bigotry, they *really* make an exception.  DIVA was an addiction for me -- I
think I saw it more times than STAR WARS.  I played LA WALLY to all hours of
the night.  I looked around for those silly blue liquid slo-mo wave machines.
The guy in the white Rolls updated The Lone Ranger to a form I could actually
enjoy again.  It was one of those films that marks a year, rather than
visa-versa.
     Well, I just completed the two-part adaptation of Pagnol's WATER OF THE
HILLS, and while I'm not infatuated with it, I am enamored of it, not to
mention being blown away and in a state of utmost admiration -- this is an
amazing film, and you should not miss it.  As many of you know, MANON OF THE
SPRING is the second part of a two-film story begun in JEAN DE FLORETTE.  I saw
the first film a year and a half ago at the Seattle Film Festival, and was
impressed and moderately entertained with its lush photography and its
demonstration of how the smallest evils could be the worst.  MANON takes the
basis of the plot in JEAN DE FLORETTE and amplifies the events of the first
film into one of the finest films I have seen this year.  PASCALI'S ISLAND was
classic tragedy being played basically on one instrument (Ben Kingsley); in
MANON, the tragedy is a symphony of photography, music, direction by Claude
Berri, and the featured performer being Yves Montand.  It is romantic, it is
heart-rending, it gives you characters whom you feel the full spectrum of
emotions for during the film's length: hatred, contempt, pity, and sympathy.
The layers of irony in this film are laid one atop another until the entire
story of JEAN DE FLORETTE has been rotated 180 degrees, and the phrase "what
goes around, comes around" is etched in your memory alongside the characters.
     The acting is good on almost all fronts: Emanuelle Beart as the grown
daughter of the hunchback Jean de Florette, who has her revenge on those
responsible for her father's death in ways both ironic and innocent, and Daniel
Auteuill as the nephew of Cesar whose adherence to his uncle's policies comes
back to haunt him in a multitude of ways.  But the performance that I will
always associate with this film, with both films, is Yves Montand as Cesar, a
casually cruel man cursed with seeing his great sin turned against him in every
manner possible.  Impersonally, one would say that he gets what he deserves in
the end, but this film and Montand delineate his character so well that I was
left thinking that *no* one deserved this kind of fate.
     But the quality of this film is not limited to the actors.  The
photography uses the wide screen to its full effect, and it lingers on people
and events and the gorgeous scenery with genius and often with perfection.
Berri directs a wedding scene towards the end which is amazing; its impact to
the plot had me holding my breath, but the way it was shot -- the wedding party
having their picture taken, their attention arrested by Cesar's approach -- is
one of those bits of cinematography that will be associated with the very best,
like the Amish rising from the wheat in the opening of WITNESS or James Dean on
the windmill in GIANT.  It has all the beauty of a painting, but is
strengthened by the fluid nature of film -- something which is uncommon in the
cinema today, where motion seems to be a reason to film in and of itself.  The
music score is as beautiful as the camera work; DOES ANYONE KNOW IF IT'S
AVAILABLE IN THE U.S.  YET?!!
     I came away from MANON OF THE SPRING feeling as if I had seen a parable
about the wages of sin precisely and beautifully illustrated, using characters
both real and larger-than-life.  Pride, greed, insensitivity to your
neighbor ... all run through MANON as much more than concepts or morality.  The
portrayal of Hell that I have always found most appropriate is a state that men
and women build for themselves with their own actions; these two films reflect
the type of common cruelty that is no less mean because it is widespread, and
then pen the originators in with their own crimes, caging them with the bones
of their victim.  It is tragedy, and entertainment, and (yes) art, and I had a
damn fine time watching it.

Title
Review for True Believer (1989)
     For the last ten year's James Woods' character in TRUE BELIEVER has been
on the emotional skids.  He's one of the most famous 1960s lawyers, who made a
name for himself defending "the little people" against companies and
governments.  But over the years, fewer and fewer of the people he defended
were innocent, so that when a young lawyer (played by Robert Downey Jr.)  who
has come to New York with the intention of making Woods' his mentor, he finds a
jaded, disillusioned man with much of the skill but little of the idealism of
his glory days, making a living defending drug dealers.
     Two things happen which begin to wake Woods out of his stupor; one is
Downey's character, who is becoming a something of a Jimminy Cricket conscience
to him, while the other is the case of a convict (played by Yuji Okumoto) who
says he was sentenced for a murder he never committed.  Woods is initially
cynical, but begins to see parallels between his client's eight years of
imprisonment and his own decline.  But is his client telling the truth?  There
are some rather inexplicable mysteries about the gang shooting that sent
Okumoto's character to prison, and (ironically for Woods, who has been using
"conspiracy" as a plea for his clients for years) an organized resistance to
releasing his client from prison, centering on the Manhattan District
Attorney's decision to prosecute the reopening of the case (the D.A. is played
by Kurtwood Smith, one of the more popular heavies these days, so you *know*
he's up to something).
     What the film boils down to is an old-fashioned mystery that is
suspenseful and has its share of good twists along the way.  All of this is
spiced with Woods' growing surety that he is defending an innocent man, and
fighting a good fight; his excitement in uncovering the mysteries surrounding
the case are contagious.  The script is excellent, and keeps things moving at
all times; Woods and Downey make a good team, assisted by an upscale P.I.
[private investigator] (played by Margaret Colin, who is getting typecast in
this role) who knew Woods in his radical days.  I will admit that there is a
certain amount of Hollywood Courtroom Hokiness, but it's not at objectionable
levels.  And Woods, one of the best character actors around, keeps the high
energy that has become his trademark under control, unleashing it in the
courtroom finale where it really sparks.

Title
Review for Ghostbusters II (1989)
     Summing up tag for GHOSTBUSTERS II: "A kinder, gentler Ghostbusters."  And
to borrow from PR rhetoric, I mean that in the best sense of the term.  I found
GHOSTBUSTERS II to be an enjoyable, humorous and ultimately entertaining film.
It does have a different emphasis than its predecessor, and that seems to be
garnering it a good deal of criticism, but I thought that GHOSTBUSTERS II's new
outlook worked very well for it, particularly as a sequel.
     Let me back up a bit: I've always looked at GHOSTBUSTERS as another
production model on the Bill Murray (star)/Harold Ramis (writer)/Ivan Reitman
(director) assembly line, a combination of talents who've mixed up some
particularly funny films.  (STRIPES and GHOSTBUSTERS are the prominent
examples.)  With GHOSTBUSTERS, they hit a chord from the best of the Marx
Brothers movies: characters who were absolutely wacko, but who you were
cheering for at the same time.  The opera scene at the end of A NIGHT AT THE
OPERA; The Boys vs.  Zuhl.  You're laughing at them, and with them, and at the
same time, you're going "rah-rah" with the rabbis and priests and NYC residents
outside.  (Well, I was...)
     GHOSTBUSTERS II concentrates a dollop more on the characters it introduced
in the first film, not a bad thing for a sequel; its lower intensity results
in a lower major-guffaw hit ratio than its predecessor, but it's a trade that I
was willing to accept.  The Boys have a comfortable feel around them this time
out; if they don't build the story up for as many full-tilt laughs as before,
it's because they're getting laughs through the intricacies and foibles of
their characters.  Ray's cheery optimism (and his enjoyment of Peter's
schemes), Igon's cold amusement and his little experiments, and Venkeman's Game
Show Host personality are all played around with more -- less amplitude, but
more fine-tuning.  And they all parody their mock-heroic image throughout.
("Suck up your guts, boys; The Ghostbusters are here.")  Peter's character
(Bill Murray) has probably the most work done to it: he's actually coming
around to the idea of a relationship with Dana Barret (Sigourney Weaver), and
her son.  Murray's played this type of character through many films (and even
more SNL sketches), and it's pleasant to see it developed along the lines it is
here.  And finally, the Ghostbusters are up against someone rotten enough (and
defending someone good enough) that you want to cheer a bit for them.  That's
perhaps the biggest difference between the two films: GHOSTBUSTERS is more of a
"laugh blow-out" movie, while GHOSTBUSTERS II had me leaving the theater
feeling good.  Amused, too -- there were a lot of jokes I was laughing at
during the screening I went to that the audience didn't seem to be reacting too
-- but mostly a blanket smile.
     Murray and Weaver are particularly good; Murray's scenes with the baby
were better than the entire length of THREE MEN AND A BABY.  They all react
well together.  Ramis was fine, Aykroyd a bit muted; Ernie Hudson looked about
5 years younger.  I was never crazy about Rick Moranis's character, and I
thought it didn't change much from the previous film.  And I was a bit
disappointed that Annie Potts's character wasn't still hooked up with Igon; I
thought they played off one another well.  The fellow playing the art director
was OK -- I think Billy Crystal's Fernando was really demanded for that part.
Finally, Cheech Martin has a tiny role, but he has one of the best lines in the
film.
     Recommendation: If you don't mind the satiric edge of GHOSTBUSTERS
slightly dulled by more attention to the characters, then see it.  Not a
Totally Excellent film, but quite good and fully entertaining.

Title
Review for Star Trek V: The Final Frontier (1989)
     I don't consider myself someone who's hung up on Star Trek continuity;
given a clever story device in a Star Trek film that contradicts some element
of Trek continuity, I'll usually swallow the plot device with nary a rumbling.
However, I do think that the characters of the Enterprise crew, and to a lesser
extent, the "Star Trek Universe," are important elements of these films.  Plots
and dialog that compromise these characters and elements degrade the picture's
quality; after all, if you've got a good enough story, but the Enterprise
characters just don't fit it, then do it as a non-Trek story.  
     So, what's there to say about STAR TREK V: THE FINAL FRONTIER?  As a
story, it's lackluster -- below average by even the STAR TREK: THE NEXT
GENERATION series quality average.  On the flip side, as a showcase for the
Trek characters, it's (generally) awful; there are scenes that literally made
me grind my teeth.  Certainly some of this might be laid at the door of aging
actors, but the vast majority seem to be due to an over-all attempt to inject
humor into the story at every point.  Previous Trek stories have either tried
for more dramatic stories, with comedy relief being just that, well-timed
relief; or STAR TREK IV, which was a lighter story, handled with a lighter
touch -- Leonard Nimoy's.  In THE FINAL FRONTIER, it seems that director
William Shatner was trying for an Indy Jones humor/action mixture.  Instead it
tends to look like Kirk, Spock and McCoy look more like the Ghostbusters -- or
more accurately, the Three Stooges.  Pratfalls, malfunctioning gadgets (Don
Adams would have felt right at home on the new Enterprise), and the packing off
of the Trek second-level characters to either walk-on spear-carrying roles (or,
in the case of Uhura, much worse), all combined to make a film that was below
the waterline throughout.  I saw STAR TREK II: The Wrath of Khan the other
night on the tube, and while that's arguably the best of the series, it shows
how a good script can add to a character without giving them a lot of screen
time.
     Before the spoiler comments, one point:  I've heard, of course, how much
money was spent to pay the regular's salaries this time around.  From the looks
of this film, the budget on the film must have been tight in the first place,
because the cheapness of the sets and the paucity of many of the special
effects gave me the impression that Peter was borrowed from to pay Paul, not to
mention Bill, De and Leonard.  There are scenes when several of the characters
are climbing through parts of the Enterprise, and their weight on the ladders
cause the bulkheads to come off the side of the walls!  God only knows how far
23rd Century aluminum siding has come...
     In summary, if you're a Trek person, you'll probably want to see it
anyway; my advice -- wait until you can watch it for one or two dollars.  For
those of you who only liked the last film, or perhaps WRATH OF KHAN -- skip it.
There are better films out there.  (Not many, but some.)
     Did Spock's brother remind anyone of Leo Buscaglia with ears?  "Everybody
hug!"
     I have to agree with the question posed by others -- what happened to
David Warner's part?  Was the role any larger in the novelization?  The budget
crunch seemed to hit the casting department, as well; there were a lot of
extras, but not many other actors, and those that were there seemed almost a
homage to some of the stars.  No, not Harve Bennett as the Supreme Starfleet
Guy-Behind-The-Desk, but Shatner's daughter -- and I must assume that whoever
played the Romulan ambassador was sleeping with someone influential, because
she wasn't picked to play a Romulan.  1/2 :-)  My guess: Shatner, for the way
she goes cries out "Oooh!" when she sees him threatened on the viewscreen.
Must be one of those sheltered Romulans....  :-)
     Again, the state of the sets.  The scene I referred to above was the climb
up the shaft.  If you see this film again (God forbid), check out the scene
where Shatner climbs up and the walls bend inwards.  Kirk apparently has an
abnormal specific gravity...
     In the acting department, Kelley bothers me the most, as he seems to be
hamming it up for the back rows of the theater; subtlety is escaping him more
and more in his performances as McCoy.  As a character, I thought Kirk suffers
the most here.  Anyone notice the Imperial motif that Kirk carries around him?
First there was Kirk's nautical quarters; and I couldn't decide whether the two
crewmen who carry the stairs that go up to Kirk's shuttlecraft were due to a)
bad writing, b) the Enterprise malfunctioning motif, c) more problems with
budgets, or d) "All Hail Flash Kirk, Savior of the Universe!"  Other
complaints: Sulu and Chekov playing the Hardy Boys for laughs, poor writing
for Scotty, and of course, Uhura's fan dance.  (The single worst part of the
entire film.)
     Good points: I did like a few of the more mythic moments, such as Kirk's
"I'll die alone," and his comment about losing his brother (I thought he meant
Sam), and then getting him back.  (Nice double-play.)  Also, most of the Spock
or Spock/Kirk lines jokes worked well.  ("Please, Captain... not in front of
the Klingons.")  But a good time was not had by all, not by a long shot.
     All I can say is, "This looks like a job for... Leonard Nimoy!"  (Or
maybe Nicholas Meyer.)

Title
Review for Odd Birds (1985)
Seen at the Seattle Film Festival:
ODD BIRDS (USA, 1986)
Director/Screenwriter: Jeanne Collachia
Cast: Michael Moriarty, Donna Lei Ming Lew, Nancy Yee
     Ever have a film that, upon panning it, makes you feel like Snidely
Whiplash?  Makes you feel as if you tripped Shirley Temple and were proceeding
to kick her in her little ribs?  Well, I'm going to have to give "thumbs down"
to ODD BIRDS, and I don't like having to do it very much, because the film has
some good concepts and some nice acting, ruined by awful technical work and an
ending that has to be seen to be believed.
     This is a slice of life picture about a fifteen-year-old girl (Ming Lew)
who is shy and withdrawn, but who desperately wishes to go into acting.  Her
mother (Yee), who immigrated from China, constantly informs her that her
ambitions are "pipe-dreams"; and, having no friends and the average amount of
confidence a 15-year-old has, she begins to have doubts about whether she
should attempt acting, based on both her mother's assertions that "you have to
know somebody", and an ever-growing assumption that a girl of Chinese descent
could not get a leading role which is not written specifically for someone
Oriental.
     Then, at a sock-hop at a Catholic boy's school that she is dragged to by
her with-it cousin, she meets an Irish Catholic brother (Moriarty) whom she
strikes up a friendship with, and who she finds it easy to talk with.  He
becomes her one friend, and builds her confidence by listening to her fears and
dreams.  However, his leaving for a new school, along with an audition with
Gower Champion (who is, I guess, somewhat of a big-shot in the musical world),
bring her emotions to the fore.
     The film is fine when it takes on the emotions and problems of a girl
going through this particular stage in her life; the dialogue between Ming Lew
and Moriarty, and between Ming Lew and Yee, rings very true to form.  Lew is
usually good for the role, and Michael Moriarty has always been, to my mind,
one of the hidden treasures of the American acting community; he continues to
grace small films like this (or weird films like Q or THE STUFF) like an
undiscovered Lithgow.
     Where the film falls down is in the technical direction.  The film is
supposed to be set in San Francisco in 1966; however, the way the film *looks*
makes you wonder if it was actually *done* in 1966.  The cinematography is so
standard that it looks like it was done by someone from the Health Services
Film Board.  The music is incredibly overblown during emotional scenes.  One of
the girl's main talents is her singing voice, but the dubbing is so inept here
that it is impossible to ignore, no matter how badly you wish to.  And the
ending--cripes, where did they get it?  It is so hokey and done without so
little care, that it resembles the "pipe dream" mentioned by the mother at the
beginning of the film.  Everyone grins like idiots while the girl gets a
special chance to sing for Champion, who of course says "You're fantastic!  Get
some training and then come see me!"  O-kay.  This could have been done
adequately, but everyone is so over-enthusiastic that you wonder if they were
shipped in from an old MGM musical.

Title
Review for Superman IV: The Quest for Peace (1987)
     I really shouldn't be surprised; in fact, I should have avoided this on
principle; but I really enjoyed SUPERMAN and thought SUPERMAN II was adequate,
and seeing Gene Hackman's name on the roster (and David and Leslie Newman's
names off it) gave me some hope that we might have something up to SUPERMAN II,
something corny but with enough grit to keep my attention.
     Instead, we have BATTLE OF THE FLYING WRESTLERS.  Others in
rec.arts.movies have listed the stupidities in this film; while I don't expect
Superman movies (in fact, I don't expect *any* movies) to be a lesson in
Natural Laws and How They Work, this film shrugs off absurdities like a rhino
with a valium habit.  And, as stated elsewhere, the special effects (which have
never been a strong point with these films) has sunk to bargain basement levels
--I'm suprised we didn't see any spaceships with sparklers attached to the
rear.
     Most disappointing, though, is that Supes is played as something of an
assh*le.  The only feature that has any appeal in this thing is Margot Kidder
as Lois Lane; many of her scenes with Clark have some real charm.  However,
Superman spends his time either trying to avoid her (especially the ridiculous
"how can Clark and Superman be in the same room at the same time?" scene,
which is so old and stale that it seems to crawl out onto the screen and die),
or he uses the "amnesia-kiss" displayed at the end of SUPERMAN II (boy, what
those yellow sun rays will do to a Kryptonian male...) to erase her memory
after each revelation that Clark is Superman.  This must leave Lois with an
unconsicous resembling a Unix(tm) core dump, and it makes you wonder what kind
of a relationship Ol' Supes feels he can have with a woman he's in love with.
     Really, not a shred of interest, even to comics completists.  Go see
ROBOCOP instead (it's worth the viewing, but it could have been just as good
(or better) with only half the violence.  Ick, melting people...).

Title
Review for Uranus (1990)
[Moderator's note: I am splitting these reviews up by country, because I
have to split them up some way.  I am not trying to be provincial. -ecl]
DR. MABUSE, THE GAMBLER (Germany, 1922, silent):
A film I have long wanted to see, this is Fritz Lang's four-hour story
of a heinous criminal mastermind who manipulates the fate of post-war
Germany with his genius and his incredible mental powers.  (Yeah, it's
a hoot.)  While five hours (there's a one-hour intermission) is a bit
lengthy for most viewers, the film has a number of impressive scenes,
and the first half-hour, in which Mabuse pulls off a MISSION:
IMPOSSIBLE-like theft which allows him to exploit the chaotic German
economy to his profit, is extremely well-timed and exciting to watch.
The first half will be of enjoyment to fans of the old FANTOMAS novels
-- the European pre-pulp feel is much in evidence; the second half
tends towards melodrama (as Mabuse kidnaps the heroine and destroys
her husband), but is full of neat trick effects (for the time) and
certainly action-packed.  Robert Israel played live accompaniment
during the film, and did a splendid job -- he received an ovation
during the film when his hands matched the hands of a piano player in
a gambling den!  Certainly the most enjoyable silent film I've seen
yet at the festival.
This year's nomination for The Film From Hell.  A movie so static,
that most slide presentations look like THIS IS CINERAMA in
comparison.
TWILIGHT opens with a gray, slow moving shot over the Black Forest,
with incredibly menacing and forboding music on the soundtrack.  The
film is in black and white, and the image is impressively spooky.
Knowing that the plot concerns a serial killer of children around the
woods of Budapest, it seems to be a promising start -- one's mind goes
back to NOSFERATU and VAMPYRE and some other impressively spookily B&W
films set in these parts.  As it turns out, one's mind has a lot of
time to consider this, as the slow moving shot goes on for about five
minutes.  Without dialogue.  Foreshadowing...
The film continues in these visual spurts.  Shot of field where body
of child was discovered; camera pans at the rate of about a degree
every 5 seconds.  Finally, some people arrive; thank God, maybe we'll
get some dialog.  Well, a few words; the rest of the time, the actors
are apparently communing with nature.  It turns out they're
detectives; maybe they're trying to find the killer psychically.
They're definitely not saying much.  And after about 10 minutes of
this -- BAM!  Back to the flying-over-the-black-forest shot, with the
same ominous music, for another five minutes.
Well, the film continues to be regular as clockwork.  There are scenes
where the cameraman set up the camera to take a particular shot (the
face of a man which is *absolutely* *immobile*, or the view of rain
falling on the windshield of a car from the driver's seat), and then
leaves it running while he goes down to the sound truck for a drink,
or something.  Honestly, I would have left, but I had four people on
either side of me, and most of them appeared to be asleep.
An agonizingly boring film; the cinematography was good, but they'd
need to pay me a year's wages to sit through this mental taffy-pull
again.
LANDSCAPE WITH A WOMAN (Yugoslavia, 1976 (released 1990)):
One thing about films made in those Balkan countries during Communist
rule: most of their films seem to have a budget which was
approximately 60% of that of an average American high school film
production class.  Thus, certain technical limitations common to both
crop up, e.g., jumping between medium close-ups of the actors speaking
directly into the camera, e.g.
JAN:  Isky Pisky Palamero.  [Your cow will not mate with my bull.]
OTTO: Palamero Isky Pisky.  [Your bull will not mate with my cow.]
JAN:  Finko Chaderleech.  [This is not good.]
*sigh*  OK, OK, low blows.  However, the film isn't much to speak
about; a forest ranger (responsible mostly for keeping locals from
filching wood from the state-protected woods) creates suspicion due to
his love of painting and art, but slowly begins to win the natives
over.  The ending was rather surprising and abrupt, and not to my
liking.  There is a constant strain of folk music, like that sung by
the Bulgarian Women's Choir, throughout the film, and it makes me want
to claw the theater seats.
This is one of those films with an absolutely wonderful concept, some
of which is realized on the screen, and some of which isn't.  Peter
O'Toole plays a famous movie actor whose work is being shown in a
retrospective at a European film festival.  Colin Firth plays a young
writer who is desperate to see him, apparently due to something
O'Toole's character has done to him.  At the opening of the festival,
frustrated because he cannot talk to O'Toole, Firth shoots and kills
the actor -- and is subsequently killed himself by a falling
spotlight.
Well, they're both dead, and end up being ferried by a Charon-like
boatman to an island, surrounded by swimming, moaning souls.  On the
island is a hotel reserved for those whose fame still lives on Earth,
even after their deaths.  Of course, when your fame begins to fade...
out for a swim you go.
The vision of the afterlife has any number of attractions and neat
ideas, some of which are realized, some of which aren't.  There are
some tedious moments in the beginning, but once O'Toole and Firth
confront one another, it improves markedly.  At times, it's sort of a
reversed, relatively superficial twist on WINGS OF DESIRE; but the
film has well-timed bizarreness, a good sense of desperateness, and a
strong ending.  Firth is his usual strong character, and O'Toole
surprised me by only walking through about half of it -- he really
woke up at points.  Worth taking a look at, really.
LA GLOIRE DE MON PERE, LA CHATEAU DE MA MERE (France, 1990):
These are two separate films which tell one whole story, and they are
both two of greatest and most enjoyable surprises of this year's
festival.  Both are directed by Yves Roberts and are based on the
autobiographical books of Maurice Pagnol, which describe growing up in
his loving and eccentric family at the turn of the century.  LA GLOIRE
DE MON PERE (being released in the US of either MY FATHER'S GLORY or
THE GLORY OF MY FATHER) takes Marcel from his birth through his
unusual childhood -- he is a boy prodigy, reading at a remarkably
early age, and encouraged to be precocious by his enthusiastic,
technology-loving and religion-hating schoolteacher father (a complete
delight as portrayed by Phillipe Caubre), and his beautiful, doting
mother.
The second half of PERE, and almost all of LA CHATEAU DE MA MERE (MY
MOTHER'S CASTLE), deals with Marcel's experiences and adventures in
the hills of southern France, where his family spend their summers.
This is an old-fashioned film; characters you like in comic but
realistic situations, where half of the audience's delight is due to
their liking for the characters involved.  The topic is hardly
different than CHEAPER BY THE DOZEN, but Roberts' two films are
handled with a much finer, gentler hand; they appeal to a modern
audience without ever compromising the subject for a modern sense of
humor.  This is very much a family film; if not for the subtitles, I'd
recommend it to parents as a good film to see with their children.
Relevance?  Message?  Moral?  None is attempted, nor is any needed.
Like a good book meant for and read in adolescence, but appealing long
afterward, these two films exist on their own out of sheer affection
for their subjects.  I doubt you will learn anything from Marcel
Pagnol and his family, but I will be greatly surprised if you don't
enjoy the four hours you spend with them.  Thumbs up, smiles on.
ESCAPE FROM THE LIBERTY CINEMA (Poland, 1990 (US Premiere)):
Those of you who were discussing films within films, and particularly
THE PURPLE ROSE OF CAIRO, will *love* this film.  It's got a film
within a film within a film -- one of which is the PURPLE ROSE OF
CAIRO, to boot!  But I'm getting ahead of myself...
The film details (obliquely) the life of a Polish film censor, who
must decide which parts to excise out of films to be shown in Poland.
A former artist, he is drinking heavily and having vicious headaches
as his job gets harder and harder; he must second-guess his superiors
and the press as to what can be shown to the public -- what is
subversive, what appears to be subversive, what might be construed to
be subversive, and what can make it through the process.  And then one
evening he is called to the Liberty Cinema, where there are rumors
that the characters up on the screen are refusing to perform the
script as it was filmed...
There's a good deal of fourth wall irony (not humor) here,
particularly when the authorities accidently mix up THE PURPLE ROSE OF
CAIRO with the rebellious film; let's just say that the Jeff Daniels
character (it isn't Jeff Daniels) gets around a lot in that pith
helmet.  (Woody Allen MUST have given permission for this film to be
used this way.)  However, this film is first and foremost a political
commentary, and a rather dark and heavy one at that; I was unable to
pick up a number of the situations being shown.  The humor is a
by-product, and except for the extremely funny CAIRO scene, it's all
rather bleak.  Interesting at points, but not enough to sit through
the whole thing.
URANUS (France, 1990 (US Premiere)):
Claude Berri, the director of JEAN DE FLORETTE and MANON OF THE SPRING, has
picked a fascinating setting for his latest film: a small village in France
that was under the rule of Vichy during World War II, and is just recovering
after the conflict in Europe comes to a close.  It is chaos for many; those
in the Resistance rule the city, and an accusation of collaboration can be a
death sentence.  Various political parties, particularly the Communists (who
are just coming to power), are using such accusations to their own ends.
The center of the film revolves around the house of Archambaud (Jean-Pierre
Marielle), an engineer who went along with the now-discredited Vichy
government, and now houses a number of refugees while waiting to see what
the new government will do with him.  He shares his house with his family;
the family of a local Communist who believes in his cause but draws the line
at smearing political opponents; a collaborator, hidden in Archambaud's
childrens' bedroom; and finally Watrin (Phillippe Noiret), a schoolteacher
whose wife and house were lost in the bombings, and who has a philosophical
outlook on the situation.  One other character, Leopold (Gerard Depardieu),
the local bartender, a great bear of a man who is a drunkard, poet, bully,
and is fiercely independent of any and all political parties.
The events of the film center on the growing storm in the village after the
end of the war, the political and moral repercussions of the collaboration,
and the way it draws both the guilty and the innocent into the turmoil.
While I found the subject fascinating, it was difficult to become very
attached to URANUS; the characters are difficult to sympathize with, except
for Leopold (the scene at the opening as Leopold sits in on Watrin's school
lessons, being held in the tavern, are a treat), and even he seems rather
monochromatic, if not as low-key as the rest of the cast.  On the other
hand, the elements that would trigger intellectual interest don't seem to
flower, either; it explores the situation through the individual characters,
but the microcosm doesn't seem to shed much light on the why and how of
things in post-War France.  As a tableau of events for that period, it's a
success; but that wasn't enough to fully engage my interest.

Title
Review for Rain Man (1988)
     After seeing RAIN MAN a few weeks ago, I regret not having seen it last
year, as it would have certainly been on my top 10 list for 1988.  Barry
Levinson continues his run of making what I would term "small" pictures with
big-name actors, with a pretty successful eye for casting.  Here he takes a
road trip across America with two brothers, played by Tom Cruise and Dustin
Hoffman.  Cruise is Charlie, a wheeler-dealer who's slick, self-centered
personality keeps everyone at bay.  When his father, who Charlie has not seen
since he left home as a teenager, dies, Charlie discovers that the majority of
the estate has been left to a brother, Raymond, he never knew existed: an
autistic man who is something of an idiot savant, who can juggle fantastic
figures in his head but is panicked by the slightest deviation from the routine
he is used to.  Hoping to get some of the estate to rescue his own flagging
business, Charlie kidnaps Ray to Los Angeles, but must travel by road due to
Ray's nervousness about flying.
     This gives Levinson the chance to use the odd Americana vistas he knows so
well as a backdrop to contrast two men who have severe inabilities to
communicate, one due to a rare physical disability, and the other due to a far
more common emotional one.  A friend of my family's has a son who is autistic,
and many of Ray's handicaps and abilities (particularly the number-crunching)
were familiar.  Charlie's particular handicap is also familiar, and from a
source much closer to home; I suspect many will recognize it, in those close to
them and in themselves.  The story of how these two men bridge their particular
handicaps is moving while rarely being cloying.  After years of sluggish,
bloated pictures by "actors' directors" winning Oscars, it's nice to finally
see a director who deserves the title appear on the scene.

Title
Review for Consuming Passions (1988)
See at the Seattle Film Festival:
CONSUMING PASSIONS (Great Britain, 1988)
Director: Giles Foster
Screenwriters: Paul D. Zimmerman and Andrew Davies, based on a play by
               Michael Palin and Terry Jones
Cast: Tyler Butterworth, Jonathan Pryce, Vanessa Redgrave, Freddie Jones,
      Prunella Scales
     This following plot summary hardly gives away anything about *this* movie,
since the major plot impetus occurs in the first five minutes.  Chumley
Chocolates, that stately family firm, has been sold to a Nestles-like food
corporation; saintly old Mr. Chumley (Freddie Jones, with *brown*-stained lips
this time around) has stayed on as a figurehead, but the real power behind the
throne is a corporate representative played by Jonathan Pryce, in one of those
roles where the actor is so perfect for the part that you almost sigh with
satisfaction when he's on.  He's pushed Chumley into selling a new line of
chocolates without any chocolate in them -- he's counting on the high-sex
advertising to sell them to the British sweet-eaters.  Into the whole shebang
comes innocent young nebbish Tyler Butterworth, who in his first few clumsy
minutes on the job manages to knock three factory workers into the automated
chocolate-making machine.   That's the bad news.  The good news is that only
Jones, Pryce and Butterworth (and the head secretary) know what happened.  On
the down side, though, the chocolate tainted with the bodies of the men has
gotten out to a seaside resort.  Even worse, the new chocolates are being
poorly received all over the country...except in the little seaside
community, where people just *can't* get *enough* of them.
     Well, it's clear to Pryce that he's got one heck of a secret ingredient on
his hands; the question is, will Butterworth and Chumley go along with it?
More importantly, where can he get more of the necessary, um, *supplies*?  It's
a wonderful set-up for the rest of the film, and in general, it lives up to its
potential, though it doesn't exceed it.  There is a long, slow period in the
middle; I suspect that this is where the screenwriters added extra material to
stretch the Palin/Jones play, and it's a rather obvious break.  But the
beginning and end are quite good, and the supporting characters carry it as
decently as anyone could.  Particularly hilarious is Vanessa Redgrave as an
aging nymphomaniac, whose price for silence about her husband's
chocolate-coated demise is Butterworth's constant attention to her carnal
desires.  I can think of a dozen ways this could have fallen flat into
something out of Benny Hill, but Redgrave is so inexhaustibly delighted with
having Butterworth's services at her beck and call that it really is quite
funny -- her open-mouthed grin has to be seen to be appreciated.
     However, CONSUMING PASSIONS derives much of the humor from its premise,
and that's outlined within the first fifteen minutes.  The rest of the film is
fairly standard; even though the play was written by a couple of ex-Pythons, it
doesn't get really zany until the end (with the hilarious exception of an AIDS
prevention poster sight-gag), preferring to stay with controlled slapstick like
A PRIVATE FUNCTION but with less appealing subjects for humor (there isn't a
character here that you'll have much concern for, which is probably a good
thing).  Butterworth in particular becomes rather annoying after awhile; he's
good as the comic foil to the events overtaking him, but at times he seems to
be shooting for the title of the British Don Knotts.
     A decent $3.50 film, unless you're a fan of British comedies, in which
case full price is quite acceptable.

Title
Review for Question of Attribution, A (1992)
     I'm a bit late with the usual Seattle Film Festival preview; it
opened last night with Yves Roberts new romantic comedy, LE BAL DES
CASSE-PIEDS.  (From the description, the film sounds good, but an
opening night ticket is $25, which made me decide to skip it (as usual).
The price tag includes the opening night party; the champagne's okay,
but we're talking *very* cheap goose pate here.)
     *Anyway*, the Festival expects another bumper crop this year, after
a whopping 70% of last year's SIFF showings sold out (nearly 100,000
admissions.)  Not bad for a regional festival, or for a non-profit
organization; it also is one of the longest (if not the longest)
festival in North America, running continuously for 3 1/2 weeks.  This
year it expands from three to four theaters, adding the Neptune theater
in the U District (it looked to me like they've got a new screen in
there when I saw CASTLE OF CAGLIASTRO there last week.)  Not that many
more films have been added, but almost every film is being shown twice.
This is greatly appreciated by we fanatics, particularly as the showings
are within no more than two days of one another, making planning a
somewhat simpler task.
     As usual, I've purchased a Full Series pass, which allows me to get
into everything but the Opening Night film, the two seminars being held,
and a new sub-festival within the SIFF, a Children's Film Festival.
Below are some of the major events and/or films that have interested me
from the 18th Annual SIFF Festival, and which I plan to (in most cases)
consider seeing.  Any comments for or against seeing these, or
info/rumor/slander you've heard about them, will be gladly accepted.
OPENING NIGHT: LE BAL DES CASSE-PIEDS (France, 1992) a US premiere, a
romantic comedy by Yves Robert, who did my two favorite SIFF films of
last year, MY FATHER'S GLORY and THE CASTLE OF MY MOTHER (not to mention
THE TALL BLOND MAN WITH ONE BLACK SHOE.)  A veterinarian (Jean
Rochefort) is deserted by his wife, and after a period adrift, has a
witty, urbane beauty (Miou Miou) enter his life.  You can guess the
rest.  Given the director and the cast, I have a hard time seeing this
being a disaster, or even a crisis.
CLOSING NIGHT: EQUINOX (USA, 1992), a new Alan Ruldoph (directed &
written) film, has twin brothers, separated at birth.  One grows up in a
loving family, one doesn't, and they proceed through their lives until
they run into one another at the end.  Both brothers are played by
Matthew Modine.  Others include Lara Flynn Boyle (TWIN PEAKS), M.  Emmet
Walsh as the good brother's foster father, and Fred Ward as the gang
chief who recruits the other brother.  Lori Singer's in it, too.
RETROSPECTIVE/TRIBUTE: To Robert Wise, director of classics such as THE
DAY THE EARTH STOOD STILL, WEST SIDE STORY, THE SOUND OF MUSIC, THE SAND
PEBBLES, THE HAUNTING, STAR TREK THE MOTION PICTURE (oops!), and film
editor on CITIZEN KANE.  Certainly one of the most varied and
interesting film careers around.  The films that will be shown (for
free, except THE HAUNTING) are:
    THE BODY SNATCHER: Boris Karloff, Henry Daniell, and Bela Lugosi in
    a Val Lewton (CAT PEOPLE) suspense film; Halliwell says this is the
    best of the Lewton films.
    THE DAY THE EARTH STOOD STILL: Good-natured scientific hi-jinks in
    Washington, D.C.  :-)
    THE SET-UP: A down-and-out boxer is expected to get beaten by his
    younger opponent.  Robert Ryan in the title role.
    SOMEBODY UP THERE LIKES ME: Paul Newman's second film, a documentary
    of Rocky Graziano (another boxer, kids.)
    THE HAUNTING: Absolutely wonderful, *spooky* British film which THE
    LEGEND OF HELL HOUSE was based on.  Great cinematography and
    atmosphere.  Wise will attend and talk about his career.
    [Actually, THE HAUNTING was based on the novel THE HAUNTING OF HILL
    HOUSE by Shirley Jackson, while THE LEGEND OF HELL HOUSE was based
    on the novel HELL HOUSE by Richard Matheson.  -Moderator]
ARCHIVAL PRESENTATIONS:  Several restored/re-discovered films are being
shown at this year's festival.  A 1924 silent version of PETER PAN,
photographed by James Wong Howe, and with piano accompaniment by Robert
Israel.  ROCCO AND HIS BROTHERS, an Italian epic from 1960 (never shown
in its three-hour uncut form in the US) about a Sicilian woman and her
five sons that move to Milan to make a better life for themselves
(Halliwell gives this two stars.)  And Michael Curtiz's part silent,
part-talkie 1929 version of NOAH'S ARK--biblical epic in the Hollywood
manner.
THE SECRET FESTIVAL:  Nobody knows what's going to be shown, and when we
find out, we can't tell anybody.  It's usually esoteric, though.  (My
personal hope: Fox's BUFFY THE VAMPIRE SLAYER.  My personal fear: FIRE,
WALK WITH ME.)
EVENTS LEADING UP TO MY DEATH (Canada, 1991), a comedy about a young man
trying to escape the web of his Suburban Family From Hell.
THE ELEMENTARY SCHOOL (Czechoslovakia, 1991), which recounts a young
boy's memory of a substitute teacher who becomes a hero to his class,
but doesn't quite live up to his reputation.
LA DISCRETE (France, 1990), a wry film about a young writer who, when
his girlfriend dumps him, decides to go out, seduce a woman, and then
dump her, recounting the entire experience in a book.  His plan does not
go the way he planned.
ZEBRAHEAD (USA, 1992) about an inter-racial romance in Detroit.
EIGHT BALL (Australia, 1992), describes an ex-con and a handyman who
become friends, and their efforts to raise the former's son.
FLIRTING (Australia, 1990)  Another Australian coming-of-age film, this
one set in 1965 and involving inter-racial romance.
SPOTSWOOD (Australia, 1991)  Anthony Hopkins plays an efficiency expert
sent to a moccasin factory to improve productivity, who discovers the
pleasures of living a bit more leisurely.  (This does look good.)
MONTREAL SEXTET (Canada, 1991)  A collection of vignettes by six
directors set in Montreal.
WISECRACKS (Canada, 1991)  A collection of routines and interviews by
female comics, including Whoopi Goldberg, Paula Poundstone, The
Clichettes, and Kim Wayans.
SWORDSMAN IN DOUBLE-FLAG TOWN (China, 1990)  Basically a cross between a
swordsman epic and a western.
ZENETROPA (Denmark, 1991)  Already reviewed in rec.arts.movies.reviews.
I think I'll give it a miss.
BETTY BLUE L'INTEGRAL (France, 1986/91)  BETTY BLUE with footage cut
from the original, i.e.  a Director's Cut.  From the guy who directed
DIVA.
THE HAIRDRESSER'S HUSBAND (France, 1990) Jean Rochert plays a man who
enjoys hairdressers and haircuts, and how he falls in love with one (a
hairdresser, not a haircut.)
L'ELEGANT CRIMINEL (France, 1990)  Daniel Auteuil plays a criminal that
Lacenaire, the character in LES ENFANTS DU PARADIS, was based on.
LESSONS IN DARKNESS (Germany, 1992)  Warner Herzog's new film, a
collection of scenes during and after the invasion of Kuwait.
MARTHA AND I (Germany, 1990)  A new, gentle drama starring Marianne
Sagebracht of BAGHDAD CAFE.  A boy grows up in his Uncle's house before
the outbreak of WWII in Prague.
A BRIEF HISTORY OF TIME (Great Britain, 1992):  A new documentary by
Errol Morris (THE THIN BLUE LINE), on the writings of Stephen Hawkins.
Music by Philip Glass--this looks good.
THE DIRECTOR'S PLACE (Great Britain, 1991):  Developed by the BBC, this
is a series of portraits about well-known directors, in this case John
Boorman and Nagisa Oshima.
ENCHANTED APRIL (Great Britain, 1991)  Miranda Richardson and Joan
Plowright in the story of four British women in the 1920's who rent a
villa on the Italian coast.
THE FAVOR, THE WATCH AND THE VERY BIG FISH (Great Britain/France, 1991)
Bob Hoskins *and* Jeff Goldblum?  I'd go for it.  Hoskins plays a
photographer of religious art who is told he must find a model to pose
for Jesus.  A hirsute Jeff Goldblum turns out to be a dead ringer for
Him.
NAKED MAKING LUNCH (Great Britain, 1992).  The making of NAKED LUNCH
(the movie, not the book.)  Cronenberg and Burroughs (and Davis and
Weller) are all interviewed.
ONE FULL MOON (Great Britain, 1991)  An atmospheric Welsh film about a
boy and his guilt.
A QUESTION OF ATTRIBUTION (Great Britain, 1991).  Almost ten years ago,
director John Schlesinger and writer Alan Bennett put together one of my
favorite little films, AN ENGLISHMAN ABROAD, about Coral Browne meeting
exiled spy Guy Burgess in Moscow.  A really wonderful film.  Now they
have both returned to do a film on another one of the members of the
infamous spy scandal, Sir Anthony Blunt.  Blunt is played by James Fox,
his new inquisitor is played (in a remarkably fine piece of casting) by
David Calder (recognizable to some from the BBC STAR COPS series), and
Prunella Scales as (I am not joking) Queen Elizabeth.
[I just saw this tonight--a really excellent film to start the
 festival out with.  It jumps very well between the searching for
 truth in the investigation of art and the searching for truth in
 investigations of people.  Calder plays marvelously well against
 Fox, and Fox has a wonderful 10 minute dialogue with Scales,
 with both of them talking about one thing and meaning something
 completely different.  Top-notch; as good, I think, as AN
 ENGLISHMAN ABROAD, though not having the wonderful finale of the
 first film.]
THE SUSPENDED STRIDE OF THE STORK (Greece, 1991)  A new film by Theo
Angelopoulos, dealing with a TV reporters story into the fate of refuges
and political exiles in Europe.
DAYS OF BEING WILD (Hong Kong, 1991)  A big award-winner in the Hong
Kong film awards, it details the strangely-linked lives of a group of
young people in Hong Kong in the 60s.
ONCE UPON A TIME IN CHINA (Hong Kong, 1991)  YES!  A new Tsui Hark
(CHINESE GHOST STORY, TERRA-COTTA WARRIOR, SWORDSMAN) high-adrenaline
martial-arts manic film.  Set in 1875, a young patriot works at changing
the government of China, while attempting to rescue his gal from nasty
American slave traders.  Ya gotta love it!
THE STRANGER (India, 1991)  The last film of the late Satyajit Ray, a
long-lost uncle comes to live with a "modern" Indian family.
THE BACHELOR (Italy, 1991)  Filmed in English, this features Keith
Carradine as a young Victorian man and the women he meets.  It also
stars Miranda Richardson and Max Von Sydow.
BOILING POINT and A SCENE BY THE SEA (Japan, 1991):  Two new films by
Takeshi Kitano, who directed and starred in last Festival's VIOLENT COP.
(Given that film, I'll probably skip these two, though the latter is in
a very different vein.)
HIGHWAY PATROLMAN (Mexico, 1992)  A new film by Alex (REPO MAN, SID AND
NANCY) Cox.
THE LEGEND OF THE MASK (Mexico, 1990)  A deceased masked wrestler is
given the Citizen Kane treatment.
ROY ROGERS, KING OF THE COWBOYS (Netherlands, 1991)  A man who grew up
loving Roy Rogers movies as a kid comes to America to meet his idols.
He does!
THE BEWILDERED KING (Spain, 1991)  Supposedly the first comedy of
manners set during the Spanish Inquisition.  (Except by Monty Python.)
BROTHER'S KEEPER (USA, 1992)  A documentary about a group of
impoverished bachelor brothers who, when one is found dead by the
police, are arrested for murder; and the outpouring of support for
Delbert Ward, the accused brother from the community that had left the
brothers.
GALAXIES ARE COLLIDING (USA, 1992)  Right before his wedding, guy is
getting very weird, and goes out into the desert and disappears.  Family
assumes he's dead and turns the wedding into a funeral.  I don't know;
I've had bad vibes about bizarre comedies set in the desert since that
awful thing with Crispin Glover last year.
GAS, FOOD, AND LODGING (USA, 1992)  Brooke Adams and Ione Skye as mother
and daughter, living in a small New Mexico town, in a "small, personal
drama."
INSIDE MONKEY ZETTERLAND (USA, 1992)  Another one of those 1001 crazy
character dark comedies, notable for having Rupert Everett, Katherine
Helmond, Sofia Coppola, Bo Hopkins and (aiieee!)  Sandra Bernhard in it.
JOHNNY SUEDE (USA, 1991)  This has gotten a lot of word-of-mouth.
Basically, a guy gets hit on the head, and thinks he's the next Rickie
Nelson.
MAD AT THE MOON (USA, 1992)  The new film by Martin (APARTMENT ZERO)
Donovan, about a woman (Mary Stuart Masterson) in the early 1900s who
marries a farmer (Stephen Blake) but is still in love with a
ne'er-do-well (Hart Bocher).  Suspense follows.
MONSTER IN A BOX (USA, 1991)  The new Spaulding Gray talks-to-the-camera
film.
NIGHT ON EARTH (USA, 1991)  The new Jim Jarmusch let's-wander-around
film.  Has Winona Ryder as a cab driver, for the info of the r.a.movies
Winona legion.
RAMPAGE (USA, 1991, but supposedly kept from distribution for six years)
William Friedkin's story of a serial killer who is definitely nuts, and
the D.A.'s (Michael Bien) struggle to decide whether he should ask for
the death penalty or not.
THE WATERDANCE (USA, 1992)  Neal Jimenez's (writer of RIVER'S EDGE and
FOR THE BOYS) partially-autobiographical story of a writer who breaks
his back and goes through the changes this brings about.  Stars Eric
Stoltz, Wesley Snipes, and Bill Forysthye.
THE ENQUIRERS (USA, 1992)  Takes the idea of "what if all those Elvis
sitings in the tabloids were *true*?"  You mean they aren't?!
NOT MOZART (Great Britain, 1991, video):  A collection of shorts that
are sort of about Mozart.  One, M IS FOR MAN, MUSIC, MOZART is by Peter
Greenaway.
Oh....  and *how* could I forget the Midnight Festival?  Good dirty
trash, as you like it.  Luckily for us slowly fading yuppies, they've
limited it to Saturday nights only.  Films are:
    THE ICEMAN COMETH (Hong Kong, 1991) A good and evil super-swordsman
    are frozen in the Ming Dynasty, but are rejuvenated in the present
    day!  (No doubt sharing the same iceberg as Captain America.)  They
    both cope with the modern world, before their inevitable climatic
    battle.
    VEGAS IN SPACE (USA, 1992)  Sort of like FLESH GORDON, but
    cheesier.  The adventures of Captain Dan Tracy of the U.S.S.
    Intercourse...
    SEX AND ZEN (Hong Kong, 1991)  Man in ancient China loves girls.
    Man is funny and is a poet and sings well and flosses regularly.
    Unfortunately, man has small penis.  So man takes the obvious
    solution: he has magician transplant a horses' sexual organ onto
    himself.  "Zany and full of laffs!"  Unh-huh.
    REVENGE OF BILLY THE KID (Great Britain, 1991):  I think I'll
    just quote this one verbatim: "When frisky farmer Gyles
    Macdonald, uncouth and alcoholic, has a torrid liaison with the
    farmyard goat, little does he know of the horrific consequences
    that will ensue."  I'll bet!  (Maybe this film was based on
    University of Washington Fraternity activities.)
Like I said--let me know if you've good, bad or indifferent things to
say about any of these.  As usual, I'll burn myself out over the next
three weeks, take a couple of months to recover, and get reviews out in
July or August.  Until then, Aloha.

Title
Review for Two Moon Junction (1988)
See at the Seattle Film Festival:
TWO MOON JUNCTION (USA, 1988)
Director/Screenwriter: Zalman King
Cast: Sherilyn Fenn, Richard Tyson, Don Galloway, Juanita Moore,
      Louise Fletcher, Burl Ives
     Right before this film was shown at the Festival, Gary Tucker, ofttimes
Festival MC and Seattle Landmark, read a letter from Zalman King apologizing
for not being able to be there.  In the note, King said (I paraphrase) "Many of
the films you've been showing at the festival so far is directed at the
audience's head or heart.  TWO MOON JUNCTION aims a little lower."  No lie.
The question is, does such a witty remark and later assertions that he realizes
his film is soft-porn fluff give a few extra points on the ol' Moriarty grading
scale?
     It's possible that this film could be seen as camp, or as some type of
crossover between a Tennessee Williams play and BLOOD SIMPLE (the photography
is over-ingenious), but if so, it's too well hidden.  The number of Southern
stereotypes here might contribute to that thesis, but again, the comedy needs
to be more apparent.  But onto what little meat this film provides:
     TWO MOON JUNCTION opens with a beautiful young sorority girl (Fenn)
returning to her family's Georgia (I think) mansion after graduating from some
exclusive Southern college.  She's going to marry a handsome fraternity Nazi
with a future (especially since her dad is a Senator -- another stereotype,
played by the guy who played Ironside's leg-man and JoBeth Williams uptight
husband in THE BIG CHILL), and is living at home for one last time.  While
taking her two sisters to a local carnival, she catches the eye of the carny
manager (Tyson), a long-haired, body-built, hunk o' man, and they are
immediately sexually attracted to one another.  We know this because the
soundtrack starts doing this rhythmic heartbeat sound, and we get
pseudo-Tangerine Dream music as everything's slllllloooooowwwwwsssss
ddddoooowwwnnnnn around them.  She accidentally drops her purse, which he
retrieves and gives back to her.  They touch!  She sends off negative vibes,
but we can tell she's excited!  Oh, the humanity!
     Later, Senator Dad and Mom and the younger sisters leave Fenn alone in the
mansion for the weekend (or as alone as you can be with 20 servants and
gardeners).  She suddenly hears the shower running upstairs.  It's her pal, the
carny manager; he's dropped by, entered the house and is taking a quick shower.
Lots of muscular skin.  Fenn says she's going to call the police.  She runs for
door.  Decides not to open it, though, probably due to that annoying heartbeat
tone in the soundtrack.  Carny Guy offers to leave if she wants him to; she
doesn't say anything, he carries her into the den, lays her down on the rug,
turns on the family video camera (boy, is Senator Dad in for a surprise at the
next neighborhood home movie showing!), and proceeds to put the Playboy Channel
to shame.
     Well, the rest of the film follows this general pattern.  The wedding
approaches, and the girl can't make up her mind if she wants to satisfy her
family or her loins.  Several more "Heartbeat of America" scenes.  To spice up
the plot a bit, Louise Fletcher as Fenn's grandmother and ruler of the county
(this is the Hollywood version of the South, right?  Can you guess what comes
next?) decides that the young Carny Guy could seriously screw up her plans for
the Master Preppie Race, and sics Burl Ives, the county sheriff (right you
are!) on the lad.  But True Lust cannot be daunted by adversity (or common
sense -- neither of these sweat puppies are appealing for anything other than
their sexual stamina)....
     Fenn was apparently surgically altered to look as much like Madonna as
possible.  Tyson reminded me of Christopher Lambert in GREYSTOKE, but Lambert
had better lines in his film.  Ives and Fletcher grind out their characters as
they have for years.  Only Jodie Foster (in an uncredited role, at least in my
program) adds any life at all, as a drifter who has traveled with Tyson and
befriends Fenn, then leaves good-naturedly when she notices the two are jumping
into the nearest alcove whenever they're together.  Having her name unmentioned
in the program credits showed a certain amount of sense, at any rate.
     A big-budget, MTV drive-in movie.  Absolutely without merit, except maybe
derision, and even then I would have preferred to spend my time elsewhere.
Pfffffft.

Title
Review for Sherman's March (1986)
     It doesn't happen very often: you go to see a film that everyone--and I
mean EVERYONE, from Siskel and Ebert on up to your closest friends, has said is
a wonderful movie.  And you sit through the film without enjoying it one whit.
As I said, unusual; that you should be the only one who fails to applaud it,
among all your peers, seems...  strange.  But no less valid an opinion.
     Well, Siskel and Ebert told me how wonderful SHERMAN'S MARCH was.  My
friends told me it was hilarious.  My parents called and said that they really
enjoyed it.  So, a few weeks ago, I toddled down to the Market Theater and sat
through a matinee of Ross McElwee's extremely popular documentary of his quest
for a Southern woman he can relate to.  And, you know, I didn't dislike it.
     SHERMAN'S MARCH is several months of McElwee's life on film--he carries a
camera around wherever he goes, much like Albert Brooks does in his comedy
about a family driven mad by a documentary team.  Except Brooks's film was a
fictional concept--a gag on the effects of a sustained documentary on its
subjects.  McElwee actually does this, and on his family and acquaintances,
letting his sardonic voice float over the events on film.  He has been given a
grant to study the progress and lasting effect of General Sherman's march
through the South.  He begins the documentary on that note, but soon turns it
into a visual record of his attempt to find an interesting girl during his
trip, and the foibles of the people he meets.
     This could have been interesting, had McElwee worked at showing sympathy
with many of the people he examines; but instead, he seems to be either holding
them up for ridicule ("Boy, folks, look at THIS one!"), or taking us through
his relation with the latest woman from his past/present.  After fifteen
minutes, I had gotten the idea of how his role as a narrator extended into his
relationships (and caused their eventual dissolution), and was ready for
something new.  After a half hour, I was hoping against hope that this film
changed directions pretty quick.  By the hour mark, I was splitting my time
between looking at my watch, fervently praying for the film to be a little over
an hour in length, and wondering how anyone else in the theater could take this
nebbish self-indulgent waffling for another minute.  By the hour-and-a-half
mark, I felt like someone whose house had been invaded by a horde of boring,
annoying people, and had been forced to sit at the head of the dinner table and
listen to every one of them mutter on about him/herself.
     The entire film disappears into a morass of McElwee's pointless emotional
ramblings.  Only when he introduces us to Charleen Swansea, a woman who he had
already produced a documentary, does the film wake you up again.  And this is
due only to Swansea, who could run a party on her personality alone.  But soon
SHERMAN'S MARCH returns to its dreary narrator and its sluggish progress.
     My final word on the subject: by the end of this film, you'll understand
why Ross McElwee has had relationships with so many women.  None of them could
stand him for more than two weeks at a time.

Title
Review for Bat Whispers, The (1930)
See at the Seattle Film Festival:
THE BAT WHISPERS (USA, 1930)
Director/Screenwriter: Roland West
        (from a play by Avery Hopwood and Mary Roberts Rinehart)
Cast: Chester Morris, Una Merkel, Grayce Hampton, Maude Eburne,
      William Bakewell, Gustav von Seyffertitz
     First, the archival notes: THE BAT WHISPERS is one of the first films
shown in 65mm (as opposed to the 35mm which is still the standard for films
today), and has been restored by the UCLA Film and Television Archive.
Technically, it's a piece of history, with it's use of the big screen and
numerous "moving shots" that are striking even today.
     The plot is that there's a master thief by the name of The Bat who is
going around, stealing, murdering and basically making the police look like
"bumbling amateurs."  However, a rival thief has stolen some valuable jewels
before The Bat can swipe them himself, and the looney-tunes burglar (dressed up
in full cape and everything) trails the New Crook on the Block to a old mansion
owned by a decisive matriarch and her annoyingly loud comic-relief maid (that
maid's whining was enough to almost for me to wish for Jason to make an
appearance).  Lots of characters arrive, and we have to figure out who is the
Bat and who is his rival criminal.  This film has all the signs of being made
just after the switch to sound; everyone overacts outrageously and uses
pantomime to ridiculous degrees, but none more than Chester Morris, winner of
the coveted Life Achievement award for Cheesy Acting.  His eyes roll, he stares
into the night, muttering melodramatic nothings.  *He* was fun to watch, I'll
admit....
     Outside of that, folks, this film must have been the Member's Choice at
the Over-The-Top Acting Hall of Fame.  It was adapted from a stage play, and
was basically filmed that way, except for several miniatures and outdoor shots.
It reminded me of a game of Clue: the characters have all the personality of
wooden inch-high markers, and are stereotypical to the point of exasperation.
A crazed butler with a hunchback!  A sinister doctor vith a Transylvanian
accent!  A cowardly old maid!  A hopeless gumshoe!  A masked criminal
mastermind (CrimeCausers Handbook: any *real* criminal mastermind doesn't need
a mask.  He or she hires someone else to do their duty work.)  A truly
mechanical script, too; I'm willing to take into account that this is a 1930s
film, but really, the audience was laughing at it throughout the whole thing
(however, not enough to justify seeing the film).
     Rating: Not advised, unless you're keenly (very, very keenly) interested
in the history of the American cinema.  Or you want to learn how make the eyes
roll back into your head....

Title
Review for Crossing Delancey (1988)
[Previous reviews had "Delancey" misspelled--the fault is mine.  -Editor]
     Sometimes I come into a review wondering what the hell I'm going to say
about it except for "Gee, I really enjoyed this film."  Romantic comedies are
like that; naming the genre pretty much describes what's going to happen in the
movie.  You're left with grading the dialogue, the performances and the
characters.  Well, they're all very good here.  As to laughter generated, it
was quality over quantity -- you really *like* the characters in this film, you
want the two principles (Amy Irving, Peter Riegert) to get together by the end
of the film (unless you're a cad or a vixen), and so there's a lot of
understanding chuckles here, along with a decent number of healthy guffaws.  
     Very brief plot synopsis (it's a very small plot): Amy Irving works in a
very influential bookstore in Manhattan.  She is happy at her job, where she
has gotten to know many of the literary talents of our day.  She likes her
friends and her apartment.  She doesn't have a boyfriend, but so what?
Besides, there's this famous devil-may-care poet in the area....  On weekends,
however, she heads to Delancy Street, a predominantly Jewish neighborhood where
her grandmother lives.  Her grandmother loves her, but fails to recognize her
granddaughter's accomplishments in the face of what is, to her, a major failure
in Irving's character's life: no husband.  She sets up an appointment with a
matchmaker, who knows of a pickle vendor (Riegert) who is interested in her...
and away we go.
     The character actors are all very good: I particularly liked the actress
playing the grandmother, the pair who are the help at the bookstore, and the
fellow who plays Irving's married friend who sleeps in her apartment when his
wife and he have an argument.  Irving herself is fine, if a little low-key
compared to everyone else -- but then, she is the foil for almost everyone else
in the movie.  No, scratch that -- Riegert is her foil, and he does a wonderful
job of it.  I've enjoyed his work for a long time, but he only seems to do
about a film every couple of years.  Here he has been cast perfectly, and has
great lines to boot.  The audience I saw the film with were literally
applauding for him to get the girl (I was greatly entertained when an elderly
lady sitting near me, watching the poet trying to make time with Irving,
muttered "Schmuck" at him).
     This is probably being compared to MOONSTRUCK quite a bit -- both are
romantic comedies dealing with ethnic neighborhoods in Manhattan.  If you want
a difference, though, here it is (I like both films a lot):  MOONSTRUCK
contained characters who were more on the edge, with a slightly bizarre edge,
and it seemed to present most of the behavior through fairly sardonic eyes.
CROSSING DELANCEY has more realistic characters -- odd at times, but still
eccentric instead of gonzo -- and while it also gets its humor from the
interaction of the characters, it's less fractious and more sympathetic comedy.
     If I hadn't seen MANON OF THE SPRING a couple of months ago, I'd say that
this is the best film I've seen since July.  Gentle humor, but no less strong
because of it's mild nature.

Title
Review for Midnight Crossing (1988)
Director: Roger Holzberg
Screenwriters: Roger Holzberg, Doug Weiser
Cast: Faye Dunaway, Daniel J. Travanti, John Laughlin, Kim Cattrall,
      Ned Beatty
     In the words of Leonard Pinth-Garnell, "Really awful."  I don't mean
unsuccessful or poorly done or a disappointment; I mean raccoon liver oil
sitting out under the sun for five weeks.  Downwind.  The last half-hour had
the audience in stitches during the most "suspenseful" moments, and from the
opinions expressed by my fellow full-season pass holders, I would guess that
this is the worst film of the festival so far.
     In short, we have a young couple (John Laughlin and Kim Cattrall) who own
a large sailboat in South Florida.  Cattrall's boss and his blind wife (Daniel
J. Travanti, Faye Dunaway) wish to hire the couple to sail them to the
Caribbean for their 20th wedding anniversary -- or do they?  Turns out
Laughlin's dad and Tranvanti stored a bunch of Cuban gambling money off an
island before Castro took power in 1959.  And Cattrall has been doing more than
just selling insurance in Travanti's firm....
     Basically, you have these people who are either slugs (Travanti), sluts
(Cattrall), flakes (Dunaway) or bumpkins (Laughlin), all trying to get the
money.  I was personally hoping Ellis (Ned Beatty), an old sailor who overhears
their plans in a cantina and Knows More Than He's Telling, would just sink
their ship and let us out of the theater.  But no....
     The dialogue here is poor, but the plot -- Roger Holzberg and Doug Weiser
must have thought they were producing DEATHTRAP at sea.  Instead, it twists so
many times into so many ridiculous, impossible plot twists (including the
"happy ending" that's tacked on) that you wish there were zombies or ghosts or
some supernatural forces behind this -- then it might make some sense.
*  Cattrall's third soft-porn scene.
*  Dunaway's outrageous over-acting as she tries to convince Laughlin that
     Travanti is out to kill him.
*  Travanti chasing Dunaway around the boat with two speargun spears in him
     (they breed 'em tough on The Hill).
*  Everyone screaming at everyone else while they're all mortally wounded on
     the deck.
     As to why we saw this film (and why the soundtrack, a fast-track generic
pop-rock ditty, was played overly loud before the film started), I must point
out that Dan Ireland, one of the two people who started the festival, now
working for Vestron pictures, was one of the executive producers for this film.
Come to think of it, Dan's brought in some really lousy pictures over the last
couple of years that he's been involved in (SHADEY comes to mind immediately).
Danno, your credit's wearing a mite thin around these parts.  Considering the
reaction the audience gave this, and that this was the World Premiere of the
film, I wonder if it will get out at all -- or in the shape we saw it.

Title
Review for Kimurake no hitobito (1988)
[Seen at the Seattle International Film Festival]
YEN FAMILY (Japan, 1988)
Director: Yojiro Takita
(Screenwriter not supplied in program)
Cast: Takeshi Kaga, Kaori Momoi, Hiromi Iwasaki, Mitsunori Isaki
     Yojiro Takita has been getting a reputation as a "full-blown satirist" of
Japanese culture (in the Western press, at least, which is a questionable
reference).  His previous work, COMIC MAGAZINE, let Japanese TV and tabloid
journalism have both barrels, but in a scatter-shot manner -- it often reduced
its satire to the level of a typical MAD magazine parody, and seemed to loose
control of just where it was going.  YEN FAMILY, which deals with an incredibly
mercantile, money-hustling family, has almost precisely the same problem; it's
one major improvement over COMIC MAGAZINE is that it tends to spoof both sides,
i.e., the "nouveau rich" and the "traditionalists."  However, Takita still
seems to be unable to break his two-mode characters: they're usually acting
completely zany, but have interludes where the audience seems to be expected to
take them seriously.  The youngest member of the family decides that the
spiritual life is being neglected in his home, and tries to pull his parents
and sister out of their full-bore capitalism; this brings about the funniest
parts of the film, but also tries to introduce some fairly maudlin sentiment at
the end.

Title
Review for Return of the Killer Tomatoes! (1988)
     Well, on the fast-moving satirical scale of film, this isn't up to
AIRPLANE!, but is about halfway between it and TOP SECRET! -- which I liked
fairly well, so this is a definite thumbs-up.  Lots of fast-moving jokes, but
perhaps the best point is that the film gets funnier, instead of running out of
steam, as it progresses.  It keeps the pace, and that is a rarity in so many of
these films.  I was grinning through all of it, and laughing through many of
the gags; about the only film that I have ever laughed continuously through is
MONTY PYTHON AND THE HOLY GRAIL.
    Tons of Meta-humor, including one running joke about financial problems
    which gets funnier and funnier as it goes.
    No "Killing Joke", i.e. gag that you carry out of the theater
    remembering for years to come.  With a Killing Joke, you don't see the
    joke, think about it and laugh (all in a nano-second, unless you're
    Jesse Helms) -- you see it and then black out from laughing.  Totally
    unexpected -- there's no middleman 'twixt the screen and the brain. The
    rear-collision Pinto gag in TOP SECRET! is a classic of that genre,
    though not up (by any means) to the Python films (the absolute pinnacle
    of Killing Joke humor is the bit in HOLY GRAIL where Arthur sends a
    knight down to dispatch the stuffed rabbit -- and then it leaps for the
    knight's throat and rips his head off.  Everything went black for me
    when I first saw the film...).  But very constant humor.
    John Astin is probably the only actor who can be endearing while
    cackling inanely for two hours.
    The film's low-budget works for it, not against it, and you feel almost
    parental towards it.  Some of the actors from the previous film ham it
    up just a too much (the parachute gag got old long before this), but I
    can live with it.
    Besides, it sports Karen Mistal, the most finest-looking woman ever to
    grace The Fox Television Network, in a prominent role (and her eyes
    glow red!  Keen!).  Imagine the girl you had puppy love for in high
    school crossed with a Norwegian sex goddess and you get the idea.  Oh,
    callow youth.
A definite success -- solid $4.50 film.

Title
Review for Passion de Jeanne d'Arc, La (1928)
See at the Seattle International Film Festival:
THE PASSION OF JOAN OF ARC
France, 1927
Director: Carl Theodore Dreyer
Screenwriter: Carl Dreyer, Joseph Delteil
Cast: Maria Renee Falconetti, Eugene Silvain, Maurice Schultz, Michel Simon,
      Antonin Artaud, Ravet, Adre Berley, Jean D'Yd.
Print from the National Film Archive, Great Britain
     LA PASSION DE JEANNE D'ARC is Dreyer's critically acclaimed film that used
the texts of Joan of Arc's trial to portray her inquisition and execution.
While I can't say that I was riveted by this film through its entire length, I
was constantly amazed by camera-angles, realistic "you-are-there" newsreel-
style footage, and the restraint on facial expressions used by the actors.  (It
is not completely without hammy acting, though.)  Joan is particularly
impressive, as portrayed by Maria Renee Falconetti; she plays Joan as a
frightened young woman, confused by the church's hatred for her, but courageous
(and finally, courageously resigned) in her faith.  This was apparently
Falconetti's only film role; she certainly made the most of it.
     The film is certainly designed to make the viewer sympathize with Joan,
but it does it through lighting, music and close-ups of the characters' faces.
Again, the film is not without sneering, complacent villains, but Dreyer tends
to concentrate on their ignorance, rather than any evil stereotypes.  There are
also some rather strong scenes while Joan is being weakened by bleedings (the
audience seemed to visibly shudder as one).
     This film was thought to be lost for decades; the British National Film
Archive restored this print, which was recently discovered in a Norwegian
mental asylum.  (!! This must have been something of an inspiration to the
inmates.  One wonders if it was next to a print of ONE FLEW OVER THE CUCKOO'S
NEST....)
     For general film viewers, this may well be too dry; but one doesn't have
to be a cinema scholar to appreciate how pioneering Dreyer was in many of his
celluoid story-telling.

Title
Review for Yeelen (1987)
Director/Screenwriter: Souleymane Cisse
Cast: Issiaka Kane, Niamanto Sanogo, Aoua Sangare, Soumba Traore
     I spent a lot of my formative years hanging around the Bowie Public
library in Maryland, haunting the adult and young adult stacks for the latest
subject that had piqued my interest (sharks, UFOs, parapsychology).  After an
hour or two of rummaging (while Mom was off at the Food Giant), I would make a
short detour into the children's section, examining the folklore sections for
any new additions.  English, Irish, Czech, Polish, German, Chinese, Russian and
French -- stories told in these countries were (are) a pleasure to me; many
were very similar to one another, despite the differences between cultures, but
each had a distinct air which made the common elements more interesting.
     While I read African folktales less frequently, I found them on average to
be more diverse; the elements which were found in so many other cultures'
folklore were absent, or seen under a very different light.  They were more
exotic and mystical, yet also more direct.  Watching the first two-thirds of
BRIGHTNESS is like curling up with a book of Kenyan folktales and letting your
imagination wander as you read them.  BRIGHTNESS tells the story of a boy and
his mother, who have been chased all their lives by the father, a powerful
magician who wants the boy dead (a family tradition, it seems).  The boy leaves
his mother to seek out his uncle and beg his aid, and this is where the film is
most enjoyable, as it follows his journeys.  A magician in his own right, the
boy converses with various spirits, casts spells, helps a king and takes a wife
-- the elements of several classic folktales pop up throughout it.
     The last one-third, however, stretches out for too long, and frankly I
didn't quite understand what happened.  The ending the enigmatic feel of 2001,
and I was wondering whether the director was trying to sneak in some message
about nuclear war.  If he did, it was obscure enough not to be apparent.  I am
assuming my ignorance of the culture is the reason I didn't "get" the ending.
     For anyone enjoying folklore (especially African folktales), this is a
beautiful example of one being brought to film.  Others may find it too slow
for their tastes.  For me, it was like a story told around the fire, unfolding
leisurely, but stopping to look by the wayside as it moves along.

Title
Review for Stand and Deliver (1987)
     Telling a newsgroup populated by computer scientists and mathematicians
that STAND AND DELIVER (side note: I cannot say this without thinking of John
Cleese as Dennis Moore) is entertaining is rather like advising basketball fans
to see HOOSIERS: you've got a pretty good shot that the readers will agree with
you.  However, in this case the film has other things going for it than the
subject, i.e., a teacher who inspires a group of East-L.A. Chicano kids to
study math and take the A.P. advanced calculus tests.  It has some complex,
entertaining characters, good acting and a story which is exciting to watch.
Seeing kids becoming enthused over learning, and watching their confidence
bloom over their intellectual abilities, is great viewing material, and it's
handled well here.  Edward James Olmos does a wonderful job as the math teacher
who pushes his students and himself hard (perhaps too hard at times), and shows
his pupils, their parents and the school that limits, defined by class,
background and race are non-existent.  That the film is based on a true story
seems almost irrelevant -- anyone watching the film would know that it either
did happen or could happen.  It's just nice to be reminded of that fact.

Title
Review for Throw Momma from the Train (1987)
     Sheesh.  I haven't written a movie review in four months, and the Seattle 
Film Festival is coming up in three months.  Time to leap back in the  middle
of things and get a few comments out.
     Decided to take a look at what's playing in the Friday paper and give you 
a quick run-down on some of the stuff that's still playing.
BROADCAST NEWS:  To paraphrase Monty Python, "Witty, James, very, very witty."
There are several awards I'd like to see this film win come Academy Award time
(not that I hold out any hope that The Academy could pick a good film on its
merits), but best screenplay should really be reserved in advance.  I'm one of
those curmudgeons who found TERMS OF ENDEARMENT sloppy and over-sentimental,
but Brooks seems to have learned his lesson in BROADCAST NEWS.  This film
avoids making *any* of its characters stereotypes; no Uncle Ben's off-the-shelf
easily-identifiable people-icons here.  And, of course, the three main
characters (Hurt, Brooks and Hunter) take the entire film to even delineate; I
gave up trying to second-guess anyone in this movie after the first fifteen 
minutes.  Do you have any *idea* how refreshing it is *not* to know what's going
to happen next?
The actors are fine: Brooks and Hunter come off a bit better because they have
these amazing lines coming out of their mouth all the time (as soon as things
calm down, I'm going to go see BROADCAST NEWS a second time, armed with a night
light and a pen to write down quotes with).  Hurt comes off a bit cold, but
that is part of his character; he seems to have sunk into his part, which is
about par for the course with him.  All in all, I'm wondering if Brooks can
make another one like this; if he does, he might just find himself with a
reputation as the current Lubitsch of Hollywood.
EMPIRE OF THE SUN:  Fantastic cinematography.  Skillful acting.   Beautiful
music (best thing John Williams has done, and I *love* his SUPERMAN and COWBOYS
-type music).  Marvelous direction.  But, ladies and gentleman, children in the
audience, where the hell is the story?  This thing is about two-and-a-half
hours long, and there is just not enough meat on the plot to feed one of those
starving prisoners-of-war the film features.  Yes, everyone is totally
convincing, but the characters are so underplayed that you never become
intrigued with *anyone* in this film, which leaves you as nothing more than a
disinterested observer.  Hey, that's probably how people react to being in a
POW camp; it may well be the most accurate, unromantic view of how people live
under this type of imprisonment.  But it leaves the audience to its own devices
through much of the running length, and you walk out with a surrealistic taste
in your mouth.
A great movie for those of you who study the mechanics of film; anyone looking
for entertainment should search elsewhere.
HOUSE OF GAMES:  Let's face it, no one actually *talks* like a real person in a
David Mamet film or play (I could argue THE UNTOUCHABLES either way).  Nobody
talks like a real Dane in HAMLET, either, but you're not attending it to catch
regional dialogue tips, are you?  This film is built to fuck with your head,
and it does it beautifully -- you're never sure who's who in this film
sometimes, much like SLEUTH or DEATHTRAP, but not nearly so contrived (or if it
is, the contrivances are masked by the wonderful dialogue).  Joe Mantegna just
walks away with the scenes he's in; Lindsay Crouse, while playing the victim,
turns out to be as much a mystery as Mantegna's character by the end of the
film.  And that's as much of a tip as you're getting from me about the ending
of the film.   You won't be disappointed, believe me.
Tres entertaining, tres engrossing.  One of my 10 best for 1987.
THROW MOMMA FROM THE TRAIN:  Not to start the back-and-forth "Suck Rocks!"
"Tastes Great!" arguments that the net had about THROW MOMMA FROM THE TRAIN,
but I saw it with great trepidation and was surprised to find myself really
enjoying it.  It starts very slowly, and the ending was never much of a
surprise, but there is some very inventive slapstick here, and DeVito steals
the show with a completely against-type character, a genuinely simple man who
literally grows on one.  Everyone else is up to snuff (if not exceptional) and
the script is fine.
THREE MEN AND A BABY:  Please.  I just ate.  I admit that it's better than the
French version, but that's like saying Lyndon LaRouche is a more palatable
fascist than Adolph Hitler.
GOOD MORNING, VIETNAM:  Frankly, if you're going to watch Robin Williams, rent
the "Live at the Met" HBO tape.  While they let his character go here, it's
still a watered-down version of his comedy act.  Other than the classroom
scenes, though, none of the non-comedy stuff held together very well, or had
any spice.  One or two great lines, though, and I did laugh like a crazy man
through much of it -- Robin Williams is about the most immediately funny man
I've ever seen.
MOONSTRUCK:  Now, *these*...these are *nice people*.  They may bicker a little,
rub each other the wrong way, ahhh...but they're not the sitcom sludge that
gets tracked into nice clean living rooms all across America.   These people
got life, feelings, and they're sweet people.  You get caught up in this family
immediately, and if you're laughing at some of the circumstances that befall
them, you're hoping for a good outcome at the end, too.
Have you gotten the point that I LIKE THIS MOVIE?  Good, 'cause I did, and if
I'd seen it in 1987, it would have been on the top 10 list, no question.  Every
frame in this film is made to let some very fine character actors and actresses
have a ball, and they take you along for the ride every step of the way.  Along
with SUSPECT, Cher seems to be picking films very well these days (and even if
THE WITCHES OF EASTWICK stunk, it was still a prestige film [prestige film: any
film with Jack Nicholson or Robert Duvall in it]).  RAISING ARIZONA seems to
have been the starting gun for Nicholas Cage and Holly Hunter; Hunter's work in
BROADCAST NEWS is terrific, and Cage is just as good in MOONSTRUCK.   Olympia
Dukakis, Danny Aiello and others are a pleasure to watch, and Vincent Gardinia
puts in his best performance in years (he also has the film's best line (which
is saying something here), and he delivers it with an absolutely perfect comic
buildup: "Okay."  I hope he wins a best supporting actor nomination for that
line...).
Well, that's taken care of.  What's on for this week (Vat ist dis "Action
Jackson"?)?

Title
Review for Abel (1986)
Seen at the Seattle Film Festival:
ABEL (Netherlands, 1986)
Director/Writer: Alex van Warmerdam
Cast: Alex van Warmerdam, Henri Garcin, Olga Zuiderhock, Annet Matherbe
Subtitled
     ABEL is that standard staple of films everywhere, the family farce.  Here
we have a penthouse apartment inhabited by Abel, a 31-year-old eccentric who
has never left the house, and likes to try to kill flies with scissors; and his
parents, a Valkyrie-like mother, Dove, who indulges her son's behavior, and the
strict, parochial father, Victor, who attempts to have them all lead a "normal
life"--though his definition of normal is not particularly wide-spread (thank
goodness!).  The film opens with the growing friction between Abel and Victor,
and the rather bizarre actions of Dove, and how it drives Victor out to find a
mistress, Sis.  As Dove and Abel become stranger and stranger, Victor be- comes
more and more frustrated, until, one night, he throws Abel out of the house...
and, by coincidence (this is a farce, after all), into the arms of Sis.
     Mildly entertaining, with a few pretty funny parts, but don't go out of
your way to see it.  A D+, $1.50 film.

Title
Review for Je hais les acteurs (1986)
Seen at the Seattle Film Festival:
I HATE ACTORS (France, 1986)
Director/Screenwriter: Gerard Krawczyk (based on the novel by Ben Hecht)
Cast: Jean Poiret, Michel Blanc, Bernard Blier, Guy Marchand,
      Claude Chabroi
     In this short span of time we call life, we generally learn what to do and
what not to do through pleasure/displeasure response.  Yes, I know, there are
other (far nobler) reasons, but the majority of events, people and places we
avoid are due to repeatedly wretched experiences with them.  There are
exceptions, but statistically, they all fall into what Jimmy the Greek would
call "a bad gamble."  The freeway during rush hour; the old buddy who calls you
up for a "wild time" next weekend; the restaurant with the waiters who sniff at
your Levis.  And your French comedies.
     I really don't have much to say about this film.  It's shot in black and
white, and attempts to be a comic mystery set in the Hollywood of the 1940s.
It uses (make that 'attempts') a lot of physical humor and contains a lot of
characters who act stupidly.  I liked one bit with an Errol Flynn-like actor
performing a sword fight scene while on lithium, but other than that, it was a
blur.  It looks particularly sad next to WHO FRAMED ROGER RABBIT;  Eddie
Valiant has it over these goons any day of the week.  Amazing how little was
funny about this film....

Title
Review for Akira (1988)
     I feel like I should place a mountain of disclaimers before publishing a
review of the latest imported, dubbed Japanese animated film, AKIRA.  First,
I've been reading the serialized, translated manga that the film is based on,
published by Epic Comics.  The story is considerably different -- it *has* to
be, considering the story is hundreds of pages long in the manga, and has to be
compressed and changed to fit into a couple of hours running time.  Secondly, I
like the way the manga story has been done so far; and while most people seeing
the movie will be viewing it with a fresh mind, I was critically comparing it
to it's printed incarnation.
     That said, I can recommend AKIRA, the film, only on its technical merits.
It is fantastic, heart-pounding animation, giving you the kind of intense
experience you find in ALIENS or DIE HARD.  Until you a) start thinking about
what's going on, or b) get to the conclusion, which is some sort of mishmash
about man, the environment, the universe and (maybe) God.  At any rate, it's
not very well explained.
     The story deals with Tokyo in the early 21st Century.  A conflict in 1991
(I believe) destroyed almost all of Tokyo, and since then the city has been
rebuilding itself.  However, underneath the newly-constructed Olympic stadium,
a secret project with a dual purpose is taking place.  One part of the project
is to examine, and attempt to induce, advanced mental powers in humans.  The
other part is to imprison someone -- or something -- called Akira.  Into this
situation stumbles two groups of people: a group of anti-government rebels
(headed by Ryo and Kay), and a bunch of J.D. bikers, headed by Kaneda, and
also his younger friend, Tetsuo.  The escape of one of the mental psi-subjects
involves these two groups together, along with covert government forces headed
by The Colonel.  These characters become intertwined in a plot to either
release, contain, or exploit the force known as Akira.
     Katsuhiro Otomo, the man who wrote and drew the manga AKIRA, also wrote
and supervised the film.  Some of the stories best parts are kept in (the
semi-comic, semi-romantic relationship between Kaneda and Kay, for instance).
Where the film really falls down is the nebulous reasons behind, and
explanation of, what exactly AKIRA is, how he got to be that way, and what
happens at the end of the film.  The manga explains things (at least, so far)
as it goes along with sufficient clarity, but the film tends to give some great
other-worldly effects and let it go at that; just because Kubrick got away with
it in 2001 doesn't give everyone else Carte Blanche to use the "Rorschach test"
ending as a fit conclusion for a science-fiction movie.  It could be poor
dubbing at fault, but I suspect that the story from the manga was simply too
involved to fit within the confines of a two-point-five hour film.
     The animation, however, is spectacular (and rather grisly; having a weak
stomach for this kind of thing, I found myself a little queasy leaving the
theater; how my fellow netters could think of Wendy's was beyond me.), but for
those who aren't anime aficionados, I wouldn't recommend it.

Title
Review for Right Hand Man, The (1987)
Various films seen at the Seattle Film Festival:
IT'S ALL TRUE/THREE MEN ON A RAFT (U.S.A., 1942/1986)
Director: Orson Welles
     A recently uncovered one-fourth of Orson Welle's planned "docu-drama" of
amazing stories around the world named IT'S ALL TRUE, this short dealt with
Welle's attempts to document the actions of several Brazilian fisherman in 1942
who had become folk heroes for their fantastic voyage to Rio on a raft.  While
several clips of the film are seen, the short tends to spend more time trying
to recount Welle's attempts to film it, despite studio problems, a staggering
workload, and extremely ill fortune on the set.  Impressive photography, but
really only interesting to film historians.
SADIE THOMPSON (U.S.A., 1928)
Director: Raoul Walsh
Screenwriter: Raoul Walsh, from the John Colton play "Rain",
              based on W. Somerset Maugham's story "Miss Thompson"
Cast: Gloria Swanson, Raoul Walsh, Lionel Barrymore
Silent
     After the discussion of the newly-restored version of Frank Capra's LOST
HORIZON, where several scenes had been restored using stills, I was interested
to see SADIE THOMPSON, where the last 5 minutes of the film had been destroyed
many years ago.  This is the silent version of the Somerset Maugham short story
"Miss Thompson".  This is one of the most skillful silent films I have ever
seen--little awkwardness, and a very clever script.  The actors: Gloria
Swanson, Raoul Walsh (who also directed and wrote the screenplay) and
especially Lionel Barrymore, as the hypocritical reformer who supposedly wants
to save Sadie's soul, but really wants to get her between the sheets, is the
absolute epitome of sanctimonious scoundrel.  Swanson adds real life to the
character, adding an worldly, affectionate air to the bawdy Sadie.
     Unfortunately, the ending is rather poorly tied up; it is difficult to
know whether this is due to the lack of live-action film, or the original
script.  The happy ending seems particularly poorly tied on (I cannot believe
Maugham's short story ended with Sadie and Our Hero moving to Australia); the
stills are expected to fill in a conclusion we've been waiting an hour and a
half for.
     Still, it's entertaining right up to the end; certainly Barrymore's
incredibly hammy performance (which, nonetheless, works, perhaps due to the
silent screen) is a must for anyone who is fed up with the actions of the
Falwells, Bakkers, and Robertses of the religious worlds.
     This is an animated film from Czechoslovakia that is definitely NOT for
kids.  It tells the old folk tale of the Pied Piper with a twist ending I find
highly appropriate, and with a lot of political comment along with it.  Perhaps
economic content is a better word--it certainly doesn't show capitalism in a
good light.  Nor human nature, nor anything else, for that matter.  As you may
have guessed, this is not a TGIF film; this is the kind of film you are glad is
over.  Not that it wasn't interesting for technical reasons; this is
stop-animation that is very well done.  All the puppets have been carefully
carved out of walnuts--except for the animated stuffed rats.  Boy, sounds like
a real comedy vehicle, doesn't it?  Add onto that set design that makes THE
CABINET OF DOCTOR CALIGARI absolutely cheerful in comparison, and you have
something to give the wee ones (and some of the mentally unstable larger folk)
to keep them up at night.  Some gore.
     Don't bring children to this one.  Don't bring adults to this one, unless
they're fascinated by puppetry and/or hate capitalism so badly they enjoy
seeing wooden puppets raped.  Blech.
     This film takes us back and forth over the East German/West German border
with Meier, an East German wallpaperer whose father in the West dies and leaves
him a good deal of money.  His uncle (also in the West) sneaks Meier out of the
country, unknown to the East Germans.  Meier, however, is less than thrilled--
his girlfriend, his friends and his job (which he likes) all exist in East
Germany.  After a round-the-world trip (his boss think's he's on leave in
Bulgaria), Meier starts visiting East Germany on day visas with a fake ID, and
uses his money and his connections to the West to buy his girlfriend presents
and bring credit to his work crew's work--while everyone think's he's still
living in East Germany.
     Of course, something goes wrong--and the ending is very funny, but it
takes the film too long to get there.  The humor is spread too thin, and much
of the plot is too obvious (as is the acting).  Still, a good concept for the
comedy, and the last five minutes are pretty funny.
     After a lifetime of movie-going, and about four years of attending the
Seattle International Film Festival, I've learned several rules which, while
not absolute, should certainly be given deference to:
1)  Be wary of French Comedies.  These people like Jerry Lewis.
2)  Ken Russell is never going to grow up, no matter how long you wait.
3)  Any film where SIFF Associate Director Gary Tucker refers to the lead as
    "old pouty-lips" is probably not worth watching.
4)  When an Australian film only awards credit is Best Cinematography, watch
    out!  Australia has good cinematographers up the whazoo, but since Weir
    and Miller left for foreign shores, finding a good script or director
    seems to be a difficult (not impossible--witness MALCOLM last year) task.
     Well, I ignored rules 3 & 4 last night, and sat through a film that should
be in the Golden Turkey Awards.  It's as if the director was trying to do one
of those classic romance stories that were done in the 30's about tragedy among
the gentry, and falling in love with people below your station, and horses.
Lots and lots of horses.  The film opens with a stallion mounting a mare under
the direction of Her Ladyship, which I guess is some kind of foreshadowing,
because the Missus of the house wants to have her son produce an heir.
Unfortunately, said son, a reckless idiot who faints at the very worst times,
kills his father and loses an arm during a racing accident.  Highlights include
the amputation sequence; the doctor's daughter, who has the hots for the son,
tasting his urine for a diagnosis; their tender kissing with a window between
them (while it's raining--you'd think a woman studying medicine would know
better).  The photography IS good, but I kept wishing for B&W--everything seems
sepia-colored anyway.  Actually, I wished I was watching SWIMMING TO CAMBODIA
instead, but that's life.
     Grade: Z.  Avoid like the plague, unless you're looking for inadvertent
yuks.

Title
Review for Truly Madly Deeply (1991)
[Moderator's note: I am splitting these reviews up by country, because I
have to split them up some way.  I am not trying to be provincial. -ecl]
TRULY, MADLY, DEEPLY (Britain, 1990):
Top-notch comedy/drama about a woman who is having a very hard time
getting over the death of her husband.  So, one weekend -- he comes
back!  Nice plot (I like the ending particularly), very funny dialogue
at times, and a number of good actors (Alan Rickman as the dead
husband, Michael Maloney, Bill Paterson) completely dwarfed by Juliet
Stevenson's wonderful performance as the lead -- she is enormously
engaging and sympathetic, and has the sort of personality that the
screen can barely contain.
[Rickman appeared after the film; he has worked with Stevenson in the
Royal Shakespeare Company, and spent most of the time praising her
performance.  Liked his comment about his role in the new Costner
ROBIN HOOD, PRINCE OF THIEVES, as the Sheriff of Nottingham: "I
haven't seen the film yet.  I suspect what you'll see of me on the
screen will be me -- but somewhat louder."]
Beautifully-shot film of passion, religious tension and scandal in
rural Ireland at the turn of the century.  Dialogue is generally
substituted for many heavy, passionate looks between the principals
(an independent woman and the two brothers who she serves);
unfortunately, they're not *that* good at staring, so it's basically a
washout.  Pretty to look at, though.
DROWNING BY NUMBERS (Britain, 1988):
When leaving the theater after seeing this Peter Greenaway film, I
turned to my friend Rob and said, "Greenaway must be a genius, because
I wouldn't have stood for this shit from anything less."  DROWNING BY
NUMBERS is a visually and symbolically stunning film; the characters
circle around the plot like satellites in their own erratic orbits,
tied to the events and settings of the story by some fatalistic sense
of gravity.  It is surreal in the extreme, with various elements (of
both the plot and visual variety) crisscrossing with one another
throughout the length of the film.
The characters themselves have all the humanity of Delphic oracles;
they're there to say things, and to symbolize things, and to act as
figures in the painting.  DROWNING BY NUMBERS is more of a series of
sequential paintings than a movie; it has the mathematical precision
of a Bach orchestral suite, and slightly less humanity.  It's
precisely the sort of film that normally annoys the hell out of me --
character development sacrificed for form, and meaning and message
superseded for the visual quality.  But whatever pretensions DROWNING
BY NUMBERS has are blotted out by Greenaway's amazing skills in
cinematography and image composition.  Simply put, Greenaway gets away
with it.  Why?  Because it works.  Because I never lost interest in
it.  Because.
If you can put up with this sort of thing, it shouldn't be missed;
most people, I think, won't like it -- I would only recommend it to
particular acquaintances.  It tells a story (of a series of women who
murder their husbands, by the way), but the story isn't the point of
the film.  For me, DROWNING BY NUMBERS was the most technically and
visually impressive film of the festival, and probably the one that
gave my brain the most grist for the mill.  A film completely for the
head, and completely absent from the heart.  Approach with caution,
but if so inclined, jump in.  You may get in over your head, and you
may not.
I'd put this in the higher end of teenage
coming-of-age/romance/sex-comedy films.  Danny has two goals in life:
his own Jaguar, and a date with a beautiful girl in his school.
Nothing new for the genre, but it's nicely done, with some pleasantly
odd performances by supporting cast members (particularly those
playing Danny's parents) and some well-timed farce in the second half.
It builds towards the end, and turns out to be a lot more entertaining
than you'd credit it could be during the first half hour.
PRISONERS OF THE SUN (Australia, 1990):
A docu-drama, based on the war trial where a number of Japanese POW
camp officials were tried for war crimes after World War II.  Bryan
Brown plays the prosecuting attorney, trying to find links between the
murder of several Australian airmen and a high military official
(George Takei) who ran the camp, and is now valuable to the Americans
as a leader in the post-war Japanese government.  There's nothing
wrong with the film, but as a story there are no surprises, the pace
is rather leaden and there's a certain feeling of inevitability to the
whole thing.  Not something to complain about in a documentary, but in
a drama...  The US cinema produced waves of films like this in the
late 70s and early 80s, and I (and, I suspect, many others) have
become sort of burned out on them.
STAN AND GEORGE'S NEW LIFE (Australia, 1990):
This is one of those films that you really want to like -- the premise
is good, the actors are well-cast and engaging, and yet... it never
really gets off the ground.  Stan is a shy, middle-aged barber (for
you comix fans, Rob pointed out to me that the actor playing Stan
looks like Reid Fleming, the World's Toughest Milkman, on qualudes)
who decides to go out and change his life; he goes to work for the
weather service.  There he meets George, a quiet, cheerful woman who
keeps the meteorological data collected and reported by the farmers.
The two of them are charming together, but their relationship becomes
overshadowed during the last half of the film by a semi-comic
conspiracy within the department to cover up incorrect data.  You end
up feeling cheated that you didn't spend more time with the two
principals, and not their odd relatives or co-workers.
STRANGERS IN GOOD COMPANY (Canada, 1990):
If I'm a lucky sod, I'll see a dozen films at the festival that are
good through and through; enjoyable to watch for any number of
reasons, if not, perhaps, a complete success on the part of the
filmmakers.  But if the cinematic dice are really rolling out a
winning streak, I'll see a film where it becomes obvious very early on
that the person in the driver's seat knows exactly what s/he's up to,
and that I'm in for a damn fine show.  There were two of them this
year: Greenaway's DROWNING BY NUMBERS, and Cynthia Scott's STRANGERS
IN GOOD COMPANY.  (*NOT* to be confused with the recent Christopher
Walken film, THE COMPANY OF STRANGERS.)  The films couldn't be more
different (thank God -- I'm not sure the world is ready for two Peter
Greenaways), but there is not an iota less exactness in Scott's film
than in DROWNING BY NUMBERS.
STRANGERS works on a simple premise: a busload of elderly women are
travelling in backwoods British Columbia when their bus breaks down.
They are stranded in a remote, abandoned farmhouse, and must dust off
and unite their various skills while waiting to return home.  No, this
does *not* take a turn into suspense, battle for survival, etc.  As
these women spend time waiting for rescue, each is slowly, patiently
revealed to us, in conversation with one another, and as they explore
the beautiful countryside around them.  It is a cliche to say that
everyone is extraordinary, if you look closely enough; but the cliche
is borne out here.  Perhaps it is particularly enlightening, because
so many of these women have the appearances (and in some case,
mannerisms) we commonly attribute to elderly; with no sense of rushing
or hurry, Scott brings out their remarkable lives and personalities.
Scott's previous films have all been documentaries, and while
STRANGERS could be considered a documentary in its characters, if not
its plot, it is obvious that the director has learned how to use the
camera to give a feeling of reality and -- more importantly --
sincerity.
As we grow older, those loved ones who are older still become easily
isolated and categorized in our minds.  We move away from home; our
own lives take center stage for us, and (unless we are lucky or
persistent or inordinately considerate) loved ones who were woven
throughout our daily pattern are relegated to memory, or touchstones
to memory; encounters are spent remembering one's past with them,
while their present condition becomes more and more of an icon -- the
loved one is substituted by an "elderly person".  STRANGERS IN GOOD
COMPANY reminds us -- it reminds me, anyway -- that the people we
strive to see through the wrinkles are still there; and maybe, if we
dig just a little, someone even more remarkable that we never had the
chance to meet when we were younger.  Not a chance to throw away.
Cynthia Scott didn't; I think you'll be very glad of that if you see
this film.
ISABELLE EBERHARDT (France/Australia, 1991 (World Premiere)):
Ah, time again for one of those continental stories of tragic heroines
running around turn-of-the-century Europe, innocent and courageous and
hard-drinking and chock-full of integrity as all get-out.  Eberhardt
goes to Algiers to examine the French occupation of the Arab
territories as a reporter.  She is thwarted at every turn by the
authorities, particularly a nasty Lt. who likes to tie her up and
imprison her in a frightfully Victorian manner; but she manages to
make friends with the Arabs and report the story at the Risk of Her
Own Life.  (Amazing, as I would imagine her choice of clothing,
particularly the lack of a veil, would keep a solitary woman from
getting much attention from the leadership of an Arab camp.  However,
my ignorance of Arab customs is boundless, so I bow to the experts.)
In between all this, she throws herself at a ragged young French
soldier, who seems rather surprised (probably because she comes out of
three-day treks through the desert looking like she just doused
herself in Chanel #5 and prepared for a Premiere magazine photo
shoot.)
This being a European tragic semi-documentary, the couple quarrel a
lot about their relationship, and end up with a consumptive disease at
the end.  (Though that's not how Eberhardt buys it; suffice it to say
that while it's a nice effect, I burst out laughing.)  Isabelle
Eberhardt was apparently a real person; the director tried to convince
us after the screening that, while much of the film was based on
periods of Eberhardt's life which are undocumented, the events here
"could have" occurred.  (Much as if Eberhardt "could have" been
visited by space aliens or Elvis in the desert.)  The production
values are good, the photography excellent, and you get to see Peter
O'Toole ride through the desert again, though not on a camel.  (All it
did was make me long for Maurice Jarre's soundtrack.)  Lots of
unintentional humor, but not enough to get you out to see it. Pfft.
THE WHITE ROOM (Canada, 1990 (US Premiere)):
THE WHITE ROOM is an engaging little fable about true love, voyeurism,
the world's view of celebrities, shyness, murder and rock music.
Sound interesting?  It is, and except for a rather weak ending, it's a
fascinating little movie, hovering between suspense and comedy.  The
fable format, with the narrator, is an excellent way to unfold the
story, which deals with a young man who's voyeurism into a rock singer
(Margot Kidder's) apartment makes him a witness to a brutal murder.
Shaken up by this, he leaves home to find his way in the Big City;
here, he uncovers several links to the murders, and meets a mysterious
woman in black.
The director, Patricia Rozema, previously made I'VE HEARD THE MERMAIDS
SINGING; from the descriptions, this film is quite a bit different
than that one.  One comes to care for the main characters, though (and
despise one of them), and while the ending seems a bit of a band-aid
to being painted into a plot corner, it's not too objectionable.  If
you like rather odd fairy tales (but not too odd), try this out.

Title
Review for Vergeßt Mozart (1985)
     FORGET MOZART is an interesting sideshow--and certainly a different
approach--to another movie that recently dealt with the life (and death) of
Mozart, AMADEUS.  A West German production, FORGET MOZART was shot on the same
sets--sometimes during recesses in the AMADEUS schedule--and the rest shot
after AMADEUS had finished, but had not yet torn down the sets.  It promotes a
peculiar feeling of continuity with the former film, even though the actors are
different, and they would certainly make a nice double-bill together.
     FORGET MOZART is certainly not the production AMADEUS was; the lyrical
blending of the music and the action on the screen is not there.  On the other
hand, FORGET MOZART isn't trying to compete directly; it takes a different
tact, and concentrates on the political ramifications of Mozart's actions, and
music (!).  It opens like an episode of COLUMBO, with a montage of wax figures,
splattered with blood, and a real corpse among them; and then suddenly jumps to
Mozart's house (exact same set...  but I told you that.  Uncanny), where a
Count in the service of the Throne is there to uncover the reasons behind
Mozart's death.  Mozart's body has been found, apparently a victim of some
disease; but because of his political affiliations, and his habit of offending
everyone, the Count is anxious to uncover the reasons for his death, and then
to generate a story that will not stir up the country, which is already
considered ripe for revolution.
     In the room with the Count are the major suspects: his estranged wife and
his servant; a Baron who is also the head of the Freemasons, an organization
that had inducted Mozart; another Freemason, who had gotten Mozart to
collaborate with him on THE MAGIC FLUTE; his doctor; and of course, Salieri,
the current court composer.  Salieri is actually the only person who does not
have a political reason for offing Mozart; and he is also played as much more
popular (at the time) than Mozart.  But there are echoes of the character from
AMADEUS here, and it certainly makes the guessing (which goes on for the rest
of the film) interesting.  This is more of a 18th Century episode of PERRY
MASON then a film on Mozart, though the music is fine and the cinematography is
surprising good (though the conclusion is somewhat watered down with a MURDER
ON THE ORIENT EXPRESS ending).  The acting is nothing to write home about--it
is far too melodramatic in parts; and the German tendency to toss in a little
fast flesh to sate the audience is much in evidence.
An interesting, if not particularly notable, film.  Particularly good at a
film festival, where the large number of films makes something like FORGET
MOZART more appreciable.

Title
Review for Indiana Jones and the Last Crusade (1989)
     Before getting into Review Mode, I should disclaim a bit: I haven't been
crazy about previous Indiana Jones movies.  I liked RAIDERS, particularly the
first 15 minutes, but it always seemed like a one-joke concept -- take all
those old serial cliffhangers and one-up them.  Stylishly done, but after
coming out of the theater, I had no great wish to pay $4.50 (those were the
days) to get back in again....  TEMPLE OF DOOM, on the other hand, was a film I
wished I'd never gotten into in the first place.  The film had a thin, brittle
edge that made the whole thing impersonal; it was as if Spielburg was so out of
breath doing his rollercoaster bit, that he never gave the audience the
opportunity to treat the characters as more than cardboard cut-outs.  I walked
out of TEMPLE feeling gyped and a bit wary of future Spielburg/Lucas
collaborations.
     With this out of the way, let me give a whole-hearted thumbs-up to INDIANA
JONES AND THE LAST CRUSADE.  The film opens up with a flashback of Indy as a
young man (River Phoenix), and goes from their into the setup of the whole
film: the Holy Grail is near to being found again, and Indy's father has
disappeared on the quest.  Indy, accompanied by Marcus (Denholm Elliot) and
eventually Sallah (John Rhys-Davies), accompany Indy on his search for both
relic and father.  Yes, there are a ton of stunts; yes, there are loads of
visual humor; yes, there is a female romantic interest and yes, there are
Nazis.  (It is always convenient to have villains whom you can have no qualms
about seeing shot, blown up, or run over by large man-made objects; the Gestapo
are particularly appropriate for this.)
     So, what makes this different than previous Indy films?  Well, the first
part is still a bit too frantic, even the Phoenix bit; a lot of plot is tossed
off, and a lot of stunts done.  It almost reaches RAIDERS during this time ...
and then, in a sudden flash, it surpasses it.  I can tell you exactly when,
too: the introduction of Dr. Henry Jones (Sean Connery).
     Several things happen immediately after Connery makes his entrance.  One,
the script improves ... and improves and improves.  Witty dialogue, and an
actual story, with a few moralistic messages which go down pretty easily (at
least, more easily than in THE 10 COMMANDMENTS).  Secondly, the actors do more
*with* the dialogue.  Connery plays each of his lines for all their worth, but
what's more, he and Ford seem to bounce their performances off one another,
making a funny line twice as funny due to the chemistry that the two set up.
And believe me, this is *great* casting; Harrison Ford and Sean Connery do a
father/son routine that several recent comedies dealing with filial relations
would envy.  
     The rest of the film is a breeze -- you just sit back and let it carry
you.  (P.S. See it with a large audience -- this is a definite crowd-pleaser.)
One of my major complaints with RAIDERS has always been that the best
puzzle/stunt scene is the opening; in LAST CRUSADE, Spielburg has the sense to
put his puzzle at the end, and to make it a good one.  Rhys-Davies is never
given much of chance to perform, Elliot plays alarmingly close to a dithering
idiot (I seem to remember him as a somewhat tougher character in RAIDERS),
Alison Doody (my God, woman, people change their names in Hollywood *all* the
*time*) does what she can with her role, and for some reason Julian Glover is
given an American accent, when he does a wonderful British one.  But Marcus and
Sallah aren't made to feel like baggage, and if they aren't exactly given the
chance to entertain, their presence is a comfort, as second banannas if nothing
else.
     In summary, it's worth the $6 I paid to see it, and I think you'll enjoy
it, even if you weren't that much of a RAIDERS fan.

Title
Review for Out Cold (1989)
See at the Seattle Film Festival:
OUT COLD (USA, 1988)
Director: Malcolm Mowbray
Screenwriters: George Malko, Leonard Glasser
Cast: Teri Garr, John Lithgow, Randy Quaid, Bruce McGill
     This was the closing night show at the festival; we were supposed to have
gotten Coppola and Lucas's TUCKER, but they apparently pulled out at the last
minute.  I wish I could tell you that OUT COLD was a fine substitute, but if
this film is never screened anywhere else, it will be better for everyone's
career.
     BLOOD SIMPLE has a lot to answer for.  There must be at least five films
about with Film Noir subjects (friend kills friend so that he can get at
friend's wife, etc.)  that have been played for laughs over the last few years.
OUT COLD is the latest, and one of the least funny.  It opens in the butcher
shop of Ernie and Dave, two Vietnam war buddies who started up a deli when they
got out of the army.  Ernie (McGill) is a womanizing asshole who picks on his
conniving wife, Sunny (Garr), and leaves all the work to his meek, pleasant
partner Dave (Lithgow).  Garr wants a divorce, so she hires inept private
detective Lester Atlas (Quaid) to track down Ernie's girlfriends; one night,
after Dave and Ernie have had a fight, Sunny wanders in, finds Ernie waking up
in the meat locker from a punch in the jaw from Dave (who has left in a huff),
decides that it would be to her advantage to shut the door to said locker in
Ernie's face, and does so.  Dave gets there the next morning to find Ernie
frozen in the locker, and assumes he did it.  Sunny would love to have it end
that way; however, Lester Atlas followed Ernie last night, and mistook Sunny
(in a wig) for Ernie's lover.
     From there we go onto a long track as Sunny attempts to manipulate Atlas
into thinking that Ernie has left to go hunting, and Dave to get rid of the
body.  It's kind of like a poor "I Love Lucy" episode with black humor and a
cast of unappealing actors.  Garr is never funny, just bitchy, as is McGill
(but at least he's dead through the majority of the film).  Quaid plays a
detective so stupid that he makes Inspector Clouseau look like Columbo; the dumb
act (and his slob habits) are brainless slapstick, and very dull.  Dave is the
only character who's likable in the whole film, but he's such a colorless guy
that you really don't care about him.  Which makes for a pretty barren movie,
gang.
     I don't know when this is coming out, but stay away from it when it does.
A comedy without one redeeming feature to it.  Thumbs down.

Title
Review for Signs of Life (1989)
[As some of you might know, the Seattle Film Festival finished about five
 months ago.  Well, uh... I've been busy...  -jm]
[Seen at the Seattle International Film Festival]
     This is another American Playhouse production that has an almost
trademarked style to it; I sometimes wonder if a film funded by the AP
underwriters is required to have a setting in small-town or rural America.  Its
scope isn't exceptional: it examines the effects of closing a small
boat-building firm in New England on its workers and their families and
friends, and it takes the "weekend-in-the-life" approach of studying its
characters in almost separate storylines.  One of the workers wants to go to
Florida to become a diver, but is hindered by having to care for his retarded
brother; another wants to follow his friend on his diving expedition, but
doesn't know how (or whether) to break up with his long-standing romantic
relationship.  The elderly owner of the company is desperately trying to drum
up business for another boat in the town; meanwhile, he's having hallucinations
of his dead father visiting him, trying to tell him something ... or are they
hallucinations?  And finally, Beau Bridges plays the company foreman, who is
desperately trying to find work in the town to support his wife and >5
children.
     The film takes a St. Elsewhere approach to its material: it's often funny
and whimsical, but it seems as if disaster could be around the corner.  The
film is emotionally satisfying; it isn't hugely imaginative in its conclusion,
but it didn't telegraph the ending at all, and worked nicely.  The actors all
give good performances, and carry off their roles well.  (Several of them were
also in MYSTIC PIZZA, and the almost-identical settings tends to merge the two
in my memory.)   The only exception is Bridges; his performance, and indeed his
entire sub-plot, seems to have almost been scotch-taped on at the last minute.
     Solid, enjoyable show; since it's an American Playhouse production, you'll
probably be able to see it on PBS sometime next year.

Title
Review for Mr. North (1988)
     Imagine, if you will, Pollyanna as a man of about 28, graduated from Yale,
living life on his own terms, and giving off slight electrical shocks to those
around him.  Outside of that, it's not much different from the Disney character
and film of the same name.  Young Mr. North (Anthony Edwards) wanders around
very-upper-crust Newport Beach during the twenties, installing confidence or
consternation wherever he goes.  All the deserving characters (Robert Mitchum,
Lauren Bacall, and many, many others) are enriched for his acquaintance; all
the rotters (chief among them being David Warner, who hasn't played a
sympathetic role since I don't know when) get their comeuppance thanks to him.
Angelica Huston apparently learns what "bio-electrically stimulated" means in
the last scene, and the history of philosophy is rather stunningly changed.  In
short, it's a cross between MY BRILLIANT CAREER and a Horatio Alger story.
     Which is the major problem of the film.  None of these people seem real;
they're like figures in a fantasy one might construct where every good fortune
that could happen, does.  Okay, one exception: Harry Dean Stanton plays a
marvelously comic butler, but I honestly don't think Stanton could put in a bad
performance if he worked at it.  MR. NORTH has a stellar cast (the film was
directed by John Huston's son (or grandson, perhaps, I'm not sure -- there are
rumors that Huston himself did a good deal of it himself, before he died), and
he knew a lot of friends to call in for a project like this), and it is fun to
watch, but you begin to forget about it several hours afterwards.  While
completely unlike it in other respects, it has the same overall effect as DIE
HARD: you watch it, are entertained, and then leave untainted by any real
fragments of what you've seen.

Title
Review for Belly of an Architect, The (1987)
See at the Seattle Film Festival:
THE BELLY OF AN ARCHITECT (Great Britain, 1987)
Director/Screenwriter: Peter Greenaway
Cast: Brian Dennehy, Chloe Webb, Lambert Wilson, Vanni Corbellini
     I made a special point of going to see THE BELLY OF AN ARCHITECT since I
had heard that, due to legal hassles, it may never see the light of day.  I
wish I could tell you that its absence from distribution would be a shame;
unfortunately, I was totally at sea during the entire picture.  The plot itself
is interesting: a noted Chicago architect, Stourley Kracklite (Dennehy) and his
much younger wife (Webb) travel to Rome so that Kracklite can fulfill a dream:
design a tribute to the 18th century architect Etienne Louis Boullee.
Kracklite is obsessed with Boullee, and his health begins to fail under the
strain of getting the tribute prepared in time for the opening.  Several of his
sponsors are trying to turn it into a more commercial affair than Kracklite
would like, and one (Wilson) begins to seduce Kracklite's wife.  This drives
Kracklite further into his obsession; he begins to write letters to Boullee,
describing his problems; his gastric problems, which mimic Boullee's, become
serious, and he wonders if his wife is poisoning him (like Alexander's wife did
-- a famous statue of Alexander was done by Boullee).  He also has an annoying
habit of punching people in the nose (though almost every Italian in this film
is portrayed as being an asshole -- it is not a promotional picture for
visiting Rome in that sense).
     I won't get into the conclusion, but you basically have the plot right
there, and there are few surprises.  No one is really very sympathetic in the
film; Kracklite's wife and Kracklite basically work at destroying the other,
and while you feel sorry for Kracklite as he breaks down, it's not the type of
artistic obsession you can empathize with.  Wilson and his *very* strange
sister and weasel-like flunky would be a pleasure to throw off a bridge.  The
photography is fairly staid, and things move at a snail's pace.  About the only
good thing I can say about it is that the shots of the Roman architecture are
spectacular; but I am sure there are several PBS documentaries on Italian
Architecture which could provide just as much scenic pleasure while sparing us
the angst.

Title
Review for Little Mermaid, The (1989)
     These days, the press likes to hype the comeback trail for just about
anyone: politicians, celebrities, musicians, and even companies.  Obviously
Disney has, over the last ten years, shown a mighty resurgence in the fiscal
arena, with the success of Touchstone Pictures and it's various amusement
parks.  However, those looking at the quality of Disney's recent films will
find even more hopeful signs, particularly those who fondly remember the
animated features of bygone days.  It appears that someone in the upper
echelons has taken the cuffs off the Disney animators and told them to knock
his or her socks off.  After seeing THE LITTLE MERMAID, I'd guess you'd find
have to hunt for their shoes somewhere in their secretary's office.
     A step back: I really sat up and took notice when THE GREAT MOUSE
DETECTIVE came out from Disney a couple of years ago.  It was an extremely
entertaining feature, with a good sense of visual ingenuity, a fine comic
sense, and a script that was enjoyable for both kids and adults.  Being a
Holmes fan, I realized bias, but it really was head-and-shoulders above the
fairly listless, cut-out animated features that started in the late sixties
(after, but not including, THE JUNGLE BOOK) and dominated the 70s and early
80s, right through the extremely over-hyped THE BLACK CAULDRON.  THE GREAT
MOUSE DETECTIVE wasn't as technically accomplished as anything in Disney's
Golden Age (PINOCCHIO, SNOW WHITE, FANTASIA, etc.), but it was a solid
production and something to keep one's eyes open for.
     Well, you won't have to squint to notice the quality to be found in THE
LITTLE MERMAID.  This is, I believe, the best Disney animated feature since THE
JUNGLE BOOK, certainly the best "animated musical adventure" since TJB;
technically, however, it's the best thing to come out of Disney's animations
studios in decades, showing a sense of visual imagination that I haven't seen
since Disney's pictures in the early 50s.  There are sequences that surprised
me, dazzled me, made me laugh with surprise (!)  in how the animators had
orchestrated the scene; and two of the musical numbers literally made me want
to applaud after they were over.  (The munchkins next to me would have taken it
as a sign of weakness, though, so *next* time I'm listening to A Voice of
Reason and seeing this at 9:30, past most of the little delinquents' bedtimes.)
The technical bits were damn impressive -- while not being up to the standards
of a PINOCCHIO, it did have sequences which stand out as way-above-average.
For the kids, for those who enjoy animated features or musicals, and for the
animation aficionado, THE LITTLE MERMAID is a treat.
VISUAL IMAGINATION:  The well just does NOT run dry.  The opening credits, the
introduction of the characters...  right down to the point-of-view of each
shot.  After THE LITTLE MERMAID, you'd think Disney Studios had forgotten how
to do a two-dimensional shot.  The intro of the Sea Witch is particularly good,
as is the opening credits of a ship at sea.  But the sparks really fly in the
musical numbers, particularly the very amusing "Kiss the Girl", and "Under the
Sea", which honest-to-God should be released as a music video -- it'd end the
glut of black-and-white monstrosities on MTV single-handedly.  And the old
tried-and-true cartoon humor is in full evidence, which is a welcome sight --
it seemed for a while that someone at Disney had forgotten that this was an art
form in itself.  (Looking at Saturday morning TV, perhaps a lost one.)
There is no single element more important to an animated film than the whimsy
to out-think the audience and surprise them with what the film-makers are about
to do.  The lights are apparently burning brightly at Disney Studios.
TECHNICAL:  In a phrase, Nothing Looks Cheap.  You'd be hard-pressed to
associate this film with the company that made THE ARISTOCATS, which brimmed
with single-dimension animation, static backgrounds and strictly
two-dimensional action.  There must have been a large sign up somewhere in THE
LITTLE MERMAID'S production studio: "USE THE Z AXIS."  And there are little
touches everywhere -- I particularly liked the light-waves against the sea
floor.  But more than that, this are several distinct styles in the artwork and
animated sequences in this film.  Many of the characters have the standard
Disney character "look", i.e.  the humans in 101 Dalmatians: The Prince, his
steward, etc.  But they have more texture, more distinctiveness; Ariel, the
mermaid, in particular comes of with a visual individuality.  Then there are
the early sequences, and the introduction of the Sea Witch; I want to see it
again, but I could swear that I was looking at SNOW WHITE-level animation --
almost cel painting.  Gorgeous stuff -- somebody opened their pocketbook for
this one.  Finally, as in THE GREAT MOUSE DETECTIVE, computer animation is
integrated into the film very smoothly (mostly the wooden ships, I think); I'd
be curious to know if it was used in other places.
Really, this is a technological milestone for Disney.  They've gained a lot of
ground back with THE LITTLE MERMAID, and I hope the box office on the film is
good enough for them to try it again.
CHARACTERIZATION:  Good, up-to-snuff, if not great.  I'm very partial to
Sebastian, the composer crab who is one of Ariel's companions, myself, but most
are standard roles, e.g.  Flounder, heroine's best friend; but there are
several other, smaller roles which come off very well.  Most of the voices,
while familiar to animated film fans, aren't "celebrity voices", with the
exception of Buddy Hackett, who's "animized" into a seagull.  (I half expected
him to be living in a beached, rusted Volkswagen Beetle.)  Rene Auberjonois was
also distinctive in his small role as the French chef during "Les Poissons",
probably the shows best comedy sequence.  (Though I kept thinking how much fun
it would have been if John Cleese had been doing his "Of course I'm French!
Why do you zink I have dis ouutraaaageous Frentch Ak-zant?!!"  voice for it.
Never satisfied...)  The Sea Witch has all the good lines and lyrics, but then,
Disney villainesses always do.  And Ariel herself is a strong central
character, a very pleasant (and long-overdue) change from those helpless Disney
females who cling to the hero's arm while he kills the villainess.  She's
certainly the most appealing heroine I've ever seen in a Disney film, though
she doesn't break any Disney Heroine Regulations, I think.  (The Prince is the
usual Disney good-looking, happy hunk; he basically plays with his dog and
battles sorceresses.  Looks like a pipe-smoker to me.)
MUSIC:  Pretty catchy stuff.  Upon walking out of THE JUNGLE BOOK (at age 7), I
immediately initiated a campaign to coerce my parents into buying me a record
with "The Bear Necessities" on it (remember Ralphie and the B-B gun in A
CHRISTMAS STORY?); after the inevitable success (I could whine with the best of
them back then), I played that song over and over again until everyone (except
me) was sick of it.  "Under the Sea" is just about as appealing, though the
lyrics are nothing special and I think a lot of the appeal rests in seeing the
animated sequence AND listening to the music at the same time.  Luckily for my
parents, I know have enough money to buy the CD.  (Pet gripe: they might list
the voice talents for the songs in the soundtrack brochure.  That's Disney
corporate policy all over: the credits say DISNEY first, and everyone else in a
2-point font.)
DIALOGUE AND PLOT:  Pretty standard stuff, though we have the heroine doing
most of the rescuing here.  Outside of that, nothing special; the one thing
this film doesn't surpass THE GREAT MOUSE DETECTIVE in is script, which had an
almost constant stream of good lines.
SO:  Damn good film, worth seeing once and (for people like me) twice.  Kids?
Well, there were some crying toddlers, as the villainess looks pretty nasty at
points, and there is a shark.  Nothing worse than the usual Disney Nasty Person
Trappings, though.  Besides, it's *good* for the little buggers!  Gets those
psychological complexes started early, so they can be in therapy by the time
they're in high school.  I mean, I saw the Wicked Queen's transformation scene
in SNOW WHITE, and it didn't screw me up any, did it?  Outside of possible,
subliminal pro-drug messages...
     Anyway, either use the kids as an excuse, or better yet, catch the late
show with your SO.  Good animated features can make anyone into either a kid or
a romantic, and THE LITTLE MERMAID is an express ride to either.

Title
Review for Living Daylights, The (1987)
     Well, yes, I enjoyed THE LIVING DAYLIGHTS, not just parts of it, but the
entire film, straight through.  The Friday night audience I was in laughed 
uproariously several times and seemed to come out with pretty pleased
expressions on their collective faces.  However, for those of you who are 
reading the local movie reviews heralding a "new beginning" for the James Bond
series...not quite.  Below are spoilers...
     First, Bond himself.  Let's face it, the character created by Ian Fleming 
was something of a psycho--he wore Freudian hang-ups on his sleeve.  Distrust
of women, domination, the whole bit.  When Sean Connery took over the role in
the first three films, he played Bond with something of the brutal edge that
Fleming described, but this was The Movies, after all, and the suave killer
soon disappeared underneath heroics, puns and gadgets, albeit stylishly done.
Then, for reasons that still amazes me, someone decided to hire Roger Moore to
take over the role.  For LIVE AND LET DIE, he played Bond as The Saint;
afterwards, he became James Bond, Her Majesty's Comic Relief with a Poker Up
His Ass.  Except for one exception (THE SPY WHO LOVED ME), the role disappeared
underneath greater and greater stunts and special effects, and under the
increasingly wooden performances by Moore.
     Timothy Dalton could play James Bond like Bob Hoskins after Moore and 
still be refreshing.  Instead, he tries something else with Bond: a
professional, but without the hang-ups, and without his tongue anywhere near 
his cheek.  He looks earnest, and though it's Business First, he also has the
Sir Galahad urges firmly supporting everything he does--one supposes M allows
it because of his excellent track record.  Still, he gets thrown into a lot of
the situations Moore has for the last several movies (John Glen directs this
film as per usual); it just seems more suspenseful, because he's not Acting
Concerned--he actually looks like he's worried how he's going to survive.  He
even makes mistakes.  Dalton also tends to be less aloof; scenes with other
British agents (Q is back, though without the stock nagging he usually
performs) give you the feeling he actually works with them (the new Moneypenny
is quite good).  In fact, it's nice to see some competent agents other than
Bond; a battle between a safe-house guard and a Russian assassin makes you
wonder, for a while, who will get the upper hand.  It also makes the villain
seem much  more capable (and dangerous) when he confronts Bond.
     The rest of the film, though, has the trappings of recent Bond pictures: 
supposedly erotic credits (they now have "Marketing Director" near the 
beginning of the line), stunts, gadgets, humor, a new Felix Leiter (collect
them all!) and pretty fantastic luck on Bond's part.  They've even gone so
far as to try to keep a sort of continuity going: General Gogol, who has been
depicted as the head of the KGB in four or five previous films, has been moved
to the Soviet foreign office; it would appear that John Rhys-Davies will be
take up the role of head of the KGB.  Well, more power to them; if they can
keep the next few movies at this pitch (and with this quality of the dialogue
and the plot--they have paid attention to the details here), I'll continue to
watch them.  However, take it with a grain of salt; the films introducing a new
Bond have usually put a lot of extra effort into supporting factors.  Whether
they do so for the next film is a good question.
     Other comments: Joe Don Baker is listed fairly high up on the credits, 
but he can't be on screen for more than 5 minutes during the entire film.  The
villains seem a bit more stupid than sinister, though the fellow playing the
Russian defector works well.
1)  I read in one of the trash magazines they pass out free in the theater that
the Czech cellist Bond woos in this film is planned to be a steady love
interest in later films--not an unattractive alternative, as the actress who
plays Kara adds a certain Indiana Jones humor to the situations Bond finds
himself in.  Can anyone confirm or deny this?  I can't believe they'd put
anything in the films to deny Bond's "availability" in later films; but I
would like to see it, as it makes his romances each film seem pretty
superficial.
2)  The $%$!@ Aurora theater shut the projection off before they got to the
very end of the credits--did they have a "James Bond will return in XXXXXXXX"
message at the tail end?  [They did have "James Bond will return" but no film
title was given. -ecl]

Title
Review for Mystic Pizza (1988)
     There's certainly nothing new in the plot behind MYSTIC PIZZA:  Three
girls working as waitresses in a pizza parlor in Mystic, Connecticut, and their
romantic entanglements during the summer and fall of one year.  One is just on
the edge of matrimony with a fisherman, but can't quite cross the line;
another, a vivacious local who wants to leave Mystic and gets involved with a
rich out-of-towner; and her younger sister, about to go to Yale and falling in
love with a married man.
     However, the film makes its mark from the first shot with its infectious
sense of humor and the collection of local characters it showcases.  The actors
are given dialogue they can really get laughter out of, and they soon have
developed characters who you are like quite a bit (especially the three lead
actresses).  Finally, not all of the plot is cut-and-dried -- I was surprised
several times with where the plot headed, and for those points where it wheeled
around predictably, it did so with style and enthusiasm which belayed the
cliche situations.
     A good full-price film, and something of a surprise.  The Mystic Pizza in
MYSTIC PIZZA resembles the film; the elements aren't revolutionary, but they're
full-bodied and the mixture is just right.

Title
Review for Tenku no shiro Rapyuta (1986)
     I make no claim to being anything other than a novice anime (Japanese
animation) enthusiast, so I can't tell you how LAPUTA, CASTLE IN THE SKY stands
up to other anime out there.  I think it safe to say that it would probably be
labeled a "children's story" by a casual assessor -- not that any
self-respecting adult can't swallow some hard-earned sophistication and enjoy
the Bejeezus out of it.  The story, of a young boy and a mysterious girl who
floats, unconscious, out of the sky, is a fable cushioned in the very best
visual imagery and invention.  Any show with this much imagination breaks the
boundaries set by "adult" and "children" conventions, and deserves a look.
     The story is another variation on the boy/girl/quest story, with a bit of
environmental morality thrown in at the end; some might find the story a bit
simple and untutored -- I think it only enforces the air of innocence around
the protagonists, but there you go, you've been warned.  What really makes
LAPUTA worth watching is the imagery: fantastic sky-vehicles, anarchistic and
futuristic at the same time; Victorian villains and silly comic relief pirates
(with a nod of the head towards another anime production, NAUSICAA); and a
sense of freedom that animation allows the gifted director to use.  Hayao
Miyazaki is considered at the very pinnacle of anime directors, and this film
gives dozens of examples why -- Stephen Spielburg could learn some things about
creative point-of-view from Miyazaki.  (Rumor has it that he did.)  I came away
with so many delightful images from this film ... a girl floating down among
the clouds, enveloped in a bubble of light; a impersonal-then-personal robot,
like something from a Moebius sketch, rampaging through a fortress; the idea of
travel, exploration and battle among the clouds.  There's work here that's
every bit as good as the best of Max Fleisher in the mid-to-late 30s; while
this level of quality isn't constantly evident, the work is never shoddy.  And
the effect is magnified by seeing it on a large screen (an experience animation
fans are rarely allowed to experience).
     The film isn't sub-titled; I cannot tell you how good the translation is,
though I have heard that the dialogue is toned a bit towards a younger
audience, though the effect can't be too severe from what I saw.  Good
animation, in my experience, feeds the imagination, suspends belief, and takes
you back to a cleaner, younger self.  By that definition, LAPUTA is very, very
good.

Title
Review for Stakeout (1987)
STAKEOUT [C-]:
This film isn't without its charms: Dreyfus carries so much of the film, due to
his sheer likability, and Emilio Estevez does a creditable job as Dreyfus's
partner.  But the film ends in an incredibly predictable chase scene, with
Dreyfus's new girlfriend falling into a cliched damsel-in- distress routine.
Towards the end, she seems to have little purpose other than to satisfy sexual
and heroic fantasies.
THE FOURTH PROTOCOL [C+, but it *is* the archetypical Thriller]:
Probably the easiest way to put this: if you liked DAY OF THE JACKAL (Fredrick
Forsythe not only wrote the books both films are based on, but he wrote the
screenplay for THE FOURTH PROTOCOL), you'll love this one.  It provides what
you expect from a thriller: a plot that keeps you thinking throughout the
movie, and which doesn't insult your intelligence.  It is a rare film that
doesn't ask me to overlook a mistake in the story, or a stupid action by a
character to advance the plot, but this is one of them.  As to characterization
and dialogue...  that is deficient; but in this type of thriller,
characterization is almost *always* secondary to the plot.  Only the very
tail-ending seems outlandish, and that lasts only a few seconds; the rest is
the type of entertainment that keeps your mind buzzing as it winds along.
THE BIG EASY [B-]:
Almost the opposite of THE FOURTH PROTOCOL, this film is loaded with wonderful
characters and dialogue, but the plot tends to get incredible at the end.  And
again, I enjoyed the film over-all, though I had a bit of a problem swallowing
some of it towards the finale.  The accents are worth the price alone, and some
of the dialogue is precious, particularly by the actor who plays the defense
lawyer for Dennis Quaid.  I also found Ellen Barkin to be exceptional in
creating a rather guileless character; when she begins to return Quaid's
attentions, she lets her reserve metamorphose into a delightfully shy demeanor.
AMAZON WOMEN ON THE MOON [Arggh...  give it a D+]:
This is one of those anthology-skit films like KENTUCKY FRIED MOVIE (John
Landis produced both films, and seems to be "returning to his roots" with this
one--KFM was his first big hit), which means you can't grade it as a whole, you
have to grade it on average.  On average, then, I'd give it a D+; there are a
handful of very funny sketches here, but you have to wade through some awful
stuff to get to it.  The sketches preceding the "Amazon Women on the Moon"
sketch (which progresses throughout the film) are particularly bad, especially
the first.  Things get better as you go on, which is perhaps a good idea --
most people remember the ending more than they do the beginning of the film.
If you ever get the video, I recommend you fast-forward to the "Amazon Women"
sketches, the "Video Pirates" sketch ("Oh!  We're SOOOOOOO scared!"), the "Jack
the Ripper" sketch, the "First Lady of the Night" sketch ("Easy-to-read
typeface; no big words.  Available at bus stations and airports everywhere.")
and Ed Begley Jr.'s hilarious sketch as the very visible Invisible Man.  P.S.
Stick around after the credits--there's another sketch with Carrie Fisher and
Paul Bartel at the end.
BEST SELLER [D-]:
I went in really wanting to like this, as James Woods and Brian Dennehy are two
of my favorite character actors.  Unfortunately, Dennehy walks through his
role, which is somewhat understandable, considering just how bad the script is.
Plenty of instances of characters doing something really stupid just to advance
the plot.   James Woods creates another fascinating character, this time a hit
man who is a fascinating monster, utterly repugnant and entirely fascinating at
points.  However, he can't carry a plot like this on his shoulders for the
entire running time, and you just give in to the stupidities of the story after
a half hour.
P.S.  For those of you who've seen the NEW MONKEES Coca-Cola ads preceding so
many of the films: are these guys the lamest little no-talent weasels to come
down the pike in years, or what?   Please, give me the stupid animated shots of
popcorn in space and empty cups flying into wastebaskets.  Or better yet, the
John Waters "Please don't smoke" ad (hilarious!).

Title
Review for Wash, The (1988)
     I, for one, like my melodramas small.  It's not a hard-and-fast rule, but
following the average ups-and-downs of a human life, or lives, aren't a draw by
themselves.  Acting, dialogue, setting and photography are major factors in
grading a film, and if these four elements are not particularly outstanding,
I'm left with the basic plot.  In that case, the last thing I want to see is a
"personal problems" movie blown up to epic proportions, like setting it in
Africa and giving it an eight-digit budget and putting Meryl Streep and Robert
Redford in it (I think we can see see the whipping boy here, hmmm?).
     THE WASH is another film sponsored by the American Playhouse group, and
they are really putting together a track record of small-budgeted pictures
which act as "slice-of-life" stories set throughout the U.S.  None of these
films is immensely memorable, but they are both thoughtful and thought-
provoking, and I've never been bored at one.  A FLASH OF GREEN dealt with a
small community in Florida being picked apart by real estate developers;
SILENCE AT BETHANY is staged around a Pennsylvania Mennonite community during
the early 1940s.  THE WASH deals with an elderly Japanese-American couple and
their two daughters who live in an unspecified urban area (LA?  Sacramento?
I'm not sure it was ever specified).  The father, a silent curmudgeon, lives in
the family home, while his wife has moved out of the house and is living in an
apartment.  His domineering, sullen behavior has driven her to a separation,
but she still stops by once a week to drop off groceries, pick up the laundry
(hence the name of the film), and make a stab at reestablishing communications
with her husband.
     The film details the effects of her beginning to date another man on her
husband, her daughters, and finally herself.  One daughter is straight-laced,
rather uptight and convinced that her mother and father will eventually get
back together (ignoring the rocky ground her own relationship is on).  The
other daughter has been ostracized by her father for marrying a black man, and
is reluctant to help or hinder the situation between her parents.  For the most
part, the film concentrates on the relationships between these people with few
embellishes, besides some comic relief at a restaurant that the father
frequents.
     Since these AP films tend to work at being as Spartan as possible in
describing their characters, I usually end up grading the films on the acting
and how well the characters resonated for me.  Both the performances and the
plot were good without being very good, except for the actress playing the
mother, who was splendid.  She conveys the confusion and happiness her new
boyfriend brings her (at 60), and the scenes between them are very fresh.  Her
work pushes my grade to a satisfied (if not enthusiastic) thumbs-up; a good
Saturday afternoon movie, and a definite recommendation when it appears on
PBS's AMERICAN PLAYHOUSE.

Title
Review for Working Girl (1988)
     I can't remember the last time I saw a Mike Nichols film that reflected an
ounce of the talent and promise that he showed in THE GRADUATE, years and years
and years ago.  (it spoke to my *parent's* generation, for God's sake.  :-) ) I
am happy to report that the dry spell appears to have finally ended: WORKING
GIRL is the kind of comedy you walk out of with an afterglow.  It's slick --
very, very slick; I don't think it skips a beat, except maybe a few minute
jiggles during the last ten minutes.  It's the kind of entertainment that
delivers smoothly, with the acting, technical and music cylinders firing right
when they need to.  It's not genius, or even an outstanding work, but it has so
few weak points and so many good (not great) ones that it tends to stand out
over the rest of the Christmas mudslide.
     I was impressed with Melanie Griffith when I saw her in SOMETHING WILD,
but I assumed much of that was due to Demme's directing (completely
off-the-wall remark: saw a repeat episode of Columbo the other night, with
Louis Jordan as a murdering restaurant critic, that was directed by a Jonathon
Demme).  More credit was due to her, it appears.  Griffith has the ability to
appear soft and rather vague, while at the same time showing that something is
clicking beneath the mascara.  It all appears very natural, and she is, without
a doubt, the star of the movie (no doubt Ford and Weaver's agents insisted that
they get top billing).  Ford has been better, but it appears that he was asked
to play Gary Cooper, and he does that better than anyone else in the movies
these days.  I admit that I like Sigourney Weaver in just about anything; I get
the impression that she takes a part based on whether she likes the script, as
opposed to whether it will enhance her career as a "serious actress".  (Can you
see Sissy Spacek or Meryl Streep rotating over a bed with Bill Murray in it?).
She romps through this one, basically playing Joan Crawford and having a heck
of a good time.  And finally, Joan Cusak gets added to my list of "Durn Good
Character Actors/Actresses", a breed I hold in higher respect than most "lead
actors/actresses".  
     Technically, the film is a dream; the cinematography is excellent, and the
segues between the parts of the films work very well, indeed.  The shots on the
ferry are particularly well done, and the whole film has a texture that is
reflected both in the acting and the way the scenes are photographed.  I am
usually against popular vocalists doing the soundtracks to a film -- the
demands of a film upon it's musical score are usually different than those
placed upon a pop star's ballad.  Carly Simon, however, puts together
background music that fits WORKING GIRL like a glove; it pops up at just the
right places, and is never intrusive.  I hope they put out a soundtrack for
this film...

Title
Review for Without a Clue (1988)
     Farces like WITHOUT A CLUE are born with a twist: a well-known character
or historical figure is pin-wheeled around a concept that is, in some way,
radically different from their continuity/history.  Usually, however, the
surprise from the twist is within full view within the first half-hour, meaning
the film had better have some entertainment value beyond the twist itself.  The
consequences of the twist can be more fully explored, or the actors attempt to
re-define the characters within the scope of the twist.
     WITHOUT A CLUE, as you well know, is about Sherlock Holmes and Dr.
Watson, and there is a twist in their relationship.  It's been discussed quite
a bit in the ads and the papers, but if you really want to know, better bow out
now.  I will say that it's a very funny film and worth your time if you're a
Holmes fan at all.
     The twist is that there is really no Sherlock Holmes.  Dr. Watson (Ben
Kingsley) created the character to cover his own fantastic abilities at
deduction.  However, he needed someone to portray Holmes to the police
(especially Inspector Lestrade), the press and the public.  So he hired an
alcoholic, out-of-work actor (Michael Caine) to play Holmes while he, Watson,
did the detective work.  This occurred nine years before the events of WITHOUT
A CLUE take place; "Holmes" has become something of a pain-in-the-ass (and he
has always been a buffoon), as he has convinced himself that *he* is mostly
responsible for the success of Sherlock Holmes.  Tired of his antics and having
his brilliance attributed to someone else, Watson has decided that it is time
for the two to part.  Unfortunately, neither have particularly great luck
without the other, and there *is* this major crime threatening the economy of
the Empire (devised by you-know-who)....
     Luckily for WITHOUT A CLUE, the creative staff realized that the twist was
only a foundation for the movie; they brought in some very impressive pillars
to keep the whole thing working.  Michael Caine was a brilliant choice for
"Holmes"; he may be a buffoon, but he is a buffoon with wit and a beautiful
lack of scruples.  You laugh at him, but you like him as well.  Kingsley
transfers much of the classic Holmes' mannerisms and acerbic nature to himself,
and his brilliance seems to snap from his eyes.  They're an odd combination of
each other at times, and it's little touches like that that made the film work
so well (not to mention how the story (except for the twist) didn't tread on
the Canon -- old friends from the stories are here in numbers (Wiggins and the
Irregulars, John Clay, etc.).  There are some wonderful lines here, especially
for Sherlockians; and while much of the humor is physical, most of it is very
good slapstick -- the director, Thom Eberhardt, has a knack for framing visual
comedy well.  Jeffrey Jones as Lestrade is an excellent foil for Caine -- I was
laughing hard at the concept that Lestrade, always baffled in the story by
Holmes' methods, had reason to be confused as Holmes *has* no methods -- he
fakes the sleuthing bit while Watson seeks clues elsewhere.  Finally, the film
is rarely obvious; kudos to the writers, Gary Murphy and Larry Strawther, from
ever letting things become routine.
     There are negative points: the physical humor does tend to the slapstick
at several points, and not great slapstick at that.  Henry Mancini's music is
so damn cheery that I thought I was listening to music at the mall (the main
theme sounds a lot like the theme song to "Captain Kangaroo").  And Paul
Freeman plays a stock Professor Moriarty without the imagination or range that
the role deserv----
     *Ahem*.  Anyway, any Holmes fan (and many who are not) should find this to
be a real romp, the kind of holiday film that it is a holiday to watch.  Not
the best movie of the autumn, but certainly one of my favorites of the year.

Title
Review for Things Change (1988)
Since this is a David Mamet film (he directed it, and wrote the screenplay with
Shel Silverstein), you can count on several things:
1)  Certain actors will be present, from Mamet's own personal stable of
    personal favorites: in this case, Joe Montagna and Robert Prosky.  Don
    Ameche is a newcomer to Mamet plays/films, and shares center stage with
    Montagna, and both do a beautiful job.
2)  Everyone talks in a kind of rhythmic manner -- the phrases and words
    spin and loop some.  No, people don't talk like that in real life, but
    that's why Mamet wins awards -- they sound, well, right.
3)  God help you if you're trying to predict what's going to happen in this
    film.  I didn't have a clue, and that was the best part of the film;
    THINGS CHANGE generates curiosity and suspense, as well as laughter,
    melancholy and drama.
With that, I *really* do not want to say much about the film; I'd prefer for
you to go in as virgins to the story.  Let's just say that it's about an old
shoe-shiner, a mob flunky on probation, Reno, and an interesting bunch of mob
personnel that Ameche and Mantegna get mixed up in.  Oh, it also has a moral.
I think.

Title
Review for Dirty Rotten Scoundrels (1988)
     One of my New Years resolutions was driven home to me over the Christmas
Holidays: no more TV Movie Review Programs in 1989.  Actually, I hadn't watched
any of them for months, but upon visiting my parent's house for Christmas, I
was reminded why I have shied away from these shows in the first place.  
     For one thing, they show some of the best clips from the movie in the
previews (this was true for DIRTY ROTTEN SCOUNDRELS, at any rate); secondly,
they don't seem to lose much sleep over whether they've given away the plot to
their viewers (Roger Ebert is particularly bad about that); and finally, the
new crop of reviewers are really awful.  I never thought I'd say it, but the
woman who appears across from Rex Reed on "At The Movies" actually made me feel
sorry for the old geek.  He certainly seems more reasonable when compared to
his Entertainment Tonight Reject co-anchor.
     However, don't get me wrong; DIRTY ROTTEN SCOUNDRELS is not a
one-high-point film.  It carries it's load fairly evenly throughout the whole
film, wearing at the edges only when Steve Martin becomes a little too Jerk-ish
(am I the only one who sees him these days and is immediately struck that
someone has bobbed his nose?).  The script is good, though not great; I didn't
see the film with Niven and Brando that this is based on, but it seems that
someone updated it with competence, if not inspiration.
     Basically, it's an enjoyable comedy, but not something you're going to
remember for more than a few hours afterwards.  A great discount film.  $3.00
value.

Title
Review for Lady in White (1988)
     To garble Dickens, "There's more Spielburg than spectre in you, my
friend."  At points, this reminds me of E.T. with ghosts instead of aliens;
other times, it contains a rather self-conscious resemblance to TO KILL A
MOCKINGBIRD.  This isn't a bad film, but it has a *lot* of potential at points,
almost all of which is unrealized.
     If I sound a bit disappointed with THE LADY IN WHITE, it's because I am.
It came with very good word of mouth; more importantly, it's professed aim -- a
ghost story without gore, that produced chills instead of shocks -- never
materialized.  I gave up on the film being another THE HAUNTING after the first
appearance of the ghost, a little girl whom the main character, a young boy
locked in a school cloakroom after-hours, sees.  It's a basic transparency
shot, superimposed on the setting; while I wouldn't shoot a film down wholly
due to a lack of technical proficiency, THE LADY IN WHITE adds to that a lack
of technical imagination.  This film is rarely spooky (it occasionally pops to
the completely cute, and concludes in a "Close Encounters" light show) and as a
ghost story is badly lacking.
     However, the director/writer has woven in several other threads besides
the spectral elements.  It's a mystery in that a child murderer is on the loose
in the community (the little girl was one of the first victims); unfortunately,
the identity of the killer is telegraphed early into the film.  It also tries
to be a "kids' eye-view" type of film, narrated by an adult version of the boy
(again, TO KILL A MOCKINGBIRD seems to echo through the film).  Parts of this
work, especially the younger boy's relation with his older brother; but the
strongest element in the whole film is the racial subplot.  The film is based
in the early sixties, and the black janitor of the school is accused of being
the murderer.  This, I thought, was handled very well, but it's a very small
part of the rest of the film, and can't justify the rest.  My other complaint
is the soundtrack (*also* done by the writer-director); it's terribly
overbearing throughout the film, especially during the suspense scenes.
     It's not really a bad film, per se; it's just not a good one.  The
conclusion is a retread of both fantasy and suspense movie (talk about dragging
it out...); and while I liked the "dated feel" the film had, it just wasn't
enough.
     Rate it a $2 movie if you've got absolutely nothing to do on a fall
afternoon (and you should).  Otherwise, skip it.

Title
Review for Sinnui yauman (1987)
     I've been trying to figure out how to describe the sheer fun I had at this
film.  I haven't seen anything that mixed this many genres and kept me this
hooked since ALIENS; I hear the VILLAGE VOICE said it "combined the best
elements of THE PRINCESS BRIDE and EVIL DEAD II," and recommended that no
amphetamines be taken before viewing it.  This is a *wise move*.  A CHINESE
GHOST STORY has more energy in it then last year's entire summer film season
(with the lone exception of ROBOCOP), and a damn site more adventure than the
last four LucasFilm entries.  It also combines romance, horror, adventure,
martial arts, comedy and satire and does each one well.  I think you'll have
the time of your life there, frankly; this is BUCKAROO BANZAI-style
genre-mixing, if you know what I mean and I know you do.
     Well, what we got?  We got a foolish young tax collector whose in bad with
the local yokels and decides to spend the night at a haunted shrine.  We have a
beautiful young thing he falls in love with but who has a terrible secret.  We
got a bad-ass old samurai who's sharing the shrine with the lad; he bounces off
of trees, fires rays from his hands, does a rap number right in the middle of
the film, and gets to say the kind of great things that Warren Oates always got
to say in his films.  We got zombies, ghosts, hags, stupid warrior types and a
40-foot animated tongue.  Ho-boy!  This is my kind of neighborhood!
     Damndest thing is, it works great as a love story, as a folk tale, and as
an adventure.  The plot and the samurai add a real tongue-in-cheek feeling to
the works, and the martial arts sequences takes those leaping-forty-feet-in-
the-air sequences you see on Channel 61's Hong Kong Theater every Sunday
morning and jacks them up about 400%.  I really got to caring about whether the
lad and the sweet young thing were going to make it.  This is great stuff!
Good photography, though on a budget, and a lot of the sub-titles are
misspelled, but that kinda adds to the flavor.  (first sub-titled film I've
been to where you'd hear people asking "*What* did he say?")
     Rating:  Faded if not seen on a weekend night.  However, worth every penny
of $5 if seen at midnight movie, preferably with cronies and munchies.
Wouldn't be bad on video, either.  Leave the diet pills *at home*.

Title
Review for Shoot to Kill (1988)
     If I were writing a syndicated column for THE NEW YORKER or FILM COMMENT,
I imagine I could have titled this review and that of HOUSEKEEPING [printed
elsewhere -ecl] "two from the Pacific NorthWest," since the majority of both
films take place in the timberlines of west Washington state.  Warning,
Warning, Will Robinson...  linking analogy approaching!  However, since Pauline
Kael has not suffered a massive stroke as of yet (her review of THREE MEN AND A
BABY left me with the impression that she had at least left the theater with
huge, throbbing veins sticking out of her neck) and hence no vacancy at the NY,
I'll just admit that I saw the two films last week, separated by a couple of
days.
     Frankly, I've had a bad time with TV and movie cops.  Growing up Under
Mass Media, almost all of them seemed to be inappropriate for the "heroic
policeman" role most boys have, somewhere, in the back of their head.  Jack
Webb was too dull (and later, too conservative--"Why do you think they call
it dope, son?"  *DUM-DA-DUMM-DUMM*!), along with the boys on ADAM-12; Steve
(Jack Lord) McGarret appeared almost immediately pompous to me ("Gosh, Steve,
you're always one step ahead of these guys."  "That's why I've got the big
office, Danno.").  Columbo was great, but can you imagine the good
Lt. protecting someone against several Mafia hit men?  And Dirty Harry was just
a detective with a good aim and a bad attitude; enjoying him was based on really
disliking his opponents.
     However, there was one guy whose several appearances as a policeman
impressed me as a young 'un, an actor who played the type of detective that
seemed in the best tradition of Holmes: someone with great intelligence,
resolution and deductive abilities *and* the ability to pull the fat out of the
fire in a tense situation.  While some of Sidney Poitier's appearances in
detective films were more concerned with racial issues than crime thrillers
(i.e. his Mr. Tibbs series--IN THE HEAT OF THE NIGHT, THEY CALL ME MR. TIBBS,
THE ORGANIZATION), he always portrayed a detective who was *really*
dangerous--he had brains.  Instead of twitching an eyebrow and muttering
vengeance, he'd read the clues, outsmart the villain...  and then blow him
away, in a perfectly legitimate shoot-out.  Under control, planning every
move--you could just *hear* his mind clicking away in the background.
     Well, he's back (but not as Tibbs) in SHOOT TO KILL, and clicking away
like crazy.  In the fine tradition of "Waste-His-Ass" movies everywhere (Brief
Definition: A "Waste-His-Ass" movie is a film that shows a villain performing
such heinous crimes during the first reel that the audience is heavily rooting
for the hero to cream the villain, i.e. "Waste-His-Ass"), we have a really
dangerous, brutal criminal who gets FBI agent Poitier involved in a hostage
situation and escapes.  Poitier tracks him down to (I'm required by state law
to say this: Beautiful) northern Washington, where he has joined a
hiking/fishing trip (led by Kirstie Alley).  Alley's boyfriend (Tom Beringer),
a "mountain man," sets out after them with Poitier in tow.  You can probably
guess the rest....
     Poitier does a good job as the FBI agent--he justifies the hero role by
deducing what's going on.  Beringer is fine as a foil to Poitier, especially in
the woods; Alley's character, though, is lucky she's not dead after the second
reel, considering how she treats the killer (I kept wanting to shout, "Use the
Vulcan Neck Pinch, Kirstie!").  There are some other good elements: the
photography is inventive (especially at the beginning of the film), and the
short mystery about which of the five fisherman on the trip is really the
killer is pretty good (I guessed wrong, though if I'd given it a little
thought, I would have come up with the correct answer).  And it's the first
movie since MONTY PYTHON AND THE HOLY GRAIL to have a Moose Trainer in the
credits.  But it's overlong: by the end of the film, the manhunt has gotten
tedious, and the humor from Poitier's wilderness struggles are gone.  There are
some real gapes in logic (though not as many as the standard action pic is heir
to), and the soundtrack is annoying at time (the scene with Poitier and
Beringer climbing over the snow just cried for a narrator saying something like
"On and on... further and further... they trudged to their DESTINY because...
THE MOUNTIES ALWAYS GET THEIR MAN!").
     Conclusion: overlong, but redeemable with concessions.  However, if you
ever meet a grizzly bear in the woods, *do not* attempt Mr. Poitier's method of
protection.  Talk about the magic of movies...

Title
Review for House on Carroll Street, The (1988)
     For me, thrillers are difficult to really dislike.  While I usually find 
a mediocre comedy objectionable enough to actively disklike, a thriller with
even a few redeeming qualities can have me leaving the theater feeling sated.
The trick is, this is a thriller-packed season, I assume due to the success of
FATAL ATTRACTION.  Unfortunately, the ones provided are lackluster, even by my
relatively lax standards.
Of the thrillers I've seen over the last few weeks, only this one made the
mark, and then just barely.  Polanski uses his shots sparingly; while there is
little direct menace in this film, there is a good deal of suspense, both from
the underlying plot (an American surgeon's wife is kidnapped in Paris, but no
one believes him) and from the careful camera- work.  It also has an conclusion
which doesn't seem to have been meddled with by some asinine public poll.  And,
compared to some other, more obtuse thrillers, the relatively down-to-earth
plot was appreciated.   This has occasionally been compared to Hitchcock's
films; I think it's to be appreciated more if you say that the *premise* is
something that  Hitchcock would do.  And there's some merit in that, as well.
On the other hand, no one gives more than a 2.5 dimensional performance in the
film, which can get by in a thriller -- but it's not a complement.   Ford plays
rather cold, determined husband (though he did make that important attraction
between his character's wife and himself in the opening scene.  The young
Parisian who helps him is memorable only for that incredibly distracting
leather skirt.  And the plot barely holds together on the hairpin turns.
Satisfying, but nothing to rave over.  $3 worth.
Lots of bad points in this: the two romantic leads smolder about as much as a
doused Girl Scout campfire; the plot is barely comprehensible, and not
particularly suspense-building; and there wit which usually marks  Peter Yates
thrillers isn't here.  Yates has a background in doing good thrillers, so this
is a disappointment.
Two good points (but not enough to save the film):  Mandy Patinkin plays one of
the most repulsive villains to grace the scene in quite a while.  Instead of
overt threats of violence, he marks his character with an ability to
rationalize anything to support his decisions.  It's been suggested that this
is based on Roy Cohn, but Patinkin gives it his own special reptilian touch --
he looks like a young Robert DeNiro.  Good scene.  The other point of interest
is that this is one of the few period films where they really put effort into
making it look In Period.  There are a lot of large crowd scenes, street scenes
and outdoor scenes, and I couldn't spot anything that wouldn't be out of place
in the 50s.  Right out of a Rex Stout mystery...
Not worth the interest -- really, not even a decent video.  $1.00, but go to
the library.
Wonderful concept -- a guy gets poisoned, and has 48 hours to figure out who
killed him!  You know he's going to die, no way around it; even though I've
seen the original B&W version, it's still a compelling basis for the story.
The twist of having the fellow who is D.O.A. see how much life was really
worth, and how badly he wasted it, is an even better twist.  And the film has
the kind of manic, original photography you'd expect from the couple that did
the original Max Headroom video.
But... it bogs down on other points.  None of the characters really are 
appealing, except for Quaid's character, and he only hints at the thoughts he
must be having with his limited time.  While the concept is sound, the detail
work stinks -- the red herrings are incompetently done, and wholly
unbelievable, and the revelation of the murderer is a real  Perry Mason job, if
you know what I mean.  The photography, while interesting at the beginning,
really begins to wear down, especially when it reverts to standard during the
actions scenes in the middle.  It ends up reminding you of a neon game of Clue
instead of a mystery/thriller.
Perhaps more of a mystery than a thriller -- come to think of it, it could be a
lot of things by definition.  It ends up being a stinker with a really great
story concept behind it.  If they'd shortened it to 20 minutes, put it in the
new TWILIGHT ZONE TV program, and had got rid of all the distraction cameos,
this would have made it.  But there are so many problems, not the least being
that Ellen Barkin, whose ability to appear awkward worked so well in THE BIG
EASY, may have indicated that it comes from actually *being* awkward -- she
overplays this thing like she was back on the set of BUCKAROO BANZAI.  The rest
of it seems to foster the kind of useless babbling that is labeled "fresh" but
is usually a bid for lengthening the film.

Title
Review for Marusa no onna (1987)
See at the Seattle Film Festival:
A TAXING WOMAN (Japan, 1987)
Director/Screenwriter: Juzo Itami
Cast: Nobuko Miyamoto, Tautomu Yamazaki, Masahiko Tsugawa, Hideo Murota
     Rarely has a foreign, sub-titled film garnered so much attention in the
U.S.  I heard two NPR bits and a CBS news report on this before viewing it (I
abstained from Stanley Kaufman's review in "The New Republic," not wanting to
spoil any surprises).  The great success of Itami's previous film, TAMPOPO, in
both the US and Japan centered media interest on his latest effort --
especially since A TAXING WOMAN has been so popular in Japan.  Also, it's
subject -- tax evasion in Japan, with the main character a female tax inspector
-- has raised the feelers of various news programs, and so has snowballed into
popular interest.
     Unfortunately, I had a midnight showing the night before and nights of
film viewing before that; by the time I got to A TAXING WOMAN, I was dead tired
and barely hanging in there.  I think I drifted off for about twenty minutes
during the first half hour, and while I don't feel I missed much, I wouldn't
feel right about drawing any conclusions.   For those of you expecting another
outrageous comedy like TAMPOPO, don't; A TAXING WOMAN reminds me a little of
those documentry-like police dramas that used to appear years ago -- great
effort is expended to show what a tax inspector's life is like.  It actually
looks appealing; I mean, if you had to pick a job that required you to smoke
cigarettes and work 70 hours a week, this would probably be my choice.
However, Itami centers on some of the amusing aspects of the job, and ends with
an ironic tone that seems to question whether or not the taxing is in the best
interests of the citizens.
     No grade, but I liked what I saw of it.  Can anyone up on popular Japanese
culture explain the significance of the blood-stained handkerchief that the
financier gives Ryoko (Miyamoto)?  I'm curious.

Title
Review for Souvenir (1988)
     If I had to pick a film from this year's festival that could cause some
real controversy when it's released, SOUVENIR would would be right up there.
Not that it works at being controversial -- first and foremost, it is a
character drama -- but it also takes on the emotional issue of guilt, and
assigning guilt, in the aftermath of a war.  Christopher Plummer plays Ernst
Kestner, a widowed grocer who has lived in America since 1950.  In 1944, he was
with the German army during their occupation of a small French village, where
he fell in love with a local French girl.  He was shipped out without seeing
here again, and has remembers his time with her very romantically.  After
retiring, he decides to visit the village again, to remind him of his time with
her and to find out if she is still alive.  His estranged daughter (Hicks)
decides to accompany him, and his cold reserve to her begins to melt as they
approach the village.
     Kestner is in for a massive shock.  The village is much as he remembered
it, but it has become a monument to the Nazi war atrocities; in reprisal for
Resistance attacks, the local Gestapo rounded up the women and children of the
village and locked them in the town church.  They then burned it to the ground.
Included in those who were burned to death was Kestner's lover.  It is clear
that Kestner did not know she had died in the fire, but we are left wondering
how much *did* he know?  And is he to blame?  That question is constantly left
hanging to the audience, to Kestner's daughter, and to Kestner himself.  To add
further fuel to the moral controversy, the town's mayor (Lonsdale), a famed
resistance fighter who rose to political celebrity with his slogan to "never
forget", is very close to attaining a position of national prominence, and his
previous statements on keeping the memories of World War II alive are in
conflict with his plans for European unity.  Towards the end of the film,
Kestner becomes a catalyst for the mayor's political decision, and Lonsdale
reveals information which complicates the web of guilt even further.
     I came out of this movie trying to figure out whether the director was
trying to make a specific statement with this film, i.e., whether he favored
either side of the argument.  After a month of contemplation, I'd have to say
no -- he's just skillful enough to to outline the best arguments on either
side, and let it play from there.  While it works as character drama, it's
equally good at stimulating ideas and outlining conflicts, and I'll be
interested to hear what others think of it.
     Christopher Plummer gets his best role in years; however, I keep wondering
what other actors could have done with Kestner.  With Plummer, you get the
feeling that he's pushing himself to the limit with any kind of emotion
(Kestner is a very "frigid" person, so this seems appropriate), but I felt like
I still was missing a large piece of his character by the end of the film.
Hicks and Cazenove (as a hack reporter who stumbles on Kestner and daughter and
sees a story in it), while doing nothing particularly noteworthy in the acting
category, keep the film from grinding under its own angst every twenty minutes
with their back-and-forth pleasantries.  Lonsdale (who I've only seen in DAY OF
THE JACKAL and as Drax in MOONRAKER) is perfect as the savvy and very
intelligent mayor of the village.
     Nothing spectacular, but a very involving little film from beginning to
end.  Certainly food for thought (and arguments) for those of a political bent.
Recommended for a Tuesday night viewing with coffee afterwards.

Title
Review for Xiaoao Jianghu (1990)
[Moderator's note: I am splitting these reviews up by country, because I
have to split them up some way.  I am not trying to be provincial. -ecl]
I'd like to recommend the first five minutes of this film -- the
cheesy special effects and the awful subtitling really produce a few
marvelous moments.  (As the Daughter of Hell rains fireballs down upon
an archaeological expedition at the South Pole, the screams of the
dying and the panicked scientists are translated as "Move quickly.")
Unfortunately, the rest of the film gets so sugary (with the exception
of a stop-action transformation/metamorphosis scene that is so
overdone that it gets boring after a while) that it peters out about
halfway through.
The latest from Tsui Hark, the man who brought you CHINESE GHOST
STORY, PEKING OPERA BLUES and A TERRA COTTA WARRIOR.  The story deals
with a rather high-spirited swordsman and his classmates, who are
caught up in a power struggle to recover a secret scroll.  In the same
vein as PEKING OPERA BLUES, but better (the male lead plays it pretty
loose) than BLUES or TERRA COTTA WARRIOR.  As usual with films Hark is
involved in (he's co-director here), the story doesn't take itself
entirely seriously, and knows when to throw in a joke when the kung fu
plot is getting a mite ridiculous.  Certainly this is has some of the
best fight-scene gags I've seen in any Hong Kong martial arts flick.
If you're a fan of the genre, this is definitely worth seeing.
Nice premise -- a talented artist enters a small village to paint a
portrait of the Madonna for the local church, but manages to stir up a
storm due to his attributing African features to the Virgin Mary, as
well as his wooing of a local beauty.  The questions of prejudice
never make it past your average TV docu-drama, and for the most part
the picture wallows in a tropical DYNASTY atmosphere.  Avoid.
A young rock musician who is descended from a long line of Buddhist
priests is expected to enter a temple for a year as a novice, so that
he can claim his inheritance.  Well, you can see the possibilities...
The film concentrates on rather droll humor, especially when the
musician starts to like the aesthetics of the job, and some satire of
modern Japanese society (there's a number of jokes I'm sure I'm missed
because I'm unfamiliar with the culture.)  For those who enjoyed films
like LIVING ON TOKYO TIME, I suspect this will be a similar pleasure;
it is not a sprawling spoof like TAMPOPO.
THE VIOLENT COP (Japan, 1990 (US Premiere)):
I need to keep reminding that, when it comes to "dark satire",
Japanese films tend to be pitch-black.  The film features Takeshi
Kitano (Sgt. Hara in MERRY CHRISTMAS, MR. LAWRENCE; he also directed
the picture) as Azuma, a sort of a taciturn, shuffling Dirty Harry.
He is, as the title says, a violent cop; and as case he becomes
involved in, tracking down a gang of monstrous dope dealers, gets more
involved, he becomes more and more violent.
As the film starts off, the title character's breaking-the-rules use
of force appears as almost humorous -- very similar to tough-cop
American films; the hitting and kicking isn't romanticized, but in the
context of the events, it's seems rather droll.  What changes is that
the criminals' level of violence escalates (again, non-romanticized),
and Azuma does the same; guns are introduced, and whatever surface
humor there was vanishes quickly.
This ends in an utterly ridiculous situation at the end, a lampoon of
every tough-guy cop final confrontation scene, that is *so* violent I
felt ill afterwards -- not due to gore, but just the pure brutality of
it all.  The film makes its point clearly and with some humor, but in
the process completely repulsed me.  (HENRY: PORTRAIT OF A SERIAL
KILLER comes to mind, but it's not *that* horrific.)  I'd recommend it
only to the more hardened black humorists out there.
Looking for some unadulterated, well-done romantic fluff with good
production values and engaging faces?  Try this one.  The film follows
the life of a young, independent romance writer from a section of
China that is invaded and occupied by the Japanese in 1938.  She is
approached, and falls in love with, a fan of hers who is also a
collaborator with the Japanese (he's suitably noble, of course).
Meanwhile, her greatest friend, a student whose absent boyfriend is a
resistance fighter, also comes to live with her, and the three form a
pocket of relative happiness during the war.  But with the ending of
the war and the rise of Mao and communism, their world is thrown into
turmoil.  (My God, I sound like the cover blurb for a Harlequin
Romance novel.)
Anyway, while the plot is nothing above the norm, the acting,
dialogue, and production values are very good, and the film even has a
DR. ZHIVAGO-like ending which lifts it out of mundanity.  Actually,
given the choice between seeing ZHIVAGO and RED DUST again, it'd be a
tough call.  If they had just gotten Alec Guiness in the cast...
ENCOUNTERS OF THE SPOOKY KIND, PART II (Hong Kong, 1990):
Let me just open this review by saying that there are few things which
enhance a midnight film experience more than pogo-hopping kung fu
vampires.  It's the sort of subtle plot element that a good Hong Kong
martial arts film is known throughout the world for, and ENCOUNTERS OF
THE SPOOKY KIND, PART II, is a fine addition to the hall of fame.  It
reminded me of the comic parts of Tsui Hark's A CHINESE GHOST STORY;
while I like Hark's style of comic action-adventure, he usually has
some actual drama running through it; and there are times where I want
my Kung Fu funny and silly and over-the-top all the way through.
Unfortunately, some of them get so silly (like PEACOCK KING) that it
loses its edge; happily, this SIFF comic Kung Fu entry hit things
right on the noggin. ENCOUNTERS is the brainchild of
director/producer/star Samo Hung; Samo resembles a Pillsbury dough boy
with a Moe Howard haircut and the sort of awesome martial arts
abilities (bouncing off walls, leaping hundreds of feet in the air
with a WHOOSH sound) that only come out of Hong Kong studios.
After a hilarious opening sequence (ah, those pogo-stick vampires!),
we open up on Samo trying to make enough dough in his small village to
appease his girlfriend's father.  His rival, a rich geek with a monkey
witch doctor, tries to do Samo out of his girlfriend by various forms
of black magic.  On Samo's side is his mentor, a hilariously droll
master martial artist, and his best friend, a decent comedy relief.
As the conflict escalates, the witch doctor decides to destroy
everyone on Samo's side, leaving you with the a final hour of
high-voltage special-effects monster-kicking fun.  Lots of energy,
lots of fun, lots of guys slapping their wrists together, wincing,
exclaiming loudly and firing explosive bolts from their fingers.
That's entertainment!

Title
Review for Sundown: The Vampire in Retreat (1989)
[Seen at the Seattle International Film Festival]
SUNDOWN: The Vampire in Retreat (US, 1989)  WORLD PREMIERE
Director: Anthony Hickox
Screenwriters: John Burgess and Anthony Hickox
Cast: David Carradine, Maxwell Caulfield, Bruce Campbell, Deborah Foreman,
      M. Emmet Walsh, Morgan Brittany, Marion Eaton, John Ireland
     When on the subject of unsung quality film work, I like to bring up a
rather unlikely name: David Carradine.  No, I'm not some zoned-out KUNG FU
groupie who thinks TV peaked with Carradine muttering earnestly while kicking
the royal whatsis out of unthinking Old West bigots/cattle barons/rich-guys-
with-an-attitude.  In Slo-Mo.  ("You must learn the way ... of peace."  *WHAP*
"Say, that Chinaman just stuck his ankle through Zeke's forehead!"  "Yeah, in
slow motion!  Real artistic-like!  Where's Peckinpah -- he'd appreciate this!"
"I say we ALL attack the Chinaman -- but one-on-one, instead of in a group!
And without weapons!"  *WHAP* *WHAP* *WHAP*...)
     No, I'm talking film, not that backwater medium called television.
Because when the name David Carradine is found on any B-movie over the last
decade, you can be sure that magic is just around the corner.  Remember...
DEATH RACE 2000: Paul Bartell.  Roger Corman.  David Carradine.  Mary Woronov.
Sly Stallone.  Congressman Fred Grandy.  Gives you hot flashes just thinking
about it, eh?  LONE WOLF McQUADE:  Who can forget Chuck Norris propelling his
mighty four-wheel-drive American-built pickup out of the grave after being
buried alive in it?  And, of course, showing NO EMOTION WHATSOEVER!  Is that a
real man, or what?  Q:  David Carradine AND Michael Moriarty (No Relation, BTW,
outside of vast mutual respect), the other B-Movie lucky rabbit's foot (e.g.
THE STUFF, TROLL), *together* on the *same* *screen*, with a *very* *bad*
*stop-animation* *Ghidrah*.  Special Bonus: Richard Roundtree!  (No Shaft-sized
gun, though.)
     So you can well imagine my expectations when I saw Carradine's name
heading up SUNDOWN; and, for at least once this summer, my high expectations
were exceeded.  This is one heckuva lotta fun, and clever to boot.  It's
advertised as the first Vampire Western Comedy, and I'll be damned if it
doesn't deliver in the best tongue-through-cheek B-Movie tradition.  I'm not
giving away anything by describing the initial plot set-up -- it's plastered on
the screen before the opening titles, in STAR WARS fashion, to a wonderfully
overblown Western theme by Richard Stone.  By the end of this decade, many of
the vampires in the world are tired of killing, and in turn being hunted by
humans.  The visionary vampire Count Mardulak (Carradine) believes that
vampires and humans can live in peace, and has gathered many of his brethren up
and taken them to a small ghost town in the American West.  There, with the
help of sunblock, UVH protected glass and artificial blood produced from a
local plant, the vampires are trying to "live" a peaceful, if somewhat
isolated, existence, with the hope of someday walking the earth side-by-side
with man.
     HOWEVER (you knew that was coming, right?), some of the vampires (led by
Fundamentalist Vampire John Ireland and scientist Max Caulfield) believe that
this artificial blood stuff (which looks kinda like vanilla Yoo-Hoo) is for
weenies, and start an underground Right To Bite movement.  There's a problem at
the artificial blood plant, and biochemist Bruce Campbell (the inventor of the
process -- he thinks its being used for leukemia patients) has been invited to
visit the plant by Mardulak and find out what's wrong.  Deciding to make it a
working holiday, Campbell brings his picture-perfect family (with wife Morgan
Brittany and their two daughters) with him in the station wagon -- but hey!
Turns out Brittany dumped Caulfield for Campbell, and he's still got the hots
for her...
     Well, you get the picture.  Pretty soon, you've got a Sergio Leone war
between Carradine's and Ireland's forces, with Campbell and family in the
middle.  We're talking cinema milestones here, folks:  A vampire mob scene!
Vampires on horses!  Sergio Leone gunfights!  A stretch Caddy with vampire
bodyguards!  David Carradine gives a speech right out of a Frank Capra movie
about refraining from drinking human blood!  A nice little old vampire couple!
M.  Emmet Walsh decapitating an obnoxious Porsche driver!  (Note for squeamish
fans: that's as bad as it gets -- this isn't a gore film.)  Pretty darn good
vampire/bat transformation scenes and stop-action bats!  (Up there with THE
HOWLING, anyway.)  More rousing Silverado-type western music!  A vampire
yelling, "Let's saddle up and RIDE!"
     There's a lot of funny stuff here -- not just camp humor, but clever
material.  (Though it goes down better at a midnight movie -- that's what it
was designed as, I think.)  There's also some admirable story continuity, as
the vampire "legends" are nicely supported and enforced throughout the plot.
Standout performances by Carradine, who knows just when to drop the serious
lines and play to the camera; and M. Emmet Walsh, as a crotchety old vampire
who is trying *really* hard to stay on his diet...
     I don't know if this went straight to video (it's released by Vestron,
which appears to at least be making *quality* B-pictures out these days,
instead of crap like MIDNIGHT CROSSING that they brought to last year's
festival.)   But it's definitely worth your $$; SUNDOWN was some of the best
fun I've had in a movie theater this year.
     Definitely recommended, with special Best Fun at the Festival awarded by
Yours Truly.

Title
Review for Say Anything... (1989)
     Speaking for myself, I really enjoy a good romantic comedy, heavy on the
romantic side.  Unfortunately, there aren't too many good examples of that
genre leaning towards the romantic.  It is a credit to John Cusack that he
stars in the only two that really come to mind over the last five years:  THE
SURE THING, and now SAY ANYTHING.  Of the two, I enjoyed SAY ANYTHING the most;
while THE SURE THING takes place in a reality I know exists, SAY ANYTHING
unfolds in a reality I know.  What is amazing -- what is truly amazing -- about
this film is that it is able to nurture the spirit of romance in a setting that
never forsakes its hold The Way Things Work to keep the romantic plot going.
Nothing less than hope for frustrated romantics everywhere....
     The film opens with Cusack's character graduating from high school.  He's
living with his sister (played by Cusack's real-life sister Joan in an
uncredited role) with only two things certain in his mind: that he enjoys
kick-boxing, and that he has fallen in love, from afar, with the the most
brilliant graduate in his graduate class, played by Ione Skye, who hardly knows
him from Adam.  Skye has just found out that she's won a prestigious fellowship
to study in England starting in the next fall; she is delighted -- almost as
delighted as her doting, affectionate father, played by John Mahoney.
     Cusack's character is hardly a scholar (though his honesty and good nature
alone make him exceptional), but he manages to generate enough uneasy courage
to ask Skye's character to go out with him to a graduation party.  She, in
turn, gets the chance to encounter a (wonderfully accurate) group of people she
has gone to school with for three years, separated from by her exceptional
scholarship.  And she finds herself liking Cusack's character very much....
     This is one of those rare films where the plot could have fallen into the
ruts of cliche at almost any point, but through superior direction, writing and
acting, scrapes off the layers of cinematic reworkings and literally shines.
John Mahoney's character could so easily have degenerated into the
parent-who-thinks-boyfriend-no-good role, but he's witty and imaginative; he
affection and friendship with his daughter are immediately endearing, and if he
dislikes Cusack's character because of the threat he sees to his daughter's
future, you can also see his occasional delight with the special character
Cusack plays.  Cusack, Skye and Mahoney's characters are all wonderfully
written and acted, but the other exceptional point of this film is how well the
smaller roles are created and performed.  The three girls who are Cusack's
closest friends are a delight, like ducats found on the side of the road during
a pleasant journey.  They are funny without being absurd, and telling without
being preachy or sounding artificial.  Indeed, it is amazing how much character
the creative team is able to develop in so small a time.  Joan Cusack can't
have more than a minute and a half in this film, but she manages to create a
harried, worried, loving sister during that time.
     Get the message?  One of the two or three best films I've seen this year
(and that includes the entire SIFF).  Don't take the chance that you'll miss
it: see it now.

Title
Review for Heathers (1989)
[Seen at the Seattle International Film Festival]
Director: Michael Lehmann
Screenwriter: Daniel Waters
Cast: Winona Ryder, Christian Slater, Shannen Doherty, Lisanne Falk,
      Kim Walder, Penelope Milford
     While not running on all eight cylinders, HEATHERS crosses the finish line
with 6.8 of them going full blast, and is one of the funniest films of the year
-- which should be a good enough recommendation for most folks, methinks.  It
has generally been labeled a "black comedy" (though not nearly as dark as I had
been led to believe from local reviewers, who were apparently afraid that high
school murders treated comically were more likely to offend than Freddy's
latest outing.  Go figure...), and seems to be mentioned in the same breath
with RIVER'S EDGE, probably because both deal with high school kids and murder.
That's about where the similarities end, though; HEATHERS is also a witty, acid
send-up of high school conventions in the upper-middle-classes, with more
on-target barbs than I can remember seeing in every Brat Pack film John Hughes
has done in the last eight years.  It's satire -- mean-spirited, nasty, cunning
satire, which is of course the best and most honest kind.
     Winona Ryder plays a high school student who, when the film opens, is a
member of Westerburg High School's most exclusive clique of girls.  She's
getting uncomfortable, though, with the mental and social cruelty that her
peers are dishing out every day, and when a handsome, sardonic outsider
(Christian Slater) starts up with her, she thinks this might be her way out of
the clique.  It is, but *not* in the way she thinks...
     The film's strong points rest between the outrageousness of the plot
(murders assumed to be suicides in the school population, and the effects on
the students, parents and the community) and the wonderful dialogue and
mannerisms of the characters.  Yeah, I've been out of high school for over a
decade (thankGodthankGodthankGod), but the cadence and attitudes are right on
the money.  ("Fuck me gently with a chain saw -- do I look like Mother
Theresa?")  It's just one good line after another...  The school's reaction to
the "mass suicides" is hysterical; this makes FAST TIMES AT RIDGEMONT HIGH look
like THE WONDER YEARS.  Lehmann and Waters treat Westerburg High like an
anthropology case study, detailing dominance, relationships, sex and group
migration.  The report based on the study, however, has more of O'Donoghue
(Michael) than Darwin in it.
     There are some problems, though; most of them center around the half hour
before the conclusion, where the film almost becomes a pedestrian thriller.
The humor and satire are temporarily muted, and we have the usual
stalking/stalked chase scene, albeit taking place underneath a school assembly.
It's as if the creators weren't sure what to do before the climax (where they
return to the satiric tone of the rest of the film, thankfully), and filled it
in with a standard suspense sequence with some humorous touches.
     The whole cast is good, adding to the characterizations of an excellent
script with expansive performances.  Christian Slater seems to have decided to
imitate Jack Nicholson at 18 (he's pretty good, at that), and it gets
distracting at times; but it limits his performance without hurting it.
(Daniel Waters, the writer, was at the performance, and mentioned that the
psuedo-Nicholson tone was Slater's idea; Water's disliked it, but it appealed
to Lehmann, so it stayed.)  Ryder is the standout, in a performance that is
three-dimensional, yet slips right in with the film's satiric tone.  Other
satiric comedies at the festival either tried mixing satire with drama and
failed (YEN FAMILY, CHORUS OF DISAPPROVAL) or stuck to just satire (SCENES FROM
THE CLASS STRUGGLE IN BEVERLY HILLS); HEATHERS attempted and, for the most
part, succeeded with both, making it one of the strongest comic films of the
year.
[Side note:  I wished I'd taped Water's comments, as he is about as amusing as
you would expect from the writer of HEATHERS.  His description of almost
selling the project to Disney was worth the price of admission.]

Title
Review for Tampopo (1986)
     I have to give credit to the Japanese filmmakers over the last two years;
they are producing some of the funniest films to grace the Film Festival.
Latest in the rostrum (and heavily recommended via word of mouth from NPR,
Pauline Kael) is TAMPOPO, a story of a widowed noodle cook, a truck driver who
seems to be John Wayne on the side, a vagrant food connoisseur, a churlish
contractor with a heart of gold, and a gangster who seems to be combining his
passion for food and his passion for his sexy moll.  And gourmets.  Gad,
EVERYONE in this film is a gourmand, from top executive assistants down to
bowery bums.  Anyone and everyone will suddenly stop whatever they're doing and
begin to talk in terms straight out of your local "Best Places" restaurant
guide, how the broth lacks sincerity but the noodles have guts.
     Actually, this film has a rather interesting construction, not seen since
some of the later Monty Python movies.  It has a main plot, that of Tampopo, a
widow who runs a not-very-good noodle shop.  Two truckers, one being the
archetype of most Western heroes of the 50s, help her give the bum's rush to a
bunch of toughs, and she is inspired to rise above her cooking inadequacies,
and become "the best noodle cook in Japan."  The plot follows her through her
training by her trucker friend, her investigations into the secrets behind
really good noodles, and her various trials to get secret ingredients to bring
her to noodle nirvana.  Meanwhile, the film will suddenly wander from the main
plot to various skits occurring nearby, always involving food and usually
involving the gangster with the erotic dinner ideas.  I have heard a lot of
comparisons between some of these scenes and the famous sequences in TOM JONES;
while I don't think they're as entertaining as the sequences in JONES, they're
funny--erotic humor seems to pass through the language barrier with flying
colors.  Some of the other sketches are much funnier, including a board-room
dinner at a fancy French restaurant.  The sketches don't interrupt the main
plot of Tampopo (the name of the aspiring noodle chef) for too long, and some
(but certainly not all) are worth the side trip.
     But the most interesting storyline is that of Tampopo, and Juzo Itami has
the wisdom to keep the center of the movie firmly tied to her apron-strings.  A
B- movie ($4.50 value), with heavy recommendations to get to the theater on
time--this has the funniest opening sequence of any film I've seen this year,
as the gangster decides to have a meal in another movie theater.

Title
Review for Silence at Bethany, The (1988) (TV)
[Actually, it's been about a month since the Seattle International Film
Festival ended; I've been busy with other matters and haven't gotten a chance
to get the rest of the Film Festival reviews out.  Hopefully I'll have the rest
written by July 4th.  -moriarty]
     There are things to look for in the SIFF schedules.  One of the better
signs, at least for me, has been that the film is an "American Playhouse
Theatrical Release," i.e. sponsored by the PBS television program of the same
name.  These are released in theaters first, then on TV (the one that comes to
mind is A FLASH OF GREEN).  They are almost always understated, intelligent
dramas that involve one intellectually as well as emotionally.  SILENCE AT
BETHANY is no exception.
     The film takes place in a Pennsylvania Mennonite community during the
early 1940s.  A young man named Ira Martin (Mark Moses) who grew up in the
community (but left to live with relatives out-of-state when his parents died
in a fire) returns to visit.  The simple, non-materialistic lifestyle appeals
to him, as does the local deacon's niece (Wilder).  In turn, the deacon sees
Ira's spiritual knowledge and enthusiasm for the church as factors that would
make him an excellent preacher for the community.
     His assessment turns out to be accurate; after marrying the niece, Ira
becomes a model preacher, giving excellent sermons and supporting the members
of the community.  However, he begins to conflict with the deacon's strict
ideas about the interpretation of the scriptures in daily life; and the
Mennonites (at least in this film) consider conflict within the community (at
least public conflict) an extremely traumatic event -- something to be avoided
at all costs.  How Ira, his family and the community deal with this conflict is
the kernel of the plot, and it is certainly intellectually involving.
     One of the more refreshing elements of SILENCE AT BETHANY is in how the
Mennonites are portrayed.  Films like WITNESS always portray Quakers or
Mennonites as spiritual hermits, constrained from emotions and habits which are
considered "normal" by most of us by their faith and customs.  All the
characters in SILENCE AT BETHANY lack the Cecil B. DeMille oratorical hang-up;
they discuss love, necking and each other with the candidness you would expect
from people living in a farm community.  Really, the film centers on how the
traditional customs of the community that do exist can survive in post-war
America.  None of the characters are stereotypes; both Ira's and the deacon's
motives are partially out of pride -- much of the film examines where
principals leave off and personality begins.  And the deacon is never shown as
wind-up zealot; he is concerned with the best way to run the community, at a
time where the Mennonites' status as pacifists is coming under fire from the
local draft board.  The characters in the film often mention relatives and
friends who have left the community for another Mennonite settlement due to a
disagreement with the Elders; it is considered better to leave the people they
have grown up with than to live in disharmony with their church.  The film
illustrates just such a case with a fine sense of detail and subtlety.
     As to the film itself, the casting stands out more than the acting -- each
member of the cast seems perfectly suited to their role, though none stand out
over the others; this is an asset to a film so absorbed with the idea of
community.  I particularly liked Ira's wife's father, the brother of the
deacon; he provides a character who mediates well between the various
characters while maintaining the common-sense nature you often find in farmers.
The film is shot in Pennsylvania; while the photography is never exceptional
(it has that American Playhouse feel to it), it works very well with the
everyday lifestyles of the characters.  The music is really poor --
better-suited to a film about concentration camp living than a fairly pleasant
rural settlement.  The composer is Lalo Schifrin, a man reknowned for spoiled
film music; in 30 years, he'll only be remembered for the theme to MISSION:
IMPOSSIBLE, and it'll be to his benefit.
     In summary, while this film won't get your blood rushing or involve you
emotionally very much, it is an enjoyable, engrossing 90-minute film.  Since it
will probably be on television in a year or two, sans interruptions on PBS, I
recommend you scout your TV listings rather than your local theaters.

Title
Review for Personal Services (1987)
Seen at the Seattle Film Festival:
PERSONAL SERVICES (Great Britain, 1986)
Director: Terry Jones
Screenwriter: David Leland
Cast: Julie Walters, Alec McCowen, Shirley Stelfox, Danny Schiller
     This is, unless you are rather prudish about sexual matters, a pretty
funny film, but it really doesn't get rolling until after the first half-hour,
so have a little patience.  Maybe I was expecting too much; but with a director
like Terry Jones (of MONTY PYTHON fame and thus a god to me :-) ), a writer
like David Leland (who did MONA LISA last year), and Julie Walters (the actress
who brought EDUCATING RITA to life), I was expecting some type of comedic
Blitzkrieg.  It isn't that, but it isn't bad, either.
     We open with Walters, as a fairly rough woman who is losing her shirt
sub-letting apartments to hookers in the city.  Faced with financial ruin, she
and her friends (a high-class hooker and her transsexual "maid") talk her into
teaming up into a service specializing in elderly, kinky men...harmless in
themselves, but liking to be chained to walls and pissed upon, to dress up in
womens' clothes, or to get into old school uniforms and be spanked by the
"headmistress."  Soon their business begins burgeoning to the point that they
must find a larger place to practice business, and they move to the suburbs...
and this is where the film really takes off.  While there are some funny
sequences in the first half, much of it seems to be trying to make a dramatic
point about the dreams Walters has of a married life, and the realities she
must face in the real world.
     The main theme of the film seems to be that tolerance of sexual
eccentricity would make the world a better place.  I must admit, I'd rather
hang around the people in this movie than Jerry Falwell and his righteous
legion any day.  C+ for those who like bawdy laughs and can get by the English
accents (B for the second half).

Title
Review for Torch Song Trilogy (1988)
     When considering a film that centers on the life of an individual
character over a period of time, the question is, do you find the character
interesting enough to continue watching the picture through it's length?
Despite a slow opener, the answer is a definite yes for Harvey Fierstein's
character in TORCH SONG TRILOGY.  The film adapts Fierstein's Broadway play,
which details the life of his character from the early 1970s to the early 1980s,
and his relationships with his family (in particular, his mother, played by
Anne Bancroft) and his lovers (played by Brian Kerwin and Matthew Broderick).
Fierstein by himself is witty and wry (and has the theatrical habit of talking
to the audience), but once the supporting characters begin to share some screen
time, the drama picks up and the film becomes very involving.  The interaction
of the characters (particularly Fierstein & Broderick and Fierstein & Bancroft)
make the film, and you end up caring for them and the particular crosses they
have to bear.
     I note that many reviewers describe TORCH SONG TRILOGY as a film about
"gay life," which is inappropriate; rather, it's a character study of a man who
is gay.  The film succeeds or fails on Fierstein's character; it deals with
personalities, not issues, and it works because the personalities on-screen
hold one's interest.
